test tubes SIS Banner Herbals border [shimheader.gif] bullet Toxicology 
The purpose of this bibliography is to provide a brief survey of the literature covering the publication years 1997-1999.
This bibliography includes citations from published articles, books, books chapters, and technical reports.
Citations to articles in non-English languages are indicated with [ ] around the title.
The language is also indicated.
Citations are organized under subject categories; General, Adverse Effects, Mechanisms/Pharmacology, Therapeutic Use.
Citations have been selected from the TOXLINE database of the National Library of Medicine, National Institutes of Health.
The search strategy included terms for the general concept of herbals as well as many specifics.
__________________________________________________________________
General
Naturals, botanicals and minerals.
Cosmet Toiletries 1998 Oct;113:81-2, 84, 86, 88, 90-1 IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A list of new natural, botanical, and mineral materials for the cosmetic industry, including trade names, properties, claims, applications, and sources, is presented.
Adamolekun B, Hakim JG. Opsoclonus-myoclonus associated with traditional medicine ingestion: case report.
East Afr Med J 1998;75(2):120-1.
A case of Opsoclonus-Myoclonus occurring in a young man, in association with traditional herbal medicine consumption is presented.
Clinical and laboratory investigations did not reveal any of the known aetiological associations of the Opsoclonus-Myoclonus syndrome, raising the possibility that the traditional herbal medicine may be aetiologically implicated.
This report highlights the need for proper identification and documentation of the contents of common herbal remedies and their possible side effects amongst Africans.
Ali M. Herbal pharmacy.
Indian J Pharm Educ 1997;31(1):13-7.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The history of Ayurvedic, Unani, and Chinese herbal pharmacy, herbal drugs in western countries, and the place of herbal drugs in modern medicine and pharmacy are discussed.
Baek NI, Kim JM, Park JH, Ryu JH, Kim SI, et al .
Ginsenoside Rs3, a genuine dammarane-glycoside from Korean red ginseng.
Arch Pharmacal Res 1997;20(3):280-2.
Balcerska I, Wedzisz A, Uramowski J. [Nitrates and nitrites in selected herbs and herbal preparations].
Bromatol Chem Toksykol 1997;30(2):119-23.
(Pol) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Several single herbs, herbal blends and granulates were tested for their nitrate and nitrite content.
Griess colorimetry was used.
All test herbs and preparations were found to contain nitrates and nitrites.
Bao K.
Traditional Chinese materia medica (TCMM).
Altern Ther Health Med 1997;3(1):18.
Barton BE, Tagat JR. Current status of interleukin-6 inhibitors.
Drugs Future 1997 Apr;22:391-5.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A review of interleukin inhibitors is presented, including biopharmaceuticals such as antibodies, toxic fusion proteins, and peptide antagonists; synthetic chemicals; and miscellaneous compounds such as botanical extracts, marine extract, and tretinoin (retinoic acid).
Borkowski B. [Herbal drugs used in atherosclerosis--antisclerotica].
Farm Pol 1998;54(10):435-47.
(Pol)
Bull SS, Melian M. Contraception and culture: the use of yuyos in Paraguay.
Health Care Women Int 1998;19(1):49-60.
The use of herbs (yuyos) as contraception is common practice in Paraguay.
This report analyzes data from the 1995-1996 Paraguayan Reproductive Health Survey.
The analysis reveals that women are more familiar with yuyos (88%) than any other method of family planning.
Modeling the determinants of ever having relied on yuyos as contraception demonstrates that older women (OR = 1.043) and women with more children (OR = 2.283) are significantly more likely to have used yuyos, but an interaction between older women with more children shows they are less likely to have used this method (OR = .982).
Women living in rural areas (OR = .664) and those with more education (OR = .883) are less likely to have used the method.
These findings show widespread acceptance and use of yuyos for contraception in Paraguay.
More research into the chemical properties of yuyos is needed to determine their contraceptive efficacy and to prevent harmful effects from their misuse.
Chan TY. Monitoring the safety of herbal medicines.
Drug Saf 1997;17(4):209-15.
Extremely limited knowledge about the ingredients in herbal medicines and their effects in humans, the lack of stringent quality control and the heterogenous nature of herbal medicines all necessitate the continuous monitoring of the safety of these products.
In Hong Kong, safety information on herbal medicines has come from the enquiries and reports received by our Drug and Poisons Information Service, on-going surveillance of patients treated in a large general teaching hospital and review of reports from the medical literature.
Circumstances under which poisonings have occurred are also analysed in order to devise preventive measures.
Once collected, this information is then distributed to health professionals in Hong Kong and abroad.
WHO projects and pilot studies in Europe are also under way to promote and facilitate reporting of adverse reactions to herbal medicines.
Chandler F, Osborne F. Burdock.
Can Pharm J 1997 Jun;130:46-9.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The botanical features, traditional and modern medicinal uses, constituents, pharmacology, toxicity, contraindications, precautions, and dosage of burdock (Arctium lappa; Arctium minus) are discussed.
Chavez ML, Chavez PI. Saint John's Wort.
Hosp Pharm 1997 Dec;32:1621-8, 1631-2.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the chemistry, history, use, pharmacokinetics, and clinical pharmacology of St. John's Wort, a shrubby, perennial weed that has been used as an antidepressant, is presented, including a summary of clinical trials of St. John's Wort for depression as well as for antiviral effects, dosage and administration, and side effects and contraindications.
Chen DF, Zhang SX, Wang HK, Zhang SY, Sun QZ, Cosentino LM, Lee KH. Novel anti-HIV lancilactone C and related triterpenes from Kadsura lancilimba.
J Nat Prod 1999;62(1):94-7.
Three new triterpene lactones, lancilactones A (1), B (2), and C (3), together with the known kadsulactone A (4), were isolated from the stems and roots of Kadsura lancilimba.
Their structures and stereochemistries were determined primarily from mass and NMR spectral data.
Compound 3 inhibited HIV replication with an EC50 value of 1.4 microg/mL and a therapeutic index of greater than 71.4.
Chung KT, Wong TY, Wei CI, Huang YW, Lin Y.
Tannins and human health: a review.
Crit Rev Food Sci Nutr 1998;38(6):421-64.
Tannins (commonly referred to as tannic acid) are water-soluble polyphenols that are present in many plant foods.
They have been reported to be responsible for decreases in feed intake, growth rate, feed efficiency, net metabolizable energy, and protein digestibility in experimental animals.
Therefore, foods rich in tannins are considered to be of low nutritional value.
However, recent findings indicate that the major effect of tannins was not due to their inhibition on food consumption or digestion but rather the decreased efficiency in converting the absorbed nutrients to new body substances.
Incidences of certain cancers, such as esophageal cancer, have been reported to be related to consumption of tannins-rich foods such as betel nuts and herbal teas, suggesting that tannins might be carcinogenic.
However, other reports indicated that the carcinogenic activity of tannins might be related to components associated with tannins rather than tannins themselves.
Interestingly, many reports indicated negative association between tea consumption and incidences of cancers.
Tea polyphenols and many tannin components were suggested to be anticarcinogenic.
Many tannin molecules have also been shown to reduce the mutagenic activity of a number of mutagens.
Many carcinogens and/or mutagens produce oxygen-free radicals for interaction with cellular macromolecules.
The anticarcinogenic and antimutagenic potentials of tannins may be related to their antioxidative property, which is important in protecting cellular oxidative damage, including lipid peroxidation.
The generation of superoxide radicals was reported to be inhibited by tannins and related compounds.
The antimicrobial activities of tannins are well documented.
The growth of many fungi, yeasts, bacteria, and viruses was inhibited by tannins.
We have also found that tannic acid and propyl gallate, but not gallic acid, were inhibitory to foodborne bacteria, aquatic bacteria, and off-flavor-producing microorganisms.
Their antimicrobial properties seemed to be associated with the hydrolysis of ester linkage between gallic acid and polyols hydrolyzed after ripening of many edible fruits.
Tannins in these fruits thus serve as a natural defense mechanism against microbial infections.
The antimicrobial property of tannic acid can also be used in food processing to increase the shelf-life of certain foods, such as catfish fillets.
Tannins have also been reported to exert other physiological effects, such as to accelerate blood clotting, reduce blood pressure, decrease the serum lipid level, produce liver necrosis, and modulate immunoresponses.
The dosage and kind of tannins are critical to these effects.
The aim of this review is to summarize and analyze the vast and sometimes conflicting literature on tannins and to provide as accurately as possible the needed information for assessment of the overall effects of tannins on human health.
Chyau CC, Mau JL. Release of volatile compounds from microwave heating of garlic juice with 2,4-decadienals.
Food Chem 1999;64(4):531-5.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Garlic (Allium sativum L.) juice and 2,4-decadienals were heated in a microwave oven at the full power of 700 W.
The volatile compounds of heated samples were isolated using diethyl ether solvent extraction and analysed using gas chromatography and gas chromatography-mass spectrometry.
A total of 23 compounds were identified from these samples, among which 14 sulfide compounds, five aldehydes, two alcohols, one acid and one furan were identified.
Three tentatively identified compounds, dithio(1-propenyl)propionate, dihydro-2(3H)-thiophenthione and n-hexanethiol were newly found in deep-fried garlic flavor.
During microwave heating, levels of most volatiles decreased as the heating time continued.
2-Pentylfuran, isopropyl alcohol, hexanal and (E)-2-octenal were formed from the degradation of 2,4-decadienals.
Sulfur dioxide was generated predominantly from the degradation and oxidation of sulfide compounds.
Cicero LA, Pareddy SR, Rosenberg JM.
Can depression patients be treated with worts? Drug Top 1997 Sep 1;141:24.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The use of Hypericum perforatum (St. John's Wort) for depression therapy, including results of studies, possible mechanisms of action, toxicity, and dosage, is presented.
Combest WL. Ginger.
US Pharm 1998 Feb;23:74, 79, 83-4, 86.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the medicinal uses of Zingiber officinale (ginger) is presented, including a discussion of the chemical composition and active constituents of ginger, pharmacology, side effects, and toxicity.
Combest WL. Valerian.
US Pharm 1997 Dec;22:62, 64, 66, 68.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The uses, chemical composition, active constituents, results of clinical studies, toxicity, dosage forms and recommendations of Valerian for insomnia are discussed.
Combest WL, Nemecz G. Echinacea.
US Pharm 1997 Oct;22:126, 129-30, 132.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the medicinal uses of Echinacea species, which is also called purple coneflower, is presented, and components of active fractions of the plant, various types of Echinacea preparations, and the toxicity of Echinacea are considered.
Cornell S. Alternatives to hormone replacement therapy.
Do they measure up to estrogen? Adv Nurse Pract 1997;5(7):45-6, 49, 72.
Crone CC, Wise TN. Use of herbal medicines among consultation-liaison populations.
A review of current information regarding risks, interactions, and efficacy.
Psychosomatics 1998;39(1):3-13.
Consultation-liaison psychiatrists evaluate a wide variety of patients who are often disillusioned with conventional medical care and are seeking to gain some measure of control over their illness.
With the growing popularity of alternative health care practices, consultation-liaison psychiatrists must learn more about the implications of herbal medicine usage.
This review provides an overview of herbal medicines, a vital component of the alternative medicine movement.
Dasgupta P, Fowler CJ. Chillies: from antiquity to urology.
Br J Urol 1997;80(6):845-52.
Davis WM.
Most frequently asked questions regarding depression.
Drug Top 1997 Oct 6;141:98-107.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Types of depression, risk factors, symptoms, causes, suicidal risk, genetic role, and therapy of clinical depression with antidepressants, including their side effects, effects on sex life, types of drugs used during pregnancy, herbal drugs, ethyl alcohol interactions, and electroconvulsive therapy, are discussed.
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
De Smet PA.
The role of plant-derived drugs and herbal medicines in healthcare.
Drugs 1997;54(6):801-40.
Many of our present medicines are derived directly or indirectly from higher plants.
While several classic plant drugs have lost much ground to synthetic competitors, others have gained a new investigational or therapeutical status in recent years.
In addition, a number of novel plant-derived substances have entered into Western drug markets.
Clinical plant-based research has made particularly rewarding progress in the important fields of anticancer (e.g. taxoids and camptothecins) and antimalarial (e.g. artemisinin compounds) therapies.
In addition to purified plant-derived drugs, there is an enormous market for crude herbal medicines.
Natural product research can often be guided by ethnopharmacological knowledge, and it can make substantial contributions to drug innovation by providing novel chemical structures and/or mechanisms of action.
In the end, however, both plant-derived drugs and crude herbal medicines have to take the same pharmacoeconomic hurdle that has become important for new synthetic pharmaceuticals.
De Smet PA, Brouwers JR. Pharmacokinetic evaluation of herbal remedies.
Basic introduction, applicability, current status and regulatory needs.
Clin Pharmacokinet 1997;32(6):427-36.
De Vincenzi M, Mancini E. Monographs on botanical flavouring substances used in foods.
Part VI. Fitoterapia 19997;68(1):49-61.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM LITERATURE REVIEW ORIGANUM-MAJORANA ORIGANUM-CRETICUM MELITTIS-MELISSOPHYLLUM STACHYS-OFFICINALIS AJUGA-CHAMAEPITYS GALEOPSIS-SEGETUM POGOSTEMON-CABLIN VERBASCUM-DENSIFLORUM VERONICA-ALLIONII VERONICA-OFFICINALIS BALLOTA-NIGRA SALVIA-OFFICINALIS SATUREJA-MONTANA MARJORAM WOOD BETONY AJUGA PATCHOULI MULLEIN SPEEDWELL BLACK HOREHOUND SAGE WINTER SAVORY BIOCHEMISTRY AND BIOPHYSICS FOODS BOTANICAL FLAVORING SUBSTANCES CHEMICAL COMPONENTS TOXIC PROPERTIES.
Debrunner B, Meier B. Petasites hybridus: a tool for interdisciplinary research in phytotherapy.
Pharm Acta Helv 1998;72(6):359-62.
The 3rd Petasites gathering took place in Romanshorn, Switzerland on March 29, 1996 and gave 16 European scientists the opportunity to transmit their latest considerable discoveries to interested researchers working in different scientific disciplines such as pharmacognosy, botany, chemistry, pharmacology, medicine or clinical pharmacy.
The newest findings on Petasites hybridus as a significant plant drug showed very promising aspects of therapeutic utility.
Great progress has been made in chemical analytical methods and the determination of pharmacological activities.
Substantial advances have also occurred in the production of bioassay procedures and plant materials, particularly utilizing cell- and tissue-culture techniques.
Donaldson K. Introduction to the healing herbs.
ORL Head Neck Nurs 1998;16(3):9-16.
For centuries, man has used plants for their healing properties.
Today we refer to these plants as herbs.
These plants play a principal part in all treatment modalities, both ancient and modern.
The gentle, nourishing, and synergistic actions of herbal medicine make it an excellent treatment choice for all systems.
Properties of ten commonly used herbs will be discussed.
The herbs will be reviewed for their history, actions, indications and safety.
Duke CC, Moore DE, Roufogalis BD. St. John's wort.
N Z Pharm 1998 Jan;18:13-4.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The characteristics, biological activity, common uses, clinical trials, and adverse effects of Hypericum perforatum (St. John's wort) are discussed.
Duncan MG.
The effects of nutritional supplements on the treatment of depression, diabetes, and hypercholesterolemia in the renal patient.
J Ren Nutr 1999;9(2):58-62.
The independent use of nutritional supplements has increased dramatically over the past several years.
St. John's Wort for the treatment of depression, chromium for improvement of abnormal glucose and insulin regulation, and garlic for hypercholesterolemia, are among the more popular nutritional supplements being used by the population at large for their respective conditions.
Depression, diabetes, and hypercholesterolemia are common to the renal patient.
However, the efficacy of St. John's Wort, chromium, and garlic for these problems in the patient with impaired renal function is not known.
This article reviews the pharmacology, efficacy, safety, and pharmokinetics of these three food supplements in the nonrenal patient.
There are encouraging data suggesting successful treatment in the otherwise normal individual.
However, clinical studies examining the safety of these three supplements for the treatment of depression, diabetes, and hypercholesterolemia in the patient with renal disease are lacking and preclude recommendation of their use.
Dunford A, Eldin S. Useful plants [letter; comment].
J R Soc Med 1997;90(3):178-9.
Eliason BC. Alternative medicine--the case of herbal remedies [letter].
N Engl J Med 1999;340(7):564; Discussion 566.
Eliason BC, Kruger J, Mark D, Rasmann DN.
Dietary supplement users: demographics, product use, and medical system interaction.
J Am Board Fam Pract 1997;10(4):265-71.
BACKGROUND: Dietary supplements-defined as vitamins and minerals, herbal products, tissue extracts, proteins and amino acids, and other products-are purchased to improve health and prevent disease.
Little has been published, however, about the characteristics of either the products or the people who use them.
METHODS: Consecutive customers visiting two health food stores during a 15-day period were interviewed by telephone.
They were asked about their use of dietary supplements, demographics, and their use of the established health care system.
RESULTS: Of the 194 customers contacted, 136 (70.1 percent) completed the survey.
Respondents took a total of 805 supplements, most often to prevent a health problem (84.3 percent).
Herbal products were most commonly used.
Garlic, ginseng, and Ginkgo biloba were the herbs most frequently used.
Fifty products were found to have previously reported toxicities, including vitamin A, which 9 customers were taking in megadoses.
Most customers were white (94.1 percent), female (75.7 percent), had at least 1 year of college education (70.6 percent), had health insurance (95.6 percent), and had a regular physician (85.3 percent).
CONCLUSION: Most of the dietary supplements consumed appear to be safe, but 50 of 805 had previously reported toxicities including megadoses of vitamin A. Garlic, ginseng, and Ginkgo biloba were the most commonly ingested herbs, and the medical literature supports their effectiveness for some conditions in humans.
Customers of two health food stores had average to above-average education and took dietary supplements to stay healthy.
They used the conventional health care system but did not typically consult their physician about dietary supplements.
The pattern of use suggests that physicians might not be adequately addressing preventive and wellness issues in discussions with their patients.
Furthermore, physicians might need to learn about dietary supplements so they can communicate with patients about them.
Etkin NL.
Indigenous patterns of conserving biodiversity: pharmacologic implications.
J Ethnopharmacol 1998;63(3):233-45.
The accelerating rate at which the world's botanical resources are being depleted today has inspired redoubled efforts on the part of global conservation programs.
For the most part, this reflects the actions of outsiders who are culturally and politically detached from the threatened environments, and who identify species for conservation through western economic models.
In view of this, ethnopharmacologists--and primarily those representing the social sciences--have drawn attention to the cogency of indigenous knowledge of biotic diversity and its conservation.
This paper reviews how local paradigms of plant management promote conservation, and problematizes the issue specifically to the use of plants by Hausa peoples in northern Nigeria.
The pharmacologic implications of indigenous patterns of plant use and conservation derive from the manifold and overlapping contexts in which plants, especially wild species, are used by local communities.
These applications identify the importance of particular species and should be employed in assigning priority for the conservation of plants.
Falch B, Reichling J, Saller R. [Ginger: not only a spice.
Investigation of effects and effectivity].
Dtsch Apoth Ztg 1997 Nov 20;137:47-52, 55-60.(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The occurrence, morphological, microscopical, and organoleptic characteristics, constituents, traditional and modern uses, pharmacological effects, clinical and toxicological investigations, dosages, and methods of the application of ginger (Zingiber officinale Roscoe) rhizome and its medical preparations are discussed.
Fisher E, Lacy E. Nutrition: nonvitamin food supplements.
Pharm Times 1997 Nov;63:97-105.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of nonvitamin food supplements is presented, including bee pollen, bioflavonoids, carnitine, chromium, ubidecarenone (coenzyme Q-10), ginseng, kelp, melatonin, and tryptophan; the problems associated with the studies performed on nonvitamin food supplements, the sources of claims made for them, potential problems with self-administration of nonvitamin food supplements by the patient, the possible adverse effects of such supplements, and the process of counseling patients on the relative merits of supplementing one's diet with these substances are also discussed.
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
Gaedcke F. [St. John's Wort and its preparations: evaluation of quality with the aid of a selective reproducible HPLC procedure].
Dtsch Apoth Ztg 1997 Oct 16;137:117-21.
(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The assessment of the pharmaceutical quality of the active principles of St. John's Wort (Hypericum perforatum), including hypericin and pseudohypericin, using a specially developed method with HPLC is discussed.
Germer S, Franz G. [Ginger: manifold medicinal crude drug.
Uses and thin layer chromatographic (TLC) assay according to the German Pharmacopeia 1997].
Dtsch Apoth Ztg 1997 Nov 20;137:40-6.
(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A discussion of the crude drug ginger (Zingiber officinale Roscoe) is presented, including historical and botanical aspects, cultivation and harvesting, processing the rhizome, potential adulteration, contents of active substances, and uses.
Pharmacopeial methods of TLC analysis of the active ingredients in ginger extracts are included.
Gillespie SG. Herbal drugs and phytomedicinal agents.
Pharm Times 1997 Dec;63:53-62.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of herbal drugs and phytomedicinal agents is presented, including a discussion of the history of herbal medicine, an outline of the regulation of herbal drugs in the United States and Europe, the extent and the demographics of use of herbal drugs, the characteristics of herbal drugs regarding composition, standardization, and dosage forms, and the indications, contraindications, dose, and side effects of selected herbal drugs.
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
Goldman LS. Use of herbal medicines among C-L populations [letter].
Psychosomatics 1998;39(5):482.
Goodyear K, Lewith G, Low JL. Randomized double-blind placebo-controlled trial of homoeopathic 'proving' for Belladonna C30.
J R Soc Med 19998;91(11):579-82.
Homoeopathic drug pictures are developed by recording the symptomatic effects of homoeopathic remedies given to healthy volunteers (a 'proving').
In a double-blind randomized controlled trial we tested the hypothesis that individuals using an infinitesimal dilution of Belladonna (thirtieth potency, C30) would record more true symptoms, on a questionnaire that contained both true and false Belladonna proving symptoms, than those receiving placebo.
60 volunteers entered the study and 47 completed data collection.
We were unable to distinguish between Belladonna C30 and placebo using our primary outcome measure.
For the secondary outcome measure we analysed the number of individuals who proved to the remedy according to our predefined criteria: 4 out of 19 proved in the Belladonna C30 group and 1 out of 27 in the placebo group (difference not statistically significant).
This pilot study does not demonstrate a clear proving reaction for Belladonna C30 versus placebo, but indicates how the question might be further investigated.
Gori M, Campbell RK. Natural products and diabetes treatment.
Diabetes Educ 1998;24(2):201-2, 205-8.
Many natural products are promoted to improve the health status of patients with diabetes by people making a profit on these products.
Few of these claims have any scientific basis.
Certain natural products are potentially damaging to patients with chronic diseases, especially if the products are used instead of proven scientific treatment regimens.
Many individuals believe that if a product is natural it must be effective and safe.
What is ironic is that if the products were safe and effective, and if studies would have been done on humans to prove safety and effectiveness, the sales of the products would greatly increase (as opposed to present limited sales as herbs from health food stores).
Some of the products do have a beneficial effect, especially as a placebo if the patient believes that the product is going to work.
As can be seen from the summary of products that are listed here that claim to improve the treatment of patients with diabetes, very few are available in a standard form that would produce a known positive effect.
The few products that do have a mild impact on lowering blood glucose levels are much less effective than standard treatments.
In a recent review of the role of plant-derived drugs and herbal medicines in healthcare, no natural products were listed as having a beneficial effect on diabetes.
Diabetes care providers need to confront the issue of the use of natural products with their patients.
Patients should be taught the importance of using proven, effective treatment regimens.
Any patient who decides to use a natural product should be followed closely to make sure that no toxic effects occur and that treatment objectives are achieved.
Grabarczyk H, Horoszkiewicz M, Bloszyk E. [Plant extracts in cosmetics].
Farm Pol 1997;53(6):250-7.
(Pol)
Grauds C.
At last--standardized botanical products.
Pharm Times 1997 Apr;63:107.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The development of standardized botanical products is described, including the process of extraction of the plant material, how standards might be defined differently among competitive companies, and establishing therapeutic validity for standardized botanical products.
Grauds C. Herbal ephedra and the pharmacist.
Pharm Times 1998 Mar;64:60, 62.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the popular herb ephedra (Ephedra species; Ma Huang), an herbal equivalent and precursor to the drugs ephedrine and pseudoephedrine, is presented, including the importance of pharmacists providing consultation to patients using this herb, indications for ephedra use, side effects, contraindications, and U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) warnings and restrictions on ephedra-containing products.
Grauds C. Strong herb sellers: up-and-comers for 1998.
Pharm Times 1998 May;64:48, 50.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The top 10 selling herbs as a result of a growing herbal market are listed, and research on the efficacy of Hypericum perforatum (St. John's wort) for depression and its potential drug interactions are briefly presented.
Gresser G. [Broom: medicinal and poisonous plant, plantation net and devil's broom].
Dtsch Apoth Ztg 1998 Mar 5;138:51-2, 55-9.
(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the etymology, botanical characteristics, distribution range, active constituents, including biogenic amines, flavonoids and iso-flavonoids, along with the therapeutic uses and toxicity of the plant broom, Cytisus scoparius (L) LINK (Leguminose), is presented.
Grush LR, Nierenberg A, Keefe B, Cohen LS. St. John's Wort during pregnancy.
JAMA 1998 Nov 11;280:1566.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The cases of 2 women, ages 38 and 43 yr, who took Hypericum perforatum (St. John's Wort) in preference to standard antidepressant therapy during pregnancy are reported; the first patient experienced a recurrence of major depression during her first trimester of pregnancy and initiated H. perforatum at 900 mg/day, and the second patient discontinued fluoxetine hydrochloride and methylphenidate hydrochloride, which had been prescribed for refractory depression, and substituted 900 mg/day of H. perforatum.
In the first patient, pregnancy and labor were uneventful, and the infant had Apgar scores of 9 at 1 and 5 min.
The patient discontinued H. perforatum and began breastfeeding.
The baby developed jaundice on day 5, which required brief phototherapy.
The patient resumed H. perforatum on day 20 at 300 mg/day, but continued breastfeeding.
Examination of the baby at 4 and 33 days was within the normal range.
Halberstein RA.
Traditional botanical remedies on a small Caribbean island: Middle (Grand) Caicos, West Indies.
J Altern Complement Med 1997;3(3):227-39.
A descriptive survey of 18 medicinal plants utilized on Middle (Grand) Caicos Island in the West Indies revealed that each species has multiple applications.
Phytochemical constituents, ascertained from published sources, suggest pharmacological/physiological efficacy in the ethnomedical treatment of various disorders.
Traditional preparation procedures may enhance the chemotherapeutic value of the plant derivatives, while at the same time reducing their potential toxicity.
The majority of species used in Middle Caicos are also exploited in other cultures but often for very different purposes.
Hammond GB, Fernandez ID, Villegas LF, Vaisberg AJ.
A survey of traditional medicinal plants from the Callejon de Huaylas, Department of Ancash, Peru.
J Ethnopharmacol 1998;61(1):17-30.
The medicinal uses of local flora from the Callejon de Huaylas, Department of Ancash, northeastern Peru, are reported.
This geographical area has an old tradition of herbal healing.
A total of 33 species have been documented through interactions with village elders, traditional doctors and herbalists.
Of the 33 medicinal plant species surveyed in the Callejon de Huaylas, six have not been previously reported, seven have received only minor phytochemical coverage in the literature, and the medicinal uses of seven other plants have not been corroborated with traditional medicinal reports from around the world.
The traditional medicinal uses of six medicinal plants have been corroborated with previously published reports but their biological activities have yet to be confirmed in the laboratory.
The medicinal uses of four other plants have been corroborated with previously published reports and their biological activities have been confirmed in the laboratory.
The purported medicinal use of three plant species could not be confirmed in the laboratory.
Harrison P. Herbal medicine takes root in Germany [see comments]
CMAJ 1998;158(5):637-9.
The sale of Herbal Medicine is a growth industry in Germany, where physicians routinely prescribe these products and annual sales have surpassed $ 2 billion.
Pam Harrison says the rising popularity has been driven by German patients, who began demanding herbal alternatives to synthetic drugs.
Medical schools responded by reintroducing lessons on a topic that had been phased out of the medical curriculum.
Havlick HD.
From the customer's perspective.
Natural Pharm 1998 Aug;2:1, 10-1.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The importance of pharmacists in keeping abreast of natural and herbal products in light of the fact that more consumers purchase their natural products from pharmacies rather than health food stores is discussed, including what consumers look for when purchasing an herbal product, and how pharmacists might better serve their customers and increase their customer base.
Heiligenstein E, Guenther G.
Over-the-counter psychotropics: a review of melatonin, St John's wort, valerian, and kava-kava.
J Am Coll Health 1998;46(6):271-6. Use and availability of alternative healthcare products have revived in the last few years.
The prevalence of supplement use in the United States is largely unknown but is thought to be widespread.
In this article, four of the common substances used to treat emotional problems are reviewed.
The plant or substance description, clinical indications, evidence of therapeutic efficacy, mechanisms of therapeutic actions, dosages and regimens, different commercially available preparations, and adverse effects and toxicities are described for melatonin, St John's wort, valerian, and kava-kava.
That a product is "natural" does not mean that it is either safe or effective.
Many supplements are potent drugs that lack sufficient data on safety, dose-response relationships, drug interactions, and purity.
Heinrich M, Ankli A, Frei B, Weimann C, Sticher O. Medicinal plants in Mexico: healers' consensus and cultural importance.
Soc Sci Med 1998;47(11):1859-71.
Medicinal plants are an important element of indigenous medical systems in Mexico.
These resources are usually regarded as part of a culture's traditional knowledge.
This study examines the use of medicinal plants in four indigenous groups of Mexican Indians, Maya, Nahua, Zapotec and - for comparative purposes - Mixe.
With the first three the methodology was similar, making a direct comparison of the results possible.
In these studies, the relative importance of a medicinal plant within a culture is documented using a quantitative method.
For the analysis the uses were grouped into 9-10 categories of indigenous uses.
This report compares these data and uses the concept of informant consensus originally developed by Trotter and Logan for analysis.
This indicates how homogenous the ethnobotanical information is.
Generally the factor is high for gastrointestinal illnesses and for culture bound syndromes.
While the species used by the 3 indigenous groups vary, the data indicate that there exist well-defined criteria specific for each culture which lead to the selection of a plant as a medicine.
A large number of species are used for gastrointestinal illnesses by two or more of the indigenous groups.
At least in this case, the multiple transfer of species and their uses within Mexico seems to be an important reason for the widespread use of a species.
Medicinal plants in other categories (e.g. skin diseases) are usually known only in one culture and seem to be part of its traditional knowledge.
Heinrich M, Robles M, West JE, Ortiz De Montellano BR, Rodriguez E. Ethnopharmacology of Mexican asteraceae (Compositae).
Annu Rev Pharmacol Toxicol 1998;38:539-65.
Traditional herbal remedies have increased in popularity in Europe and the United States in recent years but have always been important to people living in rural Mexico and to their Mexican American/Chicano descendants in the United States.
Mexican American patients will often be ingesting herbal teas at the same time that they are being treated for their ailments with antibiotics or antiinflammatory agents.
The plant family Asteraceae (Compositae) has contributed the largest number of plants to this pharmacopoeia; the reasons for the importance of this family include its large number of species in Mexico and its wide array of natural products that are useful in the treatment of the maladies that have afflicted the inhabitants of rural Mexico.
These natural products include sesquiterpene lactones, polyacetylenes, alkaloids, monoterpenes, and various phenolics such as flavonoids.
In this review, we emphasize the sesquiterpene lactones, a large group of compounds with antiinflammatory properties and the ability to relax smooth muscles and thereby relieve gastrointestinal distress.
These compounds also readily form adducts with glutathione or free thiols and can thereby affect the metabolism, activity, and toxicology of a wide array of pharmacological agents.
Hendriks H. Pharmaceutical aspects of some Mentha herbs and their essential oils.
Perfum Flavor 1998 Nov-Dec;23:15-23.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of some herbs and essential oils of the Mentha species that are used in pharmaceuticals, including M. piperita (peppermint), peppermint oil, M. arvensis (cornmint; Japanese mint), cornmint oil, M. pulegium (pennyroyal), pennyroyal oil, M. spicata (spearmint), M. cardiaca (spearmint), and spearmint oil, is presented, including their quality control, formulations, therapeutic uses, adverse effects, and toxicity; menthol, a constituent of Mentha species essential oils, is mentioned.
Hippius H. St John's Wort (Hypericum perforatum)--a herbal antidepressant.
Curr Med Res Opin 1998;14(3):171-84.
A number of clinical studies conducted over the past few years have indicated that whole extract of St John's wort (Hypericum perforatum L.) has antidepressant effects.
The herbal antidepressant St John's wort offers promising results in the treatment of patients with mild and moderate depression (response rate of 60-70% estimated by analysis of pooled data).
St John's wort preparations are well tolerated.
Their use rarely leads to adverse drug reactions which, when they do occur, are mainly subjective symptoms (e.g. gastrointestinal, dizziness).
The generally good tolerability of St John's wort preparations and the resulting high patient compliance in taking the prescribed medication, in conjunction with their efficacy in mild and moderate depression, make these preparations particularly suitable for use in outpatient practice.
Tolerability is also very good in elderly patients.
If a sufficiently high-dose course of treatment with St John's wort preparations (900 mg daily) does not lead to a clear improvement in depression after four to six weeks, therapy should be continued with an established ('classical') antidepressant.
Hu SY. Herbal teas and populace health care in tropical China.
Am J Chin Med 1997;25(1):103-34.
Commercial Chinese herbal tea is the development of the populace in tropical and subtropical China consequential to their fight against infectious diseases and their struggle to explore local plants to relieve fever, to alleviate pain, to restore strength and to modulate immunity against viral epidemics.
From these ethnomedical experiences, two types of herbal teas were commercialized, namely, liangcha and medicated teas.
Liangcha refers to a ready-made decoction infused from wild plants served in simple stores in cities and towns.
Medicated teas are parcelled material prepared from crude drugs with or without tea (Camellia sinensis [L.] O. Ktze,), sold in colorful boxes and bags to people for use at home.
Investigations of liangcha were made in Hong Kong and Macao, and studies for medicated teas were done from samples obtained in Chinese stores at Boston.
A total of 127 source species of these herbal teas were identified and arranged in two alphabetical lists by the botanical names, each followed by an English common name in parenthesis, part used, frequency in samples, and family.
External recognizing characters of medicated teas, discussions of problems encountered in identifying source species, relevant toxicities, and potential new vegetal pharmaceutical resources are given.
Huxtable RJ. Safety of botanicals: historical perspective [editorial].
Proc West Pharmacol Soc 1998;41:1-10.
Iorio L, Nacca RG, Simonelli R. Cistercian medicinal herbs for renal therapy in the 15th century.
Am J Nephrol 1997;17(3-4):286-8.
The rule conceived the monastery as a citadel of divine service so that medicine, together with other arts, was the subject of studies and searches which contributed to the foundation of monastic medicine.
In the 14th and 15th centuries, Cistercian monks did not limit themselves to the study of the ancient treatises on medicinal herbs, but enlarged their knowledge through clinical experience to such an extent that they created the principal therapy of diseases for about five centuries.
Jambor J. [Strategies for the development of herbal drugs market].
Farm Pol 19998;54(5):201-9.
(Pol)
Johnson ST, Wordell CJ. Homeopathic and herbal medicine: considerations for formulary evaluation.
Formulary 1997 Nov;32:1166-8, 1171-3.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The principles, efficacy, risks, regulation, and examples of homeopathy and herbal medicine therapy, and formulary considerations for these types of alternative medicine are discussed.
Keplinger K, Laus G, Wurm M, Dierich MP, Teppner H. Uncaria tomentosa (Willd.)
DC.--ethnomedicinal use and new pharmacological, toxicological and botanical results.
J Ethnopharmacol 1999;64(1):23-34.
The medicinal system of the Ashaninka Indians in Peru is portrayed.
Three categories of medical disorders and healers are recognized.
A human is viewed to consist of a physical and a spiritual being who communicate with each other by means of a regulating element.
The significance of Uncaria tomentosa (Willd.)
DC.
(Rubiaceae), locally known as una de gato, in traditional medicine is emphasized by its exclusive use by priests to influence this regulation.
Pharmacological and toxicological results obtained with extracts or isolated compounds are summarized.
Pentacyclic oxindole alkaloids stimulate endothelial cells in vitro to produce a lymphocyte-proliferation-regulating factor.
Tetracyclic oxindole alkaloids act as antagonists.
A significant normalization of lymphocyte percentage was observed in vivo although total leucocyte numbers did not change.
Khaliq Y.
Alternative medicine: what pharmacists need to know.
Pharm Pract 1997 Mar;13:44-50, 83-5.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of alternative medicine with a focus on herbal medicine, homeopathy, and vitamin therapy is presented; the attitudes of patients, physicians, and pharmacists, benefits of alternative medicine, disadvantages of these therapies, such as lack of evidence, toxicity, drug interactions, and lack of regulation and quality control, and the pharmacist's role are discussed.
Klepser TB, Klepser ME. Unsafe and potentially safe herbal therapies.
Am J Health Syst Pharm 1999;56(2):125-38; Quiz 139-41.
Unsafe and potentially safe herbal therapies are discussed.
The use of herbal therapies is on the rise in the United States, but most pharmacists are not adequately prepared educationally to meet patients' requests for information on herbal products.
Pharmacists must also cope with an environment in which there is relatively little regulation of herbal therapies by FDA.
Many herbs have been identified as unsafe, including borage, calamus, coltsfoot, comfrey, life root, sassafras, chaparral, germander, licorice, and ma huang.
Potentially safe herbs include feverfew, garlic, ginkgo, Asian ginseng, saw palmetto, St. John's wort, and valerian.
Clinical trials have been used to evaluate feverfew for migraine prevention and rheumatoid arthritis; garlic for hypertension, hyperlipidemia, and infections; ginkgo for circulatory disturbances and dementia; ginseng for fatigue and cancer prevention; and saw palmetto for benign prostatic hyperplasia.
Also studied in formal trials have been St. John's wort for depression and valerian for insomnia.
The clinical trial results are suggestive of efficacy of some herbal therapies for some conditions.
German Commission E, a regulatory body that evaluates the safety and efficacy of herbs on the basis of clinical trials, cases, and other scientific literature, has established indications and dosage recommendations for many herbal therapies.
Pharmacists have a responsibility to educate themselves about herbal therapies in order to help patients discern the facts from the fiction, avoid harm, and gain what benefits may be available.
Kligler B. Herbal medicines and the family physician [editorial; comment].
Am Fam Physician 1998;58(5):1064-5.
Klink B. Alternative medicines: is natural really better? Drug Top 1997 Jun 2;141:99, 103.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The rapid sales growth and risks vs benefits of alternative medicine and herbal products and the role of the pharmacists who sell these products are discussed.
Kosalec I. [History and future of Echinacea species--natural immunostimulating plants].
Farm Glas 1998 May;54:161-70.
(Scr)
Kozyrskyj A. Herbal products in Canada.
How safe are they? [see comments].
Can Fam Physician 1997;43:697-702.
OBJECTIVE: To examine existing evidence and inform family physicians about issues concerning herbal product use in Canada.
QUALITY OF EVIDENCE: The Canadian Food and Drug Act and findings of an Expert Advisory Committee on Herbs and Botanical Preparations were consulted to provide an overview of the issues regarding herbal product regulation in Canada.
Case reports of herbal toxicity were identified to illustrate some of the hazards of herbal products, and references provided to guide health professional in searching the literature for clinical trials that evaluate these drugs' efficacy.
MAIN FINDINGS: Herbal products not registered as drugs in Canada are sold as foods and are exempt from the drug review process that evaluates product efficacy and safety.
This places the public at risk of unwanted effects from the use of herbal products that are adulterated with other substances and of forgoing effective conventional therapy.
Moreover, consumers are exposed to a plethora of information portraying herbal products as harmless.
Some progress has been made to address these concerns by facilitating the registration of herbal products as drugs.
CONCLUSIONS: Most herbal products that were evaluated were unsafe or ineffective, or no information was available to evaluate their efficacy.
Despite the perception that herbal products are innocuous, family physicians need to be aware that herbal therapy can be harmful in order to help their patients make informed choices.
Krishnaswamy K, Raghuramulu N. Bioactive phytochemicals with emphasis on dietary practices.
Indian J Med Res 1998;108:167-81.
Diet can modify the pathophysiological processes of various metabolic disorders and can be an effective preventive strategy for various disease processes most of which are known to involve oxidative damage.
Both nutrient and non-nutrient components of the diet have been recognized for their anti-oxidant and other potential benefits.
Plant foods contain phytochemicals such as flavonoids, phenolic acids, etc., which show biological activity.
Some common foods used in Indian culinary practices were assessed for their anti-oxidant, anti-mutagenic and anti-carcinogenic effects and vitamin D activity and evaluated for their plausible biological effects.
Green leafy vegetables had the highest anti-oxidant activity followed by wheat and rice.
Cooking decreased this activity.
Eugenol, the active principle of clove, was shown to offer protection against CCl4 induced hepatotoxicity in rats.
It also showed anti-peroxidative activity in addition to decrease in O2 formation.
Studies on the anti-carcinogenic effect of turmeric/curcumin revealed that both are potent anti-mutagens in vivo and reduce the adducted DNA levels in liver of rates challenged with B(a)P.
In another study, Syrian hamsters receiving turmeric/curcumin through diet or local paint on cheek pouch had lower tumour burden as well as adducted DNA level against 7-12-DMBA challenge.
Turmeric/curcumin were found to be better anti-tumour agents when given in the post initiation phase of carcinogenesis.
The beneficial effect of turmeric was found to be due to its anti-oxidant potential.
Studies on humans at risk of palatal cancer due to reverse smoking showed that turmeric (1 g/day) for 9 months had a significant impact on the regression of precancerous lesions.
Onion and garlic also possess anti-mutagenic principle.
Further studies on the bioactive phytochemicals in plants showed that certain plants belonging to Solanaceae (Cestrum diurnum, Lycopersicon esculentum and Solanum melongena) have calcinogenic potential and vitamin D like activity.
In view of the vast data on bioactive principles from plants, it is suggested that dietary prevention coupled with other life-style changes in perhaps the right answer for prevention of cancer and other chronic diseases in India.
Kumar M, Berwal JS. Sensitivity of food pathogens to garlic (Allium sativum).
J Appl Microbiol 1998;84(2):213-5.
The inhibitory activity of garlic (Allium sativum) against Staphylococcus aureus, Salmonella typhi, Escherichia coli and Listeria monocytogenes was measured by the 'turbidity' method.
Minimum inhibitory concentration (MIC) of garlic at 80% inhibition level was calculated for these bacteria.
All bacterial pathogenic strains tested were inhibited by garlic; E. coli was most sensitive and Listeria monocytogenes was least sensitive.
Therefore, garlic has potential for the preservation of processed foods.
La Valle JB. St. John's Wort: there's no magic bullet.
Drug Store News Chain Pharm 1998 Jan;8:15.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The problems associated with the consumer rush to take St. John's Wort (Hypericum perforatum) for depression are discussed, including problems with self-diagnosis and treatment of depression, subtherapeutic dosing of the compound, drug interactions with monoamine oxidase (MAO) inhibitors or other antidepressants, side effects, and methods for discontinuation of traditional antidepressants.
Lavalle J. Ginseng: ancient Chinese cure-all.
Drug Store News For Pharm 1997 Feb;7:42.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The pharmacology, action, indications, toxicities, contraindications, and dosage of ginseng are presented.
Lazarowych NJ, Pekos P. Use of fingerprinting and marker compounds for identification and standardization of botanical drugs: strategies for applying pharmaceutical HPLC analysis to herbal products.
Drug Inf J 1998;32(2):497-512.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The use of HPLC fingerprinting and markers to identify herbal drug materials, set specifications for raw materials, and standardize botanical preparations during manufacturing is discussed; the method was illustrated using Valeriana officinalis (valerian) and Tanacetum parthenium (feverfew).
Lee OS, Kang HH, Han SH.
Oriental herbs in cosmetics.
Cosmet Toiletries 1997 Jan;112:57-64.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The use of plant extracts as cosmetic ingredients is presented, including ginseng from Panax ginseng and Swertia for anti-aging preparations, Angelica, Glycyrrhiza (licorice), Lithospermum, and Scutellaria roots as anti-inflammatory agents, Houttuynia, Phellodendron, and Sophora as antimicrobials, Lonicera and Sanguisorba as astringents, Angelica dahurica, Angelica korea, Bupleurum, and Cnidium rhizome as anti-tyrosinase actives, teas as free-radical scavengers, Angelica keiskei, Coptis, and Lonicera as ultraviolet protectants, Morus lhou (mulberry) for skin whitening, and other agents for hair growth and care.
Lepik K. Safety of herbal medications in pregnancy.
Can Pharm J 1997 Apr;130:29-33.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A summary of safety information that is relevant to the use of selected herbal medications during pregnancy is presented, including pharmacologic, toxicologic, and reproductive effects of 26 herbal remedies.
Li Y, Wu YL.
How Chinese scientists discovered qinghaosu (artemisinin) and developed its derivatives? What are the future perspectives? Med Trop (Mars) 1998;58(3 Suppl):9-12.
Since the middle of this century and especially since the 1960s and 1970s.
Chinese scientists have put considerable effort and resources into the search for new antimalarial compounds extracted from Chinese traditional herbs.
Archaeological findings indicate that qinghao (Artemisia annua L.) has been used as a traditional remedy in China for over two thousand years.
Its antimalarial principle was finally isolated in 1971 and named artemisinin or qinghaosu (meaning the principle of qinghao in Chinese).
Its rapid action, low toxicity and powerful effect against falciparum malaria made it a favored subject for research.
In 1976, the unique structure of the molecule, characterized by an endoperoxide and an alternative O-C-O-C segment, was identified.
The specific lactone reduction discovered during the determination of the structure opened the way for the synthesis of qinghaosu derivatives, and thereafter a series of more active and more oil- or water-soluble derivatives was developed.
Subsequent studies of the structure/activity relationship led to the discovery of dihydroartemisinin, artemether and artesunate.
Now qinghaosu and these three derivatives are being used around the world as effective new antimalarial drugs in the fight against falciparum malaria, including multi-drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum.
At the present time new qinghaosu analogues or derivatives are being developed and studies of their structure/activity relationships, their antimalarial mechanisms, their interaction with ferrous ions and the DNA damage associated with these processes are being actively pursued.
In addition, recent studies also indicate that some qinghaosu derivatives have other bioactivities, including antiparasitic (against Schistosoma japonicum, Toxoplasma gondii and so on) and anticancer activities.
Research into qinghaosu and its derivatives has already produced and will no doubt continue to produce results of the utmost importance in the fight against malaria and other diseases.
Locock RA.
Herbal medicine: Essiac.
Can Pharm J 1997 Feb;130:18-9, 51.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The actions and uses of the herbal preparation, Essiac, and its constituents, including Arctium lappa L. (burdock root), Rumex acetosella L. (sheep sorrel herb), Ulmus fulva Michaux (slippery elm bark), Rheum palmatum L. (turkey rhubarb root), Nasturtium officinale (Rorippa nasturtium; watercress), Laminariales species (kelp), Cnicus (blessed thistle), and Trifolium pratense L. (red clover), are presented.
Mamedov NA, Craker LE. Herbs and plant systematics.
J Herbs Spices Med Plants 1997;5(2):1-2.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The methodology of plant systematics and the importance of using systematics in the search for new medicinal and aromatic plant materials are discussed.
Manandhar NP. Native phytotherapy among the Raute tribes of Dadeldhura district, Nepal.
J Ethnopharmacol 1998;60(3):199-206.
The herbal drugs used by the Raute tribe of far-western Nepal are discussed.
A total of 47 species of plants including one species of pteridophyte, four monocotyledons and 42 dicotyledons, and 17 types of diseases treated, have been identified from this study.
Medicinal uses of 15 species (31%) are unrecorded from other parts of the country.
Masood E. 'Medicinal plants threatened by over-use' [news] [see comments]
Nature 1997;385(6617):570.
McIntyre RV.
Herbal healers [editorial].
J Okla State Med Assoc 1998;91(5):271.
McKinney DE. Saw palmetto for benign prostatic hyperplasia.
JAMA 1999 May 12;281:1699.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A physician's viewpoints regarding the quality of medicinal plant products, particularly extracts of saw palmetto (Serenoa repens) for benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH) are presented, including 4 major points to consider when evaluating a manufacturer's products for patients.
Other plant products that may also have value in the treatment of BPH were briefly discussed.
McLaughlin JL, Rogers LL, Anderson JE. Use of biological assays to evaluate botanicals.
Drug Inf J 1998;32(2):513-24.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The materials and procedures for 4 bioassays used to screen and direct the fractionation of botanical extracts in drug discovery are described, and the application of the methods in the discovery of Annonaceous acetogenins is discussed.
Menke J. Herbal remedies.
S D J Med 1997;50(6):207-8.
Milliken W. Malaria and antimalarial plants in Roraima, Brazil.
Trop Doct 1997;27(Suppl 1):20-5.
One of the numerous problems created by the gold rush which took place in northern Brazil (Roraima State) at the end of the 1980s was a severe epidemic of malaria amongst the indigenous peoples of the region.
Worst hit were the Yanomami Indians, who had lived in almost total isolation prior to this event.
The problem has been exacerbated by the development of chloroquine-resistant strains of Plasmodium falciparum.
In an effort to identify viable alternatives to dependence on western medicine for malaria treatment, a survey was carried out on the local plant species (wild and cultivated) used for this purpose in Roraima.
Fieldwork was carried out amongst seven indigenous peoples, as well as with the non-indigenous settlers.
Over 90 species were collected, many of which have been cited as used for treatment of malaria and fevers elsewhere.
Knowledge of antimalarial plants was found to vary greatly between the communities, and in some cases there was evidence of recent experimentation.
Initial screening of plant extracts has shown a high incidence of significant antimalarial activity amongst the species collected.
Montbriand MJ. Past and present herbs used to treat cancer: medicine, magic, or poison? Oncol Nurs Forum 1999;26(1):49-60.
PURPOSE/OBJECTIVES: To provide an overview of the past and present use of herbs, thereby dispelling the belief that herbs are secret cancer remedies unknown to or ignored by the biomedical community.
DATA SOURCES: Historical and current pharmacy, medical, and nursing literature.
DATA SYNTHESIS: More than 3,000 species of herbs used in treating cancer since 2838 BC are known to biomedicine, yet popular lay literature persists in perpetrating the myth that medicine has ignored the potential uses of herbs.
Secrecy about herbs has been fashionable since the Middle Ages.
Magical and virtuous herbs, named in a book of secrets from that age, are examined for their historical and current use in cancer treatment.
Popular unproven herbs, as well as proven herbs used in chemotherapy, also are discussed.
CONCLUSIONS: Greater accessibility to information about the use of herbs historically, popularly, and currently would help dispel the secrecy, giving healthcare professionals and patients and opportunity to make informed choices.
IMPLICATIONS FOR NURSING PRACTICE: Nurses with knowledge of herbs can be valuable resources to patients and professional colleagues.
Members of the professional community (nurses, doctors, pharmacists, and social workers) need to take collegial responsibility in informing each other and their patients about herbs, including their potential risks, possible benefits, and antidotes for overdose.
Muller JL, Clauson KA. Top herbal products encountered in drug information requests.
Part 2.
Drug Ben Trends 1998 Jun;10:21-3.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the indications, dosage, side effects, possible drug interactions, and clinical studies of 2 top selling herbal products, Hypericum perforatum (St. John's Wort) and Serenoa repens (saw palmetto), is presented.
Myerscough M. Herbal remedies.
How much do you know? Aust Fam Physician 1998;27(11):1037-40.
In this article the importance of knowledge about herbal remedies in general practice is discussed using guarana (Paullinia cupana), St John's wort (Hypericum perforatum), and gingko (Ginkgo biloba) as examples.
Obtaining information about herbal remedies can be difficult.
Lack of clinical data about the use, safety, efficacy and general practitioner attitudes to herbal remedies creates research opportunities in this area of general practice.
Nemecz G. Chamomile.
US Pharm 1998 Mar;23:104, 110, 112, 115-6.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The therapeutic uses of chamomile, including antiphlogistic, spasmolytic, sedative, hypnotic, analgesic, and antimicrobial effects as well as its chemical composition, pharmacological action, toxicity, and dosage, are presented.
Nemecz G. Saw palmetto.
US Pharm 1998 Jan;23:97-8, 100, 102.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The history, chemical composition, medicinal uses, and adverse effects of Serenoa repens (saw palmetto) are discussed.
Nemecz G, Combest WL. Feverfew.
US Pharm 1997 Nov;22:122, 124, 126, 128.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the chemical composition and pharmacological effects of feverfew (Tanacetum parthenium), a perennial herb that has shown efficacy in the treatment of migraine headaches, is presented, including a summary of clinical studies of feverfew in the treatment of migraine headaches and arthritis, its anti-inflammatory effects, its effects on platelet aggregation and vascular smooth muscle contraction, its toxicity and adverse effects, and dosage forms and recommended use.
Neuwinger HD, Mebs D. [Boophone disticha: hallucinogenic African plant].
Dtsch Apoth Ztg 1997 Apr 3;137:51-6.
(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the botanical characteristics, uses in African folk medicine, chemistry, toxicology, and pharmacology of the hallucinogenic contents of the plant Boophone disticha (L) Herbert (Amaryllidaceae) is presented.
Norton SA.
Herbal medicines in Hawaii from tradition to convention.
Hawaii Med J 1998;57(1):382-6.
The stories of kava and chaulmoogra demonstrate the importance of herbal products in ancient and recent Hawaiian medicine.
Kava is a psychoactive beverage that has been used ceremonially for millennia throughout the Pacific.
It is a nonfermented depressant that causes tranquil intoxication in which thoughts and memory remain clear.
Its broad pharmacologic activity led to use in Hawaii to treat skin disorders and later in Germany to treat gonorrhea.
Kava is now available outside the Pacific basin as a relaxant, emerging as a popular, albeit deritualized, natural product.
In the late 19th century, the main treatment for leprosy was chaulmoogra, extracted from Hydnocarpus seeds.
Chaulmoogra had been a traditional treatment for skin diseases in Ayurvedic and Chinese medicine.
Chaulmoogra from Asian markets was expensive and usually adulterated so the USDA decided to plant Hydnocarpus in Hawaii.
Joseph Rock, a botanist at University of Hawaii, trekked through southeast Asia collecting fresh seeds to plant on Oahu.
Rock's trees provided chaulmoogra for leprosy patients on Molokai and elsewhere until it was replaced by dapsone.
Chaulmoogra, once the treatment for leprosy worldwide, is now nearly forgotten; kava, once poorly known outside the Pacific, is now a widely-used alternative medicine.
Hawaii will probably continue its role in the transition of plants from traditional use to conventional use.
Nwosu MO. Aspects of ethnobotanical medicine in southeast Nigeria.
J Altern Complement Med 1998;4(3):305-10.
OBJECTIVE: To document the diversity and traditional use of tropical plants as medicine by the indigenous people of southeast Nigeria.
DESIGN: Information was obtained by interviews conducted with the aid of questionnaires and facilitators during field surveys carried out from January 1993 to June 1994.
Voucher herbarium specimens were identified at the University of Nigeria, Nsukka Herbarium, in collaboration with Bernhard Zepernick (former Curator), Botanisches Museum, Berlin.
Specimens were photographed.
RESULTS: Data are summarized in the form of a table, summarizing the plants commonly used by the traditional doctors or medicine men.
Herbal preparations are arranged alphabetically under family and species.
The data are presented in the order: botanical name, collection number, vernacular name, locality, plant habit/status, and reported medicinal applications.
O'Hara M, Kiefer D, Farrell K, Kemper K.
A review of 12 commonly used medicinal herbs.
Arch Fam Med 1998;7(6):523-36.
A large and increasing number of patients use medicinal herbs or seek the advice of their physician regarding their use.
More than one third of Americans use herbs for health purposes, yet patients (and physicians) often lack accurate information about the safety and efficacy of herbal remedies.
Burgeoning interest in medicinal herbs has increased scientific scrutiny of their therapeutic potential and safety, thereby providing physicians with data to help patients make wise decisions about their use.
This article provides a review of the data on 12 of the most commonly used herbs in the United States.
In addition, we provide practical information and guidelines for the judicious use of medicinal herbs.
Palsson K, Jaenson TG. Plant products used as mosquito repellents in Guinea Bissau, West Africa.
Acta Trop 1999;72(1):39-52.
By standardized interviews of people in 23 rural villages, in the Oio region of Guinea Bissau, we collected data on which plant species and plant derived products or methods people use to reduce mosquito biting activity.The following plants were used to reduce numbers of mosquitoes indoors at night: fresh or smouldering Hyptis suaveolens Poit.
(Lamiaceae), smoke of the bark of Daniellia oliveri Rolfe (Caesalpiniaceae), smoke of the infructescence of Elaeis guineensis Jacq.
(Arecaceae), smoke of the seed capsules of Parkia biglobosa (Jacq.)
Benth.
(Mimosaceae), smoke of the leaves of Azadirachta indica A.Juss.
(Meliaceae) and Eucalyptus sp. (Myrtaceae), fresh Ocimum canum Sims (Lamiaceae), and fresh Senna occidentalis (L.) Link (Caesalpiniaceae).
In two field experiments we estimated the 'repellent activity' of certain of these plants and compared their efficacies with those of two commercially available mosquito repellents, i.e. 'positive' controls.
In the first experiment we tested: smouldering H. suaveolens (85.4% repellency); fresh H. suaveolens (73.2%); burning of the bark of D. oliveri (74.7%); and smoke of the leaves of Eucalyptus (72.2%).
In the second experiment we tested: smouldering H. suaveolens (83.6% repellency); fresh H. suaveolens (66.5%); burning of the bark of D. oliveri (77.9%); smoke of the leaves of A. indica (76.0%); smoke of the infructescence of E. guineensis (69.0%); fresh O. canum (63.6%); and fresh S. occidentalis; (29.4%).
All the products tested, except S. occidentalis were significantly more effective than the negative control.
Paulsen SM. Use of herbal products and dietary supplements by oncology patients--informed decisions? Highlights Oncol Pract 1998;15(4):94-9, 103-6.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of various herbal products and dietary supplements used in cancer prevention and treatment is presented, including prasterone (dehydroepiandrosterone), green teas, adaptogens such as Echinacea and cat's claw (Uncaria species), bovine cartilage, Larrea tridentata (chaparral), linseed oil (flaxseed oil), Viscum album (mistletoe), pau d'arco (a tea derived from the bark of trees of the Tecoma genus), and shark cartilage as well information on clinical studies and toxicity of these products.
Pepping J. Kava: Piper methysticum.
Am J Health Syst Pharm 1999 May 15;56:957-58, 960.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A brief overview of the pharmacology, pharmacokinetics, dosage, adverse effects, drug interactions, contraindications, and results of clinical studies of kava, an herb used for its anxiolytic and sedative properties, is presented.
Kava is derived from the pulverized roots and rhizomes of several subspecies of a pepper plant Piper methysticum.
Pepping J. St. John's Wort: Hypericum perforatum.
Am J Health Syst Pharm 1999 Feb 15;56:329-30.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A brief overview of the pharmacology, dosage, adverse effects, drug interactions, contraindications, and results of clinical studies of Hypericum perforatum (St. John's Wort), an herb used to treat depression, anxiety, and sleep disorders, is presented.
Phillipson D. Pharmacognostical peregrinations.
Pharm J 1997 Feb 1;258:176-7.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An account of one London University pharmacognosy professor's experiences with pharmacists in Australia and Malaysia, where he visited in the autumn of 1996, is presented with a focus on their interest in herbal medicine.
Pittenger J. Herbal treatments find their way into mainstream America.
Wis Med J 1997;96(3):30-1.
Posner H. Alternative medicine--the case of herbal remedies [letter].
N Engl J Med 1999;340(7):565; Discussion 566.
Prince CE. Goldenrod (Solidago gigantea, Solidago virgaurea).
Nebr Mortar Pestle 1997 Sep;60:8-9.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The anti-inflammatory properties, toxicity, and results of animal studies of Solidago gigantea and Solidago virgaurea (goldenrod) are discussed.
Qin GW, Xu RS.
Recent advances on bioactive natural products from Chinese medicinal plants.
Med Res Rev 1998;18(6):375-82.
China has accumulated a rich body of empirical knowledge of the use of medicinal plants for the treatment of various diseases throughout its long history.
Chemical studies on Chinese medicinal plants provide a valuable material base for the discovery and development of new drugs of natural origin.
In this article recent chemical work on various Chinese medicinal plants is reviewed, including Mussaenda pubescens (Rubiaceae), Isatis indigotica (Cruciferae), Euphorbia fischeriana, and E. ebracteolata (Euphorbiaceae), and Stemona species (Stemonaceae).
The structural diversity of the medicinal chemical constituents of the above plants is discussed.
Raja D, Blanche C, Valles Xirau J. Contribution to the knowledge of the pharmaceutical ethnobotany of La Segarra region (Catalonia, Iberian Peninsula).
J Ethnopharmacol 1997;57(3):149-60.
An ethnobotanical survey was carried out in the region known as La Segarra, situated at the north east of the Iberian Peninsula, in the inner plains of Catalonia, with an area of 720 km2 and a population of 17000.
Working with 29 people, data on uses of 142 species belonging to 54 botanical families were obtained and presented, of which 13 uses corresponding to nine plant species were previously unreported.
Rogers MV, Cheek B. Echinacea (purple coneflower).
Carol J Pharm 1997 Jan-Feb;77:16.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The pharmacology, dosage forms, dosage, and toxicity of Echinacea (purple coneflower) for immunostimulation are discussed.
Rogers PL, Shin HS, Wang B. Biotransformation for L-ephedrine production.
Adv Biochem Eng Biotechnol 1997;56:33-59.
L-ephedrine is widely used in pharmaceutical preparations as a decongestant and anti-asthmatic compound.
One of the key intermediates in its production is L-phenylacetylcarbinol (L-PAC) which can be obtained either from plants (Ephedra sp.), chemical synthesis involving resolution of a racemic mixture, or by biotransformation of benzaldehyde using various yeasts.
In the present review, recent significant improvements in the microbial biotransformation are assessed for both fed-batch and continuous processes using free and immobilised yeasts.
From previous fed-batch culture data, maximal levels of L-PAC of 10-12 gl-1 were reported with yields of 55-60% theoretical based on benzaldehyde.
However, recently concentrations of more than 22 gl-1 have been obtained using a wild-type strain of Candida utilis.
This has been achieved through optimal control of yeast metabolism (via microprocessor control of the respiratory quotient, RQ) in order to enhance substrate pyruvate production and induce pyruvate decarboxylase (PDC) activity.
Processes involving purified PDC have also been evaluated and it has been demonstrated that L-PAC levels up to 28 gl-1 can be obtained with yields of 90-95% theoretical based on the benzaldehyde added.
In the review the advantages and disadvantages of the various strategies for the microbial and enzymatic production of L-PAC are compared.
In view of the increasing interest in microbial biotransformations, L-PAC production provides an interesting example of enhancement through on-line control of a process involving both toxic substrate (benzaldehyde) and end-product (L-PAC, benzyl alcohol) inhibition.
Romano I, Tsourounis C. Saw palmetto (Serenoa repens) for the treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia.
Calif J Health Syst Pharm 1998 May-Jun;10:16-7, 33.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the pharmacology, pharmacokinetics, clinical studies, and adverse effects of Serenoa repens (Saw palmetto) for the treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia is presented.
Saller R, Reichling J, Kristof O. [Phytotherapy--treatment without side effects?].
Dtsch Med Wochenschr 1998;123(3):58-62.
(Ger)
Schneck C. St. John's wort and hypomania [letter].
J Clin Psychiatry 1998;59(12):689.
Seifert P. Herbal extracts in cosmetics--opportunities and limitations.Seifen Oele Fette Wachse 1997 Jan;123:28, 30-1.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Various limitations associated with the opportunities for the fashionable use of herbal extracts in cosmetics are briefly discussed, including differences in the criteria for herbal extracts used in cosmetic and medicinal applications, the criteria for natural cosmetics, utility of the drug extract ratio as a measure of the quality or activity of plant extracts, and standardization of plant extracts.
Shaw D. Risks or remedies? Safety aspects of herbal remedies in the UK. J R Soc Med 1998;91(6):294-6.
Shaw D, Leon C, Murray V, Volans G. Patients' use of complementary medicine [letter].
Lancet 1998;352(9125):408.
Shepard GH Jr.
Psychoactive plants and ethnopsychiatric medicines of the Matsigenka.
J Psychoactive Drugs 1998;30(4):321-32.
For the Matsigenka of the Peruvian Amazon, health and well-being in daily life depend upon harmonious relationships within the social group and with the spirit world.
Psychoactive plants play a crucial role in curing disrupted social relationships while giving humans access to the otherwise remote, parallel world of spirits.
Different species and cultivars of psychoactive plants, as well as varying admixtures and doses, are used to obtain different intensities and qualities of psychoactive experience, depending upon the individual's goals.
Strongly psychoactive plants are used by shamans to travel to the realm of spirits.
A number of mild to strongly psychoactive plants are used by male hunters to purify their souls and improve their aim.
Mildly psychoactive plants are used to improve women's concentration for spinning and weaving cotton, to control negative emotions such as grief and anger, to manipulate the content of dreams, and to pacify sick or frightened children.
A majority of such remedies come from the botanical families of Rubiaceae, Solanaceae and Cyperaceae, known sources of psychoactive compounds.
Interdisciplinary research into the culture, botany and pharmacology of psychoactive plants in indigenous medical systems contributes to a better understanding of the role of psychological states in human health and well-being.
Shinchi K, Ishii H, Imanishi K, Kono S. Relationship of cigarette smoking, alcohol use, and dietary habits with Helicobacter pylori infection in Japanese men.
Scand J Gastroenterol 1997;32(7):651-5.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Background: Little is known of factors determining infection with Helicobacter pylori.
Methods: In a cross-sectional study of 566 men aged 50-55 years, who received a preretirement health examination at the Self Defense Forces Fukuoka Hospital between January 1993 and December 1994, we examined the association of smoking, alcohol use, and dietary habits with H. pylori infection.
Results: The overall seropositivity as determined with IgG antibody was 79.3% (449 of 566).
The rank was inversely associated with the infection (trend, P = 0.048).
Neither smoking nor alcohol drinking was related to the infection.
The prevalence adjusted for rank tended to be lower in men consuming raw vegetables (trend, P = 0.12) daily than those with less consumption.
Unexpectedly, the consumption of tofu (soybean curd) was significantly, negatively related to the infection (trend, P = 0.013).
The seropositivity was unrelated to the consumption of pickled vegetables, soy paste soup, green tea, or garlic.
Conclusion: The findings suggest that fresh vegetables may be protective against H. pylori infection.
The study does not support either an increased risk of the infection associated with salty foods or a protective effect of green tea or garlic.
Square D. Sage advice from my garden.
CMAJ 1998;159(12):1495-7.
Stueland DT, Ault BJ, Gunderson PD. Change in cholinesterase levels and self-reported symptoms over two years.
J Agromed 1997; 4(1/2):151-6.
The application and reliability of self reported symptoms and serum cholinesterase (ACH) levels as measures of effects of farm chemical exposures over time were analyzed.
Twenty two ginseng producers in central Wisconsin participated in 2 years of on site testing.
Each year they reported on farming practices and health seeking behavior and completed a 20 item questionnaire related to possible farm chemical exposure symptoms.
Plasma and red cell ACH were also measured.
No seizure symptoms were reported.
The mean age of participants was 41.5 years.
Thirteen of the participants were men and 21 were owner operators.
The mean initial plasma ACH levels changed from 16.15 units/milliliter (U/ml) in 1994 to 16.25U/ml in 1995.
Red blood cell ACH levels were 37.95U/ml in 1994 and 42.32U/ml in 1995 at the start of the season.
In 1994 the follow up study showed an increase to 39.55U/ml, but a decrease in 1995 to 38.80U/ml.
Changes in symptoms from 1994 to 1995 correlated with the change in initial plasma ACH levels over the same year.
Each year the participants experienced a drop in ACH activity.
Self reported symptoms remained highly correlated and showed, overall, only minor changes, suggesting that symptoms and ACH testing may be reliable for on site field testing.
Sukumaran M, Chung H, Gollapudi DP. Cultural factors in the treatment of a catatonic Chinese patient [letter].
Gen Hosp Psychiatry 1997;19(5):378-80.
Tello CG, Ford P, Iacopino AM.
In vitro evaluation of complex carbohydrate denture adhesive formulations.
Quintessence Int 1998;29(9):585-93.
OBJECTIVE: Acemannan, a complex mannose carbohydrate derived from the aloe vera plant, has an inherent stickiness/viscosity.
Prototype Acemannan denture adhesive formulations were evaluated for pH changes, cytotoxicity to human gingival fibroblasts and adhesive strength in both dry and wet conditions.
METHOD AND MATERIALS: The denture adhesive formulations consisted of five combinations of Acemannan with varying concentrations of preservatives and two other formulations without preservatives.
The pH of each formulation was measured over 24 hours.
Assessment of cytotoxicity was accomplished using the in vitro, tetrazolium-based colorimetric assay on cultures of human gingival fibroblasts after exposure to the adhesive formulations for up to 24 hours.
The adhesive strength was evaluated with a universal testing machine under initial dry conditions and after immersion in a constant-temperature water bath for up to 20 minutes.
RESULTS: Formulations 1 and 2 achieved and maintained pH values above 6.0 (the critical pH for hydroxyapatite dissolution) approximately 6 hours into the study.
None of the prototypes demonstrated an initial pH above the critical pH.
Formulations 1, 2, 3, and 5 exhibited significant cytotoxicity to human gingival fibroblasts over 24 hours.
Formulations 4, 20:1, and 150:1 demonstrated minimal cytotoxicity.
Formulation 1 exhibited the poorest adhesive strength, while the most viscous formulation (prototype 150:1) was by far the best performer.
Generally, adhesive bond strengths for all prototypes were quite high and relatively stable over time in a wet environment.
CONCLUSION: To achieve the ideal adhesive in terms of strength, pH, and cytotoxicity, Acemannan formulation 150:1 should be adjusted to contain the preservative concentration of formulation 4 and have an initial pH value of 6.0 or higher.
Thompson CA.
As patients embrace herbal remedies, dearth of scientific evidence frustrates clinicians.
Am J Health Syst Pharm 1997 Dec 1;54:2656, 2658, 2664.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Sources of information regarding the efficacy and side effects of herbal remedies for physicians and pharmacists are described, clinical studies evaluating the efficacy of some herbal products are summarized, and differences between formulations of herbal products that may affect the efficacy of the product are discussed.
Thompson CA. USP moves forward in providing information on botanical products [news].
Am J Health Syst Pharm 1998;55(6):527, 530.
Thornton Z.
Health care the herbal way.
East Pharm 1997 Aug;40:71-2.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A brief overview of the therapeutic use of herbal medicines is presented, and adverse reactions, self-medication, and the quality control of herbal products are considered.
Turow V. Herbal therapy for children [letter].
Pediatrics 1998;102(6):1492-3.
Van Rensen I, Blume H, Ihrig M, Morck H, Dingermann T, Veit M. [Evaluation of phytopharmaceuticals in pharmacy practice].
Pharm Ztg 1998 Feb 19;143:11-8, 21.
(Ger) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of phytopharmaceuticals, including nomination and standardization of pharmaceutical quality, efficacy, clinical research, therapy study types and designs, safety critiques, terms of registration, and advertisements, is presented; it was noted that patients need the expertise of the counseling pharmacist in regard to herbal medication.
Vann A.
The herbal medicine boom: understanding what patients are taking [see comments].
Cleve Clin J Med 1998;65(3):129-34.
Varga CA, Veale DJ. Isihlambezo: utilization patterns and potential health effects of pregnancy-related traditional herbal medicine.
Soc Sci Med 1997;44(7):911-24.
Isihlambezo is a herbal decoction used by many Zulu women in South Africa as a preventative health tonic during pregnancy.
Though the practice is cited by ethnographers and medical practitioners, few studies have focused on specific elements of isihlambezo use and preparation.
Moreover, though some evidence exists suggesting negative effects of its ingestion, the maternal-fetal health impact and toxicity of isihlambezo have not been adequately studied.
We examined two aspects of this traditional antenatal health practice: (1) the potential impact of urbanization and access to Western clinic-based care on popularity and utilization patterns of isihlambezo, and (2) the potential maternal-fetal health effects of its use.
Interviews were conducted among rural and urban women in clinic and non-clinic settings regarding socio-behavioral aspects of isihlambezo use.
The pharmacology of certain plant ingredients of isihlambezo was investigated through laboratory assays, literature review, and interviews with traditional healers.
There were significant differences by area of interview in nearly all aspects of isihlambezo use examined.
Though isihlambezo was most popular among urbanites and clinic non-attenders, it was considered an important antenatal health care alternative by the majority of women surveyed.
Mixing traditional and clinic-based antenatal care was also strongly advocated.
Pharmacological analysis suggested the possibility of both therapeutic and harmful consequences of isihlambezo.
It was suggested that the following factors might contribute the popularity of isihlambezo among urban women: high cost and inferior quality of clinic care, use of isihlambezo as a means of adapting to urbanization-related stress, and socio-cultural transition.
Vazquez FM, Suarez MA, Perez A. Medicinal plants used in the Barros Area, Badajoz Province, Spain.
J Ethnopharmacol 1997;55(2):81-5.
A study of the wild and cultivated medicinal plants used in the Barros Area (southern Spain) is reported, 48 plants distributed among 20 different families are used in the treatment of various human diseases.
The use of Bellis annua L. Centaurea ornata Wild., Leuzea conifera (L.) DC., Pulicaria paludosa Link and Asparagus aphyllus L. is reported.
Williamson JS, Wyandt CM. Herbal therapies: facts and the fiction.
Drug Top 1997 Aug 4;141:78-87.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of herbal therapies is presented, including the history of disease treatment with herbal remedies, counseling patients about the appropriate use of herbal products, and the risks and benefits of common herbal remedies such as Medicago sativa (alfalfa), Aloe vera (aloe vera), Arnica montana (arnica), Vaccinium myrtillus (bilberry), Uncaria tomentosa (cat's claw), Angelica sinensis (dong quai), Echinacea purpurea (echinacea), Ephedra sinica (ephedra), Chrysanthemum parthenium (feverfew), Allium sativum (garlic), Ginkgo biloba (ginko biloba), Panax ginseng (ginseng), hypericum perforatum (St. John's wort), and Serenoa repens (saw palmetto).
A table of the purported properties and uses of 153 herbs is provided.
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
Williamson JS, Wyandt CM. Herbal update.
Drug Top 1998 Jun 1;142:66-75.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The rational use and contraindications of herbal therapy, patient information, drug interactions, and the legal status of herbal preparations are presented including popular American and European herbs such as Aloe vera, Arnica montana, Vaccinium myrtillus (bilberry), Uncaria tomentosa (cat's claw), Angelica sinensis (Dong quai), Echinacea purpurea, evening primrose oil, Tanacetum parthenium (feverfew), Allium sativum, Zingiber officinale (ginger), Ginkgo biloba, Panax ginseng, Crataegus species (hawthorn), Aesculus hippocastanum, Piper methysticum (kava-kava), Silybum marianum, Hypericum perforatum (St. John's wort), Serenoa species (Saw palmetto), and Valeriana officinalis (Valerian).
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
Williamson JS, Wyandt CM.
What the pharmacist should know about food and drug interactions.
Hosp Pharm Rep 1998 Apr;12:43-52.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of the effects of food, tobacco, ethyl alcohol, and herbal products on drug action is presented, including a discussion of the mechanisms of drug-food interactions, counseling patients about when it is appropriate to take a drug with food and when it is contraindicated, counseling patients about the effects of alcohol and tobacco use on drug action, and potentially significant food-drug interactions involving nutritional agents, hormonal agents, respiratory agents, diuretics/cardiovascular agents, anti-infective agents, GI agents, CNS agents, antineoplastic agents, immunosuppressive agents, and dietary supplements.
This article qualifies for 2 hours U.S. CE credit by the ACPE.
Winkelaar PG.
Medicolegal file.
Tacit approval of alternative therapy.
Can Fam Physician 1999;45:905.
Winston D, Dattner AM.
The American system of medicine.
Clin Dermatol 1999;17(1):53-6.
Wong HC.
Is feverfew a pharmacologic agent? [letter].
CMAJ 1999;160(1):21-2.
Wright R, Vanvuren B. Ginkgo biloba.
Nebr Mortar Pestle 1997 Jun;60:10-1.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of Ginkgo biloba, from a tree native to China and an herbal remedy used for 5000 yr, is presented, including its mechanism of action, therapeutic use in conditions associated with decreased peripheral and cerebral vascularity such as cerebral ischemia, its pharmacodynamics, dosage, adverse effects, and potential drug interactions.
It is noted that in Germany and France, Ginkgo biloba is among the most commonly prescribed drugs, while in the United States it is available as an OTC natural product.
Wynn RL, Meiller TF.
A brief survey of herbal medicines and other remedies.
Gen Dent 1997;45(2):112-5.
Xue T, Zhang L. Avenues of discovery in bioprospecting [letter; comment].
Nature 1998;393(6686):617.
Zhang YY, Don HY, Guo YZ, Ageta H, Harigaya Y, Onda M, Hashimoto K, Ikeya Y, Okada M, Maruno M. Comparative study of Scutellaria planipes and Scutellaria baicalensis.
Biomed Chromatogr 1998;12(1):31-3.
Scutellaria planipes, a species of Scutellaria, was explored by comparing to Scutellaria baicalensis, a pharmacopoeia species.
Four principle flavonoids in both the plant roots were analyzed by using a reversed-phase chromatographic system with a chemically bonded ODS silica gel column and phosphate buffer:methanol (68:32 and 1:1) as mobile phase.
Their contents were similar in both plant roots.
Antiallergic and antibacterial activities in vitro and acute toxicity were compared.
The results provided valuable data for S. planipes as a potential medicinal resource.
Zink T, Chaffin J. Herbal 'health' products: what family physicians need to know [see comments].
Am Fam Physician 1998;58(5):1133-40.
Patients who self-medicate with herbs for preventive and therapeutic purposes may assume that these products are safe because they are "natural," but some products cause adverse effects or have the potential to interact with prescription medications.
The United States lacks a regulatory system for herbal products.
Although only limited research on herbs has been published, St John's wort shows promise as a treatment for depression.
Ginkgo biloba extract is possibly effective for cerebrovascular insufficiency and dementia.
Feverfew is used extensively in Canada for migraine prophylaxis but needs more rigorous study.
Ephedrine has been regulated by many states because its misuse has been associated with several deaths.
Echinacea is being tried as an agent for immune stimulation, and garlic is under study for cholesterol-lowering properties, but both require more study.
Physicians should educate themselves and their patients about the efficacy and adverse interactions of herbal agents and the limitations of our present knowledge of them.
Adverse Effects
.
Phytotherapy: how to minimize risks.
Presc Intl 1997;6(27):25-6.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Various ways to minimize risks associated with herbal remedy therapies are described, including an overview of adverse effects associated with various herbal remedies, the need for health professionals to be aware of unreliable labels on plant based products as well as contamination potential, and the levels of regulatory control that exist on herbal remedies in France.
.
Pulmonary embolism with a plant based product.
Presc Intl 1997;6(31):144.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The removal of a plant based formulation from the market in France following its implication in a case of deep vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism in an infant, and the importance of removing herbal products with no guarantees of efficacy and safety from pharmacy shelves are briefly discussed.
Abdel-Hafez AA, Meselhy MR, Nakamura N, Hattori M, Watanabe H, Murakami Y, El-Gendy MA, Mahfouz NM, Mohamed TA. Effects of paeoniflorin derivatives on scopolamine-induced amnesia using a passive avoidance task in mice; structure-activity relationship.
Biol Pharm Bull 1998;21(11):1174-9.
Paeoniflorin (1) and its derivatives having in common a cage-like pinane skeleton with hemiketal-acetal system, were evaluated for their effects on memory impairment induced by scopolamine in mice using a step-down type passive avoidance task.
In the test session, 1 and its derivatives were intraperitoneally (i.p.) administered at doses of 0.002, 0.01, 0.02 and 0.2 mmol/kg, and 30 min later (15 min before the experiment), scopolamine (1 mg/kg, i.p.) was given.
These compounds showed dose-dependent attenuation in a dose range of 0.002-0.02 mmol/kg and also enhancement of scopolamine-induced decrease in step-down latency.
The effects of these compounds, except that of 2',3',4',5'-O-tetraacetyl-3-O-methylpaeoniflorin (8), followed a bell-shaped dose response profile.
8-Debenzoyl-6-deglucosyl-3-O-methylpaeoniflorin (6) showed no significant increase in the step-down latency at all tested doses.
Maximum step-down latency was obtained by 3-O-methylpaeoniflorin (3) and 2',3,3',4',5'-penta-O-methylpaeoniflorin (7) (the minimal effective dose was 0.002 mmol/kg).
Relative to 3, debenzoylation, as in 8-debenzoyl-3-O-methylpaeoniflorin (4), slightly increased the latency, while deglucosylation, as in 6-deglucosyl-3-O-methylpaeoniflorin (5), significantly reduced the prolongation of latency.
Removal of both glucose and benzoyl moieties resulted in the loss of activity as seen in 6.
These results revealed that, in addition to the cage-like pinane skeleton, the benzoyl and the glucosyl moieties are important structural elements of the paeoniflorin skeleton as its effects on scopolamine-induced amnesia.
Al-Fakhri SA.
Herbal medicine: possible cause of aspiration pneumonia: case report.
Saudi Pharm J 1998;6(1):88-91.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The case report of a 3-wk-old girl who developed aspiration pneumonia possibly due to aspiration of an herbal medicine in powder form consisting of Commiphora molmol (myrrh), Ferula foetida L. (apiacea), Astragalus sarcocolla, and Saccharum officinarum Linne. is presented.
The child was successfully treated with nebulized albuterol (salbutamol) and budesonide and oral prednisolone.
Al-Suwaidan SN, Gad El Rab MO, Al-Fakhiry S, Al Hoqail IA, Al-Maziad A, Sherif AB.
Allergic contact dermatitis from myrrh, a topical herbal medicine used to promote healing.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;39(3):137.
Aldana L, Gonzalez De Mejia E, Craigmill A, Tsutsumi V, Armendariz-Borunda J, Panduro A, Rincon AR. Cypermethrin increases apo A-1 and apo B mRNA but not hyperlipidemia in rats.
Toxicol Lett 1998;95(1):31-9.
The hepatotoxic effect of cypermethrin and the expression of hepatic genes at the mRNA level, as molecular markers of liver damage, were evaluated in rats following exposure to cypermethrin.
The expression of hepatic genes was compared with conventional liver functional tests, and correlations were made by studying the liver at the ultrastructural level.
Cypermethrin treated rats presented a significant decrease, of 79% and 22%, on the expression of albumin and apo E genes at 5 days, respectively.
The levels of apo A-1 and apo B mRNA were increased up to four- and fivefold, respectively.
This increase did not correlate with the serum values of HDL and VLDL lipoprotein particles.
Intracytoplasmic lipid droplets were observed after the first 2 days following cypermethrin administration, suggesting that apo A-1 and B mRNA were translated but not secreted.
There were significant correlations between the low values of the albumin gene expression, the decrease in the HDL concentrations, and the ultrastructural alterations, respectively.
These alterations were mainly a large amount and increased size of mitochondria in the animals exposed to cypermethrin.
It is concluded that under the experimental conditions used, cypermethrin may alter the metabolism of lipids and proteins in rat liver.
Alexander RG, Wilson DA, Davidson AG.
Medicines Control Agency investigation of the microbial quality of herbal products.
Pharm J 1997 Aug 16;259:259-61.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP To assess the microbiological quality of licensed herbal products by determining the nature and quantity of microorganisms present, 425 herbal products were examined by pharmacopeial and validated inhouse methods; total aerobic bacterial counts and total fungal counts were measured.
Most licensed herbal products were found to comply with European Pharmacopeial limits.
However, some solid oral dosage forms were found to contain undesirable organisms.
It was suggested that additional quantitative tests for specific microorganisms in future editions of the European Pharmacopeia may be justified.
Alpertunga B, Omurtag GZ, Ozmentese N. Investigation about the genotoxic activities of some herbal teas used as folk medicine.
Acta Pharm Turc 1997;39(3):105-10.
Ameri A.
The effects of Aconitum alkaloids on the central nervous system.
Prog Neurobiol 1998;56(2):211-35.
Preparations of Aconitum roots are employed in Chinese and Japanese medicine for analgesic, antirheumatic and neurological indications.
The recent surge in use of phytomedicine derived from traditional Chinese medicine as well as increasing concerns about possible toxic effects of these compounds have inspired a great deal of research into the mechanisms by which certain Aconitum alkaloids may act on the central nervous system.
The pharmacological effects of preparations of Aconitum roots are attributed to several diterpenoid alkaloids.
The main alkaloid of these plants is aconitine, a highly toxic diterpenoid alkaloid which is known to suppress the inactivation of voltage-dependent Na+ channels by binding to neurotoxin binding site 2 of the alpha-subunit of the channel protein.
In this article the pharmacology of several structurally related Aconitum alkaloids is highlighted and their therapeutic vs toxic potential is discussed.
Neurochemical and neurophysiological studies will be reviewed with emphasis on the effects of the alkaloids in regions of the brain that have been implicated in pain transmission and generation of epileptic activity.
Considering the chemical structure of the Aconitum alkaloids as well as their mechanism of action, a subdivision in three groups becomes obvious: the first group comprises such alkaloids which possess high toxicity due to two ester boundings at the diterpene skeleton.
The members of this group activate voltage-dependent sodium channels already at resting potential and inhibit noradrenaline reuptake.
Activation of sodium channels and in consequence excessive depolarization with final inexcitability and suppression of pain transmission account for their antinociceptive properties.
The second group comprises less toxic monoesters which have been shown to possess strong antinociceptive, antiarrhythmic and antiepileptiform properties due to a blockade of the voltage-dependent sodium channel.
Electrophysiological studies have revealed a use-dependent inhibition of neuronal activity by these alkaloids.
They seem to be competitive antagonists of the group I-alkaloids.
The third group of Aconitum alkaloids are lacking an ester side chain in the molecule.
Toxicity is markedly reduced when compared with the two other groups.
They fail to affect neuronal activity, but are reported to have antiarrhythmic actions suggesting that they may have different affinities to various subtypes of the alpha-subunit of the Na+ channel in brain and heart.
Angell M, Kassirer JP.
Alternative medicine--risks of untested and unregulated remedies.
N Engl J Med 1998 Sep 17;339:839-41.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The risks of untested and unregulated herbal medicine, the most common of all forms of alternative medicine, are discussed.
Anibarro B, Fontela JL, De La Hoz F. Occupational asthma induced by garlic dust.
J Allergy Clin Immunol 1997;100(6 Pt 1):734-8.
BACKGROUND: Garlic dust has not been a frequently encountered cause of IgE-mediated disease.
OBJECTIVE: We report on 12 patients (all of them garlic workers) with the clinical criteria for occupational asthma.
METHODS: Skin prick tests and serum-specific IgE determinations were performed with common inhalants, garlic, and other members of the Liliaceae family (onion, leek, and asparagus).
Bronchial challenge test with garlic powder was performed in all patients.
Garlic and onion extract proteins were separated by sodium dodecylsulfate-polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
Immunoblot and IgE immunoblot inhibition analyses were performed with patients' sera on extracts of garlic, onion, and pollens of Phleum pratense and Chenopodium album.
RESULTS: Garlic sensitization was demonstrated by bronchial challenge test in seven patients (group 1) and ruled out in the remaining five (group 2).
Clinical data were similar in both groups.
The patients with garlic allergy had a mean age of 27 years, and all of them had pollen allergy; sensitization to other members of the Liliaceae family was also common.
Electrophoresis of garlic extract revealed two major protein bands at approximately 12 and 54 kd.
During IgE immunoblotting, the pool of sera reacted with garlic proteins mainly at 54 kd. Preincubation with onion, Phleum, and Chenopodium partially abolished the IgE binding to several allergens of garlic.
CONCLUSION: We report on seven patients in whom an occupational garlic allergy was demonstrated.
Garlic allergy is relatively rare but seems to affect young subjects with pollen allergy, and sensitization to other members of the Liliaceae family is common.
The results of this study confirm the presence of some structurally similar allergens in garlic, onion, and certain pollens.
Aphale AA, Chhibba AD, Kumbhakarna NR, Mateenuddin M, Dahat SH. Subacute toxicity study of the combination of ginseng (Panax ginseng) and ashwagandha (Withania somnifera) in rats: a safety assessment.
Indian J Physiol Pharmacol 1998;42(2):299-302.
Ginseng (Panax ginseng) and Ashwagandha (Withania somnifera) are widely used as geriatric tonics.
Both individually have not shown any toxicity on long term administration.
Study was planned to assess the safety of the combination by doing subacute toxicity study in rats with 90 days oral administration using three doses.
Food consumption, body weight, haematological, biochemical and histopathological parameters were studied.
There was significant increase in body weight, food consumption and liver weight, and improved hematopoiesis was observed.
Brain, heart, lung, liver, spleen, kidneys, stomach, testis and ovaries were normal on gross examination and histopathologically.
Subacute toxicity studies in rats did not reveal any toxicity.
Apted J. Primin sensitivity in a patient sensitive to Streptocarpus [letter].
Australas J Dermatol 1998;39(3):199-200.
Asero R. Relevance of pollen-specific IgE levels to the development of Apiaceae hypersensitivity in patients with birch pollen allergy.
Allergy 1997;52(5):560-4.
A large clinical/serologic study was carried out to determine the prevalence of Apiaceae (carrot, celery, and fennel) hypersensitivity in patients with birch pollen allergy, and to investigate its relationship with apple and hazelnut allergy and with birch pollen-specific IgE levels.
A total of 196 birch pollen-hypersensitive patients with oral allergy syndrome (OAS) caused by different vegetable foods were examined in the cross-sectional part of the study.
Of this total, 195 patients had apple and/or hazelnut allergy, and 103 had Apiaceae sensitivity; only one patient had Apiaceae allergy alone.
Apiaceae-positive patients showed significantly higher birch pollen-specific IgE levels than negative ones (median 13 vs 7 AU/ml; P 
The prospective part of the study was performed on 103 birch pollen-hypersensitive patients who were OAS-free at the time of the first visit and were periodically followed-up for OAS.
Patients who developed Apiaceae sensitivity showed much higher birch-specific IgE levels than patients who developed apple/hazelnut allergy only (median 15.5 vs 8.5 AU/ml; P 
This study suggests that most Apiaceae determinants cross-react with apple or hazelnut determinants, whereas only some apple or hazelnut determinants cross-react with Apiaceae-allergenic determinants; moreover, it shows that birch-specific IgE levels heavily influence the onset of OAS as a whole, and probably play a critical role in the development of allergies to distinct vegetable foods as well.
Asero R, Mistrello G, Roncarolo D, Antoniotti PL, Falagiani P.
A case of garlic allergy.
J Allergol Clin Immunol 1998;101(3):427-28.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM CASE STUDY ALLIUM-SATIVUM HUMAN ADULT FEMALE GARLIC ALLERGY ALLERGY URTICARIA DERMATOLOGY IMMUNE SYSTEM DISEASE INTEGUMENTARY SYSTEM DISEASE.
Avila H, Rivero J, Herrera F, Fraile G. Cytotoxicity of a low molecular weight fraction from Aloe vera (Aloe barbadensis Miller) gel. Toxicon 1997;35(9):1423-30.
The cytotoxicity of a low mol. wt fraction (LMWF) obtained from Aloe vera gel was determined by two different assays.
Firstly, exposure of monolayers of chicken fibroblasts to LMWF induced disruption of intercellular junctions and detachment of individual cells from the bottom of the flask, with formation of cell-free gaps in the monolayer.
Secondly, LMWF inhibited the production of reactive oxygen species by human polymorphonuclear leukocytes stimulated by zymosan, as followed by luminol-dependent chemiluminescence.
The toxic activity of LMWF was compared to that of sodium dodecyl sulfate (a well-known toxic substance), aloe-emodin and aloin (an anthraquinone and its precursor present in Aloe vera cortex) using the chemilumescence assay, and was found to be of similar potency to these toxic substances on a weight-to-weight basis.
These results confirm that Aloe vera gel contains toxic low mol. wt compounds, and every effort must be made to limit the amount of these toxins in the commercially prepared Aloe vera gel products.
Bagheri H, Broue P, Lacroix I, Larrey D, Olives JP, Vaysse P, Ghisolfi J, Montastruc JL. Fulminant hepatic failure after herbal medicine ingestion in children [letter].
Therapie 1998;53(1):82-3.
Barnes J, Mills SY, Abbot NC, Willoughby M, Ernst E. Different standards for reporting ADRs to herbal remedies and conventional OTC medicines: face-to-face interviews with 515 users of herbal remedies.
Br J Clin Pharmacol 1998;45(5):496-500.
AIMS: To determine whether adverse drug reactions (ADRs) to herbal remedies would be reported differently from similar ADRs to conventional over-the-counter (OTC) medicines by herbal-remedy users.
METHODS: Face-to-face interviews (using a structured questionnaire) with 515 users of herbal remedies were conducted in six pharmacy stores and six healthfood stores in the UK.
The questionnaire focused on the likely course of action taken by herbal-remedy users after experiencing an ADR associated with a conventional OTC medicine and a herbal remedy.
RESULTS: Following a 'serious' suspected ADR, 156 respondents (30.3%) would consult their GP irrespective of whether the ADR was associated with the use of a herbal remedy or a conventional OTC medicine, whereas 221 respondents (42.9%) would not consult their GP for a serious ADR associated with either type of preparation.
One hundred and thirty-four respondents (26.0%) would consult their GP for a serious ADR to a conventional OTC medicine, but not for a similar ADR to a herbal remedy, whereas four respondents (0.8%) would consult their GP for a serious ADR to a herbal remedy, but not for a similar ADR to a conventional OTC medicine.
Similar differences were found in attitudes towards reporting 'minor' suspected ADRs.
CONCLUSIONS: Consumers of herbal remedies would act differently with regard to reporting an ADR (serious or minor) to their GP depending on whether it was associated with a herbal remedy or a conventional OTC medicine.
This has implications for herbal pharmacovigilance, particularly given the increasing use of OTC herbal remedies.
The finding that a high proportion of respondents would not consult their GP or pharmacist following ADRs to conventional OTC medicines is also of concern.
Bateman J, Chapman RD, Simpson D. Possible toxicity of herbal remedies.
Scott Med J 1998;43(1):7-15.
Herbal remedies are rapidly gaining popularity throughout the world as a result of dissatisfaction with conventional medicines.
It is a widely held belief that herbal preparations are "natural" and are therefore intrinsically harmless.
However, their effects can be very powerful and potentially lethal if used incorrectly and their use as a substitute for conventional medicines may be ineffective.
Toxic effects have been attributed to several factors including hepatotoxicity of main constituents, contamination of preparations by heavy metals or microorganisms, and adverse reactions due to age, and genetic and concomitant disease characteristics of the user.
Bernd A, Simon S, Ramirez Bosca A, Kippenberger S, Diaz Alperi J, Miquel J, Villalba Garcia JF, Pamies Mira D, Kaufmann R. Phototoxic effects of Hypericum extract in cultures of human keratinocytes compared with those of psoralen.
Photochem Photobiol 1999;69(2):218-21.
Extracts of Hypericum perforatum (St. John's wort) are used in the treatment of depression.
They contain the plant pigment hypericin and hypericin derivates.
These compounds have light-dependent activities.
In order to estimate the potential risk of phototoxic skin damage during antidepressive therapy, we investigated the phototoxic activity of hypericin extract using cultures of human keratinocytes and compared it with the effect of the well-known phototoxic agent psoralen.
The absorbance spectrum of our Hypericum extract revealed maxima in the whole UV range and in parts of the visible range.
We cultivated human keratinocytes in the presence of different Hypericum concentrations and irradiated the cells with 150 mJ/cm2 UVB, 1 J/cm2 UVA or 3 h with a white light of photon flux density 2.6 mumol m-2 s-1.
The determination of the bromodeoxyuridine incorporation rate showed a concentration- and light-dependent decrease in DNA synthesis with high hypericin concentrations (
In the case of UVB irradiation a clear phototoxic cell reaction was not detected.
We found phototoxic effects even with 10 ng/mL psoralen using UVA with the same study design as in the case of the Hypericum extract.
These results confirm the phototoxic activity of Hypericum extract on human keratinocytes.
However, the blood levels that are to be expected during antidepressive therapy are presumably too low to induce phototoxic skin reactions.
Betz JM, Andrzejewski D, Troy A, Casey RE, Obermeyer WR, Page SW, Woldemariam TZ. Gas chromatographic determination of toxic quinolizidine alkaloids in blue cohosh Caulophyllum thalictroides (L.) Michx.
Phytochemical Analysis 1998;9(5):232-6.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Blue cohosh (Caulophyllum thalictroides (L.) Michx., Berberidaceae) is a North American perennial herb which is found as an ingredient in dietary supplement products in the United States.
The plant contains the alkaloids N-methylcytisine, baptifoline, anagyrine and magnoflorine.
Some of the alkaloids, including the quinolizidine alkaloid anagyrine, are toxic to range animals and have been implicated as teratogens in higher animals.
Since the traditional use of the herb involves administration to women of reproductive age to treat menstrual cramps, and to pregnant women la the last 3-4 weeks of pregnancy to ease parturition, therefore the safety of these products to the fetus is of concern.
Three of these alkaloids have been determined in authentic blue cohosh and several dietary supplements.
Levels found were: 5-850 ppm for N-methylcytisine, 2-390 ppm for anagyrine, and 9-900 ppm for baptifoline.
The lower alkaloid concentrations were found in products containing liquid extracts.
Alkaloid identities were confirmed by mass spectrometry.
Bieler CA, Stiborova M, Wiessler M, Cosyns JP, Van Ypersele De Strihou C, Schmeiser HH. 32P-post-labelling analysis of DNA adducts formed by aristolochic acid in tissues from patients with Chinese herbs nephropathy.
Carcinogenesis 1997;18(5):1063-7.
Recently, we reported that aristolochic acid (AA) a naturally occurring nephrotoxin and carcinogen is implicated in a unique type of renal fibrosis, designated Chinese herbs nephropathy (CHN).
Indeed, we identified the principal aristolochic acid-DNA adduct in the kidney of five such patients.
We now extend these observations and demonstrate the presence of additional AA-DNA adducts by the 32P-post-labelling method not only in the kidneys, but also in a ureter obtained after renal transplantation.
Using the nuclease P1 version of the assay not only the major DNA adduct of aristolochic acid, 7-(deoxyadenosin-N6-yl)-aristolactam I (dA-AAI), but also the minor adducts, 7-(deoxyguanosin-N2-yl)-aristolactam I (dG-AAI) and 7-(deoxyadenosin-N6-yl)-aristolactam II (dA-AAII) were detected, and identified by cochromatographic analyses with TLC and HPLC.
Quantitative analyses of six kidneys revealed relative adduct levels from 0.7 to 5.3/10(7) for dA-AAI, from 0.02 to 0.12/10(7) for dG-AAI and 0.06 to 0.24/ 10(7) nucleotides for dA-AAII.
The detection of the dA-AAII adduct is consistent with the occurrence of aristolochic acid II (AAII) in the herb powder imported under the name of Stephania tetrandra and confirms that the patients had indeed ingested the natural mixture of AAI and AAII. 32P-post-labelling analyses of further biopsy samples of one patient showed the known adduct pattern of AA exposure not only in the kidney, but also in the ureter, whereas in skin and muscle tissue no adduct spots were detectable.
In an attempt to explain the higher level of the dA-AAI adduct compared to the dG-AAI adduct level in renal tissue even 44 months after the end of regimen, the persistence of these two purine adducts was investigated in the kidney of rats given a single oral dose of pure AAI.
In contrast to the dG-AAI adduct, the dA-AAI adduct exhibited a lifelong persistence in the kidney of rats.
Our data demonstrate that AA forms DNA adducts in human tissue by the same activation mechanism(s) reported from animal studies.
Thus, the carcinogenic/mutagenic activity of AA observed in animals could also be responsible for the urothelial cancers observed in two of the CHN patients.
Blanc PD, Kuschner WG, Katz PP, Smith S, Yelin EH. Use of herbal products, coffee or black tea, and over-the-counter medications as self-treatments among adults with asthma.
J Allergy Clin Immunol 1997;100(6 Pt 1):789-91.
BACKGROUND: There are few data on the use of alternative therapies in adult asthma and their impact on health outcomes.
OBJECTIVE: The objective of this study was to study the prevalence and morbidity of asthma self-treatment with herbs, coffee or black tea, and over-the-counter (OTC) medications containing ephedrine or epinephrine.
METHODS: We carried out a cross-sectional analysis of interview data for 601 adults with asthma recruited from a random sample of pulmonary and allergy specialists.
We estimated the 12-month prevalence of reported use of herbal products, coffee or black tea, or OTC products to self-treat asthma and their association with emergency department visits and hospitalization.
RESULTS: Herbal asthma self-treatment was reported by 46 (8%; 95% confidence interval [CI] 6% to 10%); coffee or black tea self-treatment by 36 (6%; 95% CI 4% to 8%), epinephrine or ephedrine OTC use by 36 (6%; 95% CI 4% to 8%), and any of the three practices by 98 subjects (16%; 95% CI 13% to 19%).
Adjusting for demographic and illness covariates, herbal use (odds ratio [OR] 2.5; 95% CI 1.1 to 5.6) and coffee or black tea use (OR 3.1; 95% CI 1.2 to 7.8) were associated with asthma hospitalization; OTC use was not (OR 0.8; 95% CI 0.3 to 2.5).
CONCLUSIONS: Even among adults with access to specialty care for asthma, self-treatment with nonprescription products was common and was associated with increased risk of reported hospitalization.
This association does not appear to be accounted for by illness severity or other disease covariates.
It may reflect delay in utilization of more efficacious treatments.
Borins M.
The dangers of using herbs.
What your patients need to know.
Postgrad Med 1998;104(1):91-5, 99-100.
Herbal remedies are becoming increasingly popular among patients as treatment for such varied medical problems as arthritis, depression, diabetes, menstrual irregularity, and pulmonary conditions.
However, there are many negative effects of herbal preparations.
Dr Borins discusses the potential side effects of various herbs and the lack of standardization and control that can contribute to contamination and toxicity of herbal products.
Bove GM.
Acute neuropathy after exposure to sun in a patient treated with St. John's Wort.
Lancet 1998 Oct 3;352:1121-2.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The case of a 35-yr-old woman who took 500 mg of Hypericum perforatum as a ground preparation daily for mild depression, based on information in a magazine article, and developed subacute polyneuropathy after exposure to the sun is presented.
After 4 wk of taking H. perforatum, the patient developed stinging pain on her face and the dorsum of each hand, which were areas that had received sun exposure.
She sought help when the same symptoms developed on the exposed areas of her arms and legs a few h after sunbathing.
The patient was diagnosed with subacute toxic neuropathy.
H. perforatum was stopped.
The symptoms began to improve after 3 wk and disappeared gradually over the next 2 months.
Boyle FM.
Adverse interaction of herbal medicine with breast cancer treatment [letter; comment].
Med J Aust 1997;167(5):286.
Brockmoller J, Reum T, Bauer S, Kerb R, Hubner WD, Roots I. Hypericin and pseudohypericin: pharmacokinetics and effects on photosensitivity in humans.
Pharmacopsychiatry 1997;30(Suppl 2):94-101.
Extracts of St. John's wort (Hypericum perforatum) are used in treatment of depression.
They contain various substances with the naphthodianthrones hypericin and pseudohypericin as characteristic ingredients.
These compounds were shown to cause phototoxicity in cell culture and in animals.
A placebo-controlled randomized clinical trial with monitoring of hypericin and pseudohypericin plasma concentration was performed to evaluate the increase in dermal photosensitivity in humans after application of high dose hypericum extracts.
The study was divided into a single dose and a multiple dose part.
In the single dose period, each of 13 volunteers received in a double blind fourfold complete crossover design, either placebo, or 900, 1800 or 3600 mg of a standardized hypericum extract (LI 160) containing zero, 2.81, 5.62 and 11.25 mg of total hypericin (total hypericin is the sum of hypericin and pseudohypericin).
Maximum total hypericin plasma concentrations were observed about 4 h after dosage and were 0, 0.028, 0.061 and 0.159 mg/L, respectively.
Before and 4 h after drug intake, the subjects were exposed at small areas of their back to increasing doses of solar simulated irradiation (SSI, with combined ultraviolet A, UV-A, and UV-B light) and another part was exposed to selective UV-A light irradiation.
Minimal erythema dose was determined 5, 20 and 68 h after irradiation.
Comparison of SSI sensitivity without and with hypericum extract did not show and difference and there was no dose-related trend in light sensitivity.
Sensitivity to selective UV-A light was increased only after the highest dose from a minimal tanning dose of 10.8 J/ cm2 (mean) after placebo to 8.7 J/cm2 after 3600 mg extract with marginal statistical significance (p = 0.03 by one sided paired t-test).
There was no correlation between total hypericin plasma concentrations and photosensitivity.
In the multiple dose part, 50 volunteers received 600 mg hypericum extract t.i.d. with a daily dose of 5.6 mg of total hypericin.
Comparison of UV light sensitivity before dosing with day 15 of treatment showed a slightly increased SSI sensitivity expressed by decrease of the MED from 0.17 to 0.16 J/cm2 (p = 0.005 by Wilcoxon test), and similarly, sensitivity to UV-A light increased (the mean tanning dose decreased from 9.9 to 7.8 J/cm2, p 
This increase in cutaneous light sensitivity could be compensated by reducing irradiation time by 21%.
Doses used in this study were higher than typical doses in current commercial preparations.
In spite of these high doses in the double blind single dose part, frequency of side effects was equal to placebo medication and UV light sensitivity was not or only marginally increased.
The study does not, however, exclude phototoxic reactions with doses above 11.25 mg of total hypericin and plasma levels above 100 micrograms/L.
Furthermore, phototoxicity may be different after application of pure hypericin, since some constituents in the plant extract may exhibit protective effects.
Brusick D, Mengs U. Assessment of the genotoxic risk from laxative senna products.
Environ Mol Mutagen 1997;29(1):1-9.
Laxative senna products and several of their specific components have been submitted to a large number of genetic tests.
While most studies gave negative responses, results from some of the studies suggest that components of senna products, particularly emodin and aloe-emodin, have genotoxic activity.
Assessment of the genotoxicity profile of these substances, in light of other data from animal and human metabolism or kinetic studies, human clinical trials and rodent carcinogenicity studies do not support concerns that senna laxatives pose a genotoxic risk to humans when consumed under prescribed use conditions.
Brustbauer R, Wenisch C. [Bradycardic atrial fibrillation after drinking herbal tea].
DMW 1997;122(30):930-2.
(Ger) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
History and clinical findings: One day after drinking what she thought to be a tea made from borage leaves a 72-year-old woman developed nausea, vomiting and diarrhoea, later also flickering in her eyes and palpitations.
She was in a good general state with a blood pressure of 120/75 mm Hg and an irregular heart rate of 52/min.
Physical examination was otherwise unremarkable.
She had not been on any medication.
Investigations: The usual laboratory tests were normal.
The electrocardiogram showed atrial fibrillation with a slow ventricular rate with pauses of up to 1.5 s, intermittently type I and II 2~ AV block, and depressed concave ST segments.
The level of digoxin was 3.93 ng/ml, that of digitoxin 133.5 ng/ml.
Treatment and course: The patient's symptoms quickly improved under symptomatic treatment.
Further questioning suggested that she had probably mistaken foxglove leaves for those of borage when picking them to make a brew.
Conclusion: If cardiac arrhythmias have occurred after intake of self-picked herbal leaves one should consider digitalis intoxication resulting from misidentification.
Bruynzeel DP. Bulb dermatitis.
Dermatological problems in the flower bulb industries.
Contact Dermatitis 1997;37(2):70-7.
The irritant and allergenic properties of the most important flower bulbs are described, as well as the clinical symptoms they cause.
The tulip contains the allergen tulipalin A; sensitization and irritation are responsible for the development of tulip fingers.
The same clinical picture can be caused by Alliums like the onion and garlic.
The narcissus causes lily rash, a dermatitis rarely caused by sensitization.
The hyacinth evokes itching in practically everyone: an irritant reaction caused by calcium oxalate crystals.
Patch testing is complicated as the allergens are not all identified.
Burnakis TG.
It's only natural.
Hosp Pharm 1998 Aug;33:1006-7.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Some adverse effects and drug interactions of alternative medicines are reported, including the development of severe chronic interstitial nephritis in a patient with previously normal renal function after self-medication with chromium picolinate, the occurrence of drug interactions between ginseng and both warfarin and digoxin, and the development of spontaneous bleeding in 2 subjects who had taken Ginkgo biloba.
Caballero T, Martin-Esteban M. Association between pollen hypersensitivity and edible vegetable allergy: A review.
J Invest Allergol Clin Immunol 1998;8(1):6-16.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Over the last three decades several authors have described the existence of an association between sensitivity to different pollens and sensitivity to diverse edible vegetables.
An association between ragweed pollinosis and hypersensitivity to Cucurbitaceae vegetables (e.g., watermelon, melon, cucumber) and banana has been reported.
Other authors have found a relationship between birch pollinosis and sensitization to hazelnut, apple, carrot, potato, kiwi and other vegetables.
Additionally, several papers have shown the association between mugwort pollinosis and sensitization to celery, carrot, spices, nuts, mustard and Leguminoseae vegetables.
Later some studies showed association between grass pollinosis and sensitization to tomato, potato, green-pea, peanut, watermelon, melon, apple, orange and kiwi.
Finally, an association between sensitization to plantain pollen and melon hypersensitivity was also described.
The association between pollinosis and edible vegetable sensitization has been explained by the combination of different hypotheses, such as the following.
1) presence of lectins in edible vegetables; 2) existence of IgE to carbohydrates of the glycoproteins (crossreactive carbohydrate determinants); and, 3) existence of common allergens between pollens and edible vegetables.
Up to now three allergens have been identified as responsible for cross-reactivity in these associations: profilin, a 14 kd protein that regulates actin; Bet v 1, the 18 kd birch pollen allergen; and a 60-69 kd allergen.
It is important to study in depth these associated sensitizations and the common allergens responsible for them in order to improve diagnostic methods and treatment of these syndromes.
Calore EE, Cavaliere MJ, Haraguchi M, Gorniak SL, Dagli ML, Raspantini PC, Calore NM, Weg R. Toxic peripheral neuropathy of chicks fed Senna occidentalis seeds.
Ecotoxicol Environ Saf 1998;39(1):27-30.
Plants of the genus Senna (formerly Cassia) are poisonous to livestock and other laboratory animals, leading to a syndrome of a widespread muscle degeneration, incoordination, recumbence, and death.
The main histologic lesion is necrosis of skeletal muscle fibers.
Recently, a mitochondrial myopathy with ragged-red and cytochrome oxidase (COX)-negative muscle fibers was recognized in hens chronically intoxicated with parts of seeds of S. occidentalis.
The purpose of the present work was to investigate if there was peripheral nerve involvement in the acute intoxication of chicks with S. occidentalis seeds.
Teasing of individual fibers revealed signs of extensive axonal damage with myelin ovoids.
Ultrathin sections confirmed the axonal damage.
Axons were filled with membranes, some residual disorganized filaments, and enlarged mitochondria.
In some instances the axon disappeared and there was secondary degeneration of the myelin sheath.
The present work is the first description of the neurotoxic effect of S. occidentalis intoxication.
Future work should attempt to determine the mechanisms involved in this neuropathy.
Calore EE, Cavaliere MJ, Haraguchi M, Gorniak SL, Dagli ML, Raspantini PC, Perez Calore NM. Experimental mitochondrial myopathy induced by chronic intoxication by Senna occidentalis seeds.
J Neurol Sci 1997;146(1):1-6.
Histochemical and electron microscopic studies of biceps femoris, pectoralis major and rectus femoris of chronically treated birds with seeds of the poisonous plant Senna occidentalis (0.2% external/internal tegment), were performed.
The muscles had similar features of human mitochondrial myopathy as ragged-red fibers, cytochrome-oxidase negative fibers, and weak activity of the oxidative enzymes.
Fibers with lipid storage were also present.
Acid phosphatase activity in rare muscle fibers was also detected, and represents probably a secondary degenerative process.
By electron microscopy, enlarged mitochondria with disrupted or excessively branched cristae were seen.
The present study presents a new experimental model of mitochondrial myopathy that may be useful for the best knowledge of this group of diseases and for experimental trials of drugs that could reverse the mitochondrial impairment in the mitochondrial myopathies.
Campana MA, Panzeri AM, Moreno VJ, Dulout FN. Genotoxic evaluation of the pyrethroid lambda-cyhalothrin using the micronucleus test in erythrocytes of the fish Cheirodon interruptus interruptus.
Mutat Res 1999;438(2):155-61.
In order to develop experimental models able to detect genotoxic effects of pollutants in aquatic organisms, the genotoxicity of the pyrethroid lambda-cyhalothrin was studied using the micronucleus test in erythrocytes of Cheirodon interruptus interruptus.
The frequency of micronuclei was examined in blood smears obtained from fishes exposed in vivo to three different concentrations (0.05; 0.
01; 0.001 ug/l) of the compound and sacrificed at nine sampling times (24, 48, 72, 96 h and 8, 12, 15, 19 and 23 days).
As a positive control fishes were exposed to 5 mg/l of cyclophosphamide.
Results obtained demonstrated the genotoxic effects of the pyrethroid in the experimental model employed.
The variation in the micronuclei frequencies in the different sampling times could be related to the blood cell kinetics and the erythrocyte replacement.
The results could be considered as a validation of the MN test in fishes for the assessment of genotoxic pollutants.
Copyright 1999 Published by Elsevier Science B.V.
Cantor C. Kava and alcohol [letter; comment].
Med J Aust 1997;167(10):560.
Catania PN. Problems with herbal remedies in anticoagulated home care patients.
Home Care Provid 1998;3(5):253-5.
The increasing popularity of alternative therapies, including herbal remedies, poses new challenges for home health care providers.
The cost of herbal remedy use now exceeds $1 billion annually in the United States and is expected to increase.
The use of traditional medicine in combination with alternative therapy may lead to complications for patients and their caregivers as evidenced by the adverse effects of certain herbal products in patients who receive traditional anticoagulant or antiplatelet medication.
Cavaliere MJ, Calore EE, Haraguchi M, Gorniak SL, Dagli ML, Raspantini PC, Calore NM, Weg R. Mitochondrial myopathy in Senna occidentalis-seed-fed chicken.
Ecotoxicol Environ Saf 1997;37(2):181-5.
Plants of the genus Senna (formerly Cassia) have been recognized as the cause of a natural and experimental syndrome of muscle degeneration frequently leading to death in animals.
Histologically, it demonstrated skeletal and cardiac muscle necrosis, with floccular degeneration and proliferation of sarcolemmal nuclei.
Recently, it was described as an experimental model of mitochondrial myopathy in hens chronically treated with Senna occidentalis.
Currently, skeletal muscles of chicks intoxicated with seeds of the poisonous plant S. occidentalis were studied by histochemistry and electron microscopy.
Since birth, the birds were fed ground dried seeds of this plant with a regular chicken ration at a dose of 4% for 11 days.
Microscopic examination revealed, besides muscle-fiber atrophy, lipid storage in most fibers and a moderate amount of cytochrome oxidase-negative fibers.
By electron microscopy, enlarged mitochondria with disrupted or excessively branched cristae were seen.
This picture was characteristic of mitochondrial myopathy.
These findings have hitherto remained unnoticed in skeletal muscle of young birds treated with S. occidentalis.
Ceha LJ, Presperin C, Young E, Allswede M, Erickson T. Anticholinergic toxicity from nightshade berry poisoning responsive to physostigmine.
J Emerg Med 1997;15(1):65-9.
The woody nightshade, Solanum dulcamara, belongs to the genus Solanum and its primary toxin is solanine.
We report a large nightshade ingestion in a 4-yr-old girl who presented to the emergency department in acute anticholinergic crisis.
The child was given 0.2 mg of intravenous physostigmine (0.02 mg/kg).
Within 50 min, the patient received two additional equal doses with complete resolution of symptoms.
After 36 h of observation, the child was discharged.
Our patient presented with symptoms more suggestive of the deadly nightshade species, Atropa belladonna, which is native to Europe; however, a detailed laboratory analysis of the suspect berries revealed no atropine or hyoscyamine.
Analysis did reveal sterols consistent with solanine.
This is a unique case presentation of woody nightshade, S. dulcamara, poisoning presenting with anticholinergic crisis and responding to physostigmine.
Cerrato PL. Natural tranquilizers? RN Mag 1998 Dec;61:61-2, 68-9.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP A brief overview of the anxiolytic effects of extracts of kava and valerian and the dosage, adverse effects, contraindications, and drug interactions of these preparations is presented.
Chang HL, Kuo ML, Lin JM. Mutagenic activity of incense smoke in comparison to formaldehyde and acetaldehyde in Salmonella typhimurium TA102.
Bull Environ Contam Toxicol 1997;58(3):394-401.
Chang IM. Liver-protective activities of aucubin derived from traditional oriental medicine.
Res Commun Mol Pathol Pharmacol 1998;102(2):189-204.
The iridoid glycosides including aucubin (AU), catalpol (CA), swertimarin (SW), and gardenoside (GA) are frequently found as natural constituents of many traditional oriental medicinal plants including Chinese herbs.
Among these iridoid glycosides, AU was systematically studied for its potent liver-protective activities using experimental systems of hepatic damage.
AU showed high liver-protective activity against carbon tetrachloride-induced hepatic damage in mice.
Also AU showed significant protective activity against alpha-amanitin-induced hepatic damage in mice, and it prevented a depression of liver RNA biosynthesis caused by alpha-amanitin administration.
Potent antidotal effects on mushroom poisoning in beagle dogs ingested with aqueous extract of Amanita virosa was observed; beagle dogs completely survived, even when AU administration was withheld for half an hour after mushroom poisoning.
In addition, AU was found to suppress hepatitis B viral DNA replication in vitro.
Conversion of AU to its aglycone form appeared to be a prerequisite step for an exhibition of such antiviral activity.
Chang MW, Song GY, Cha HS. [Effect of ginseng extracts on production of vacuolating toxin by Helicobacter pylori].
J Korean Soc Microbiol 1997;32(5):539-51.
(Kor) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
This study was carried out to survey the prevalence of Helicobacter pylori infection and the incidence of vacuolating toxin producing H. pylori from the gastric biopsy specimens of patients with 178 gastritis, 57 gastric ulcer, 455 gastric cancer and 44 healthy person in Pusan, Korea.
Further aim of this study was to evaluate the effect of ginseng extract, sofalcone, ginsenosides (F1, Rb3, Re, Rg1), sangwha, green, arrowroot, ginger, and jujube tea on the activity and production of vacuolating toxin by H. pylori in vitro.
The isolation rates of H. pylori by culture method from gastric biopsy specimens were 34.1% in healthy person, 42.1% in gastritis, 36.8% in gastric ulcer, and 39.3% in gastric cancer.
The isolation rates of vacuolating toxin producing H. pylori from gastric biopsy specimens were 80% in healthy person, 82.7% in gastritis, 81% in gastric ulcer, and 83.8% in gastric cancer.
The growth of H. pylori was not influenced by the addition of 10 mug/ml or 100 mug/ml of Ginseng extract and 10 mug/ml of sofalcone in the medium, but the production of vacillating toxin of H. pylori was significantly inhibited by the addition of 100 mug/ml of Ginseng extract and sofalcone.
The activity of vacuolating toxin in the culture supernatant of H. pylori was significantly diminished (1/2-1/16 compared to control) by the addition of 10 mg/ml of sangwha, green, arrowroot, and ginger tea, and 1 mug/ml of ginsenosides F1, Rb3, Re, and Rg1.
These results suggest that the isolation rates of vacuolating toxin producing H. pylori were significantly higher than that of the foreign reports.
Ginseng extract and sofalcone have direct inhibitory effect on the activity of vacuolating toxin production by H. pylori without considerable growth inhibition and sangwha, green, arrowroot, and ginger tea have direct inhibitory effect on the activity of vacuolating toxin of H. pylori.
Chang NY. [Experimental study on the antistimulative and antineoplastic effects of Radix ginseng used in combination with Fafces trogopterus].
J Chin Mater Med 1997;22(11):694-6.
(Chi ) IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP To investigate the effects of Radix ginseng used in combination with Fafces trogopterus, neoplastic mice received R. ginseng either alone or with F. trogopterus.
The mice that received the combination demonstrated better antistimulative effects and extended life span than those who received R. ginseng alone.
Chen F, Sun S, Kuhn DC, Lu Y, Gaydos LJ, Shi X, Demers LM. Tetrandrine inhibits signal-induced NF-kappa B activation in rat alveolar macrophages.
Biochem Biophys Res Commun 1997;231(1):99-102.
Tetrandrine is a bisbenzylisoquinoline alkaloid isolated from a natural Chinese herbal medicine.
While this alkaloid has been shown to exhibit antifibrotic and anti-inflammatory activities, its mechanism of action is unknown.
The present study was designed to investigate the inhibitory effect of tetrandrine on NF-kappa B activation in the alveolar macrophage.
Three different provocative stimuli were used to activate NF-kappa B in these cells.
The results indicate that tetrandrine can inhibit the activation of NF-kappa B and NF-kappa B-dependent reporter gene expression by LPS, PMA, and silica in a dose-dependent manner.
In contrast, at the doses used, tetrandrine did not interfere with Sp-1 DNA binding activity or Sp-1-dependent reporter gene expression in these cells.
Western blot analysis suggests that the inhibitory effect of tetrandrine on NF-kappa B activation can be attributed to its ability to suppress signal-induced degradation of I kappa B alpha, a cytoplasmic inhibitor of the NF-kappa B transcription factor.
Chen T, Li J, Cao J, Xu Q, Komatsu K, Namba T.
A new flavanone isolated from rhizoma smilacis glabrae and the structural requirements of its derivatives for preventing immunological hepatocyte damage.
Planta Med 1999;65(1):56-9.
From the rhizome of Smilax glabra Roxb., a new flavanone was isolated and named as smitilbin (1), together with 6 known compounds, engeletin (2), astilbin (3), dihydroquercetin (4), eurryphin (5), resveratrol (6), and 5-O-caffeoylshikimic acid (7).
These compounds were applied to the assay of liver nonparenchymal cells (NPC) against hepatocytes (HC) isolated from mice with an immunological liver injury.
Against the NPC-caused elevation of ALT (alanine transminase) in culture supernatant from HC, the pretreatment of NPC with flavanoids (1-3) dose-dependently blocked the ALT release while 4, the aglycone of 3, did not.
The chromone 5 showed a much stronger inhibition.
Compound 6 also showed the activity.
However, 1-7 did not show any suppression of NPC or CCl4-induced ALT release when they were used to pretreat HC.
These results suggest that compounds 1-3, 5, and 6 could protect the hepatocyte damage from NPC through selectively producing the dysfunction of NPC with an essential requirement of rhamnose, and the chromone part in their structures may be critical for exhibiting the activity rather than through protecting the hepatocyte membranes.
Chen Xiaoliang, Gui Xiaoming, Xie Zhenjia.
[Influence of processing methods on alkaloid, toxicity and effect of Strychnos nux-vomica L].
Zhongguo Zhongyao Zazhi 1998;23(3):151-3, 191.
(Chi) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Determination has been made on the contents of strychnine, brucine and ephedrin in different processed products of Strychnos nux-vomica.
The acute toxicity, analgesic and antiphlogistic actions of these products have also been detected.
The result shows that the product processed with Ephedra sinica can reduce toxicity and promote 'curative effect.
Among the different processing methods the preparation with Ephedra and Liqorice root and the preparation with Ephedra and alcohol appear better and thus useful in practical application.
Cheng KT, Tsay HS, Chen CF, Chou TW.
Determination of the components in a Chinese prescription, yu-ping-feng san, by RAPD analysis.
Planta Med 1998;64(6):563-5.
In this study, the RAPD (random amplified polymorphic DNA) technique was employed for the first time to determine the components in a Chinese herbal prescription.
Forty decamer oligonucleotide primers were screened in the RAPD analysis to identify three Chinese medicines, the dried root of Astragalus membranaceus (Fisch.)
Bge., the dried root of Ledebouriella seseloides Wolff, and the dried rhizome of Atractylodes macrocephala Koidz, in a Chinese prescription.
Only primer OPP-10 simultaneously generated three distinct markers were each specific to one component.
The marker with 200 bp is specific to Astragalus membranaceus; the 440 bp marker is specific to Atractylodes macrocephala; and the remaining marker with 500 bp was present in Ledebouriella seseloides.
The presence of the three herbal medicines in the mixed sample, the Chinese prescription, was determined when the primer OPP-10 RAPD reaction was performed.
The technique was proved to contribute to the identification of components in the Chinese medicinal preparations.
Cheng TJ, Wong RH, Lin YP, Hwang YH, Horng JJ, Wang JD. Chinese herbal medicine, sibship, and blood lead in children.
Occup Environ Med 1998;55(8):573-6.
OBJECTIVES: Risk factors for increased blood lead concentration (BPb) has been investigated.
However, the effect of sibship and Chinese herbal medicine on BPb has not been systematically studied.
In this study BPb data from voluntary testing was used to determine if Chinese herbal medicine and sibship were associated with BPb.
METHODS: 319 children aged 1-7 were tested for BPb.
Meanwhile, parents were interviewed to obtain information including consumption of Chinese herbal medicine, living environment, lifestyle, and sibship of the children tested.
RESULTS: The mean (SD) BPb of 319 preschool children was 4.4 (2.4) micrograms/dl.
The consumption of Ba-baw-san (a Chinese herbal medicine) was significantly associated with increased BPb in children (p = 0.038).
Further multivariate regression analysis of BPb in 50 pairs of siblings showed the factors of being brothers explained 75% of variation for BPb, and being sisters and brother-sister explained 51% and 41% of variation respectively.
CONCLUSION: Chinese herbal medicine and children's play patterns within the family expressed in different types of sibship are the main determinants of low concentrations of BPb in preschool children of Taiwan.
Cheng TO.
Warfarin danshen interaction [letter].
Ann Thorac Surg 1999;67(3):894.
Chou CT, Chang SC.
The inhibitory effect of common traditional anti-rheumatic herb formulas on prostaglandin E and interleukin 2 in vitro: a comparative study with Tripterygium wilfordii.
J Ethnopharmacol 1998;62(2):167-71.
To understand the clinical efficacy of traditional anti-rheumatic herbal medicines on acute and severe arthritis or immune diseases, four herbal formulas and one herb were tested in vitro to determine their effects on prostaglandin E2 (PGE2) and interleukin 2 (IL2).
Peripheral blood mononuclear cells from healthy subjects were incubated with different concentrations of four herbal formulas including Shaur Yau Gan Tsao Tang (SYGTT), Shang Jong Shiah Tong Yong Tong Feng Wan (SJSTY), Shu Jin Lih An Saan (SJLAS), Ma Shing Yih Gan Tang (MSYGT) and one herb, Tripterygium wilfordii (T2) with and without mitogen stimulation.
PGE2 and IL2 from culture supernatant were measured by enzyme immunoassay.
The results showed that SYGTT, SJSTY, SJLAS at concentration of 100 microg and MSYGT at 500 microg/ml can significantly inhibit PGE2 release (P 
However, T2 at 2 microg/ml expressed the same response.
For the inhibition of IL2, the concentration of SYGTT, SJSTY and SJLAS must exceed 100 symbol microg/ml.
MSYGT failed to inhibit IL2 at even concentrations of 500 microg/ml but T2 at a very low concentration (0.6 microg/ml) could strongly inhibit it.
The findings suggest that the majority of traditional anti-rheumatic herbal formulas or herbs, except for T2, should not be used to treat acute and critical arthritis or immune diseases.
Chughtai SR, Ahmad MA, Naseem K, Mohmand AS. Genotoxicity testing of some spices in diploid yeast.
Pakistan J Botany 1998;30(1):33-8.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
A study was conducted to assess the mutagenic and recombinogenic potential of 10 commonly consumed spices and condiments viz., bay leaves, black pepper, cardamom small, caraway, red chilies, cinnamon, coriander, fennel, garlic and curry powder in the diploid yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae.
Aqueous extracts of these spices were tested for the induction of mitotic gene conversion and reverse mutation in the diploid strain D7 of the yeast.
All except cinnamon failed to induce detectable recombination and mutations in the growing cells of the yeast without exogenous metabolic activation.
Treatments with an aqueous extracts of cinnamon significantly increased the rate of gene conversion and reverse mutation.
Cinnamon caused cells death and inhibition of cell division.
Ethyl methane sulphonate (EMS) used as a positive control exhibited recombinogenic and mutagenic effects.
Church D. Alternative remedies [letter; comment].
N Z Med J 1998;111(1060):59.
Ciordia R. Beware "St. John's Wort," potential herbal danger [letter].
J Clin Monit Comput 1998;14(3):215.
Clark SM, Wilkinson SM. Phototoxic contact dermatitis from 5-methoxypsoralen in aromatherapy oil.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;38(5):289-90.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM CASE STUDY HUMAN PATIENT ADULT FEMALE HUMAN PHOTOTOXIC CONTACT DERMATITIS TOXICITY 5-METHOXYPSORALEN AROMATHERAPY OIL HERBAL REMEDIES PRODUCT INFORMATION TOXICOLOGY DERMATOLOGY ALLERGY INTEGUMENTARY SYSTEM DISEASE.
Cockayne SE, Gawkrodger DJ. Occupational contact dermatitis in an aromatherapist.
Contact Dermatitis 1997,37(6):306-7.
A case study of a 32 year old woman who worked as a holistic beauty therapist for 12 years was presented.
At presentation she had a 9 month history of patchy eczema on her hands and body.
Her condition improved when she was off work.
Treatment had included topical corticosteroids and emollients.
At work she performed aromatherapy massages and facials with essential oils.
Her hobby was gardening and she always wore gloves during this activity.
Positive patch test results were noted to nickel-sulfate (12503536), paratertiary-butylphenol-formaldehyde-resin, fragrance mix, lemon-grass-oil (8007021), lavender-absolute (8000280), cananga-oil (83863303), Bulgarian rose-oil (8007010), ylang-ylang (8006813), patchouli (8014093), clary-sage (8016635), her own pedicure foot lotion, and her own facial lotion.
Her facial lotion contained hazel-nut-oil, beeswax, avocado-oil, carnuba, basil-oil, tonka-bean absolute, bitter-orange-oil, and chamomile oil.
The pedicure foot lotion contained the essential oils of peppermint, black pepper, juniper, eucalyptus and rosemary.
No common allergen was found in all of the compounds that gave a positive result.
The authors note that patch testing with a perfume series and with the patient's own products was absolutely essential, where aromatherapy is suspected as a source of allergic contact dermatitis.
Combest WL, Nemecz G. Herbal remedies in the pharmacy.
US Pharm 1997 Jul;22:50, 52, 55-6, 59.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An update on herbal remedies used as over-the-counter products in pharmacies is presented, including a discussion of the increase in the use of herbal remedies in the United States, Food and Drug Administration regulations regarding herbal remedies and phytomedicinals, a list of herbs considered unsafe and their potential side effects, quality control and standardization issues regarding herbal remedies, potential dangers of self-treatment with herbal remedies, and information for the pharmacist to prepare them to give advice on herbal remedies to patients.
Cosyns JP, Goebbels RM, Liberton V, Schmeiser HH, Bieler CA, Bernard AM.
Chinese herbs nephropathy-associated slimming regimen induces tumours in the forestomach but no interstitial nephropathy in rats.
Arch Toxicol 1998;72(11):738-43.
Chinese herbs nephropathy (CHN), a rapidly progressive interstitial fibrosis of the kidney, has been described in approximately 100 young Belgian women who had followed a slimming regimen containing some Chinese herbs.
In 4 patients multifocal transitional cell carcinomas (TCC) were observed.
Aristolochic acid (AA), suspected as the causal factor of CHN, is a well known carcinogen but its ability to induce fibrosis has never been demonstrated.
The objective of this study was to evaluate the latter using doses of AA, durations of intoxication and delays of sacrifice known to yield tumours in rats.
We also tested the hypothesis that a possible fibrogenic role of AA was enhanced by the other components of the slimming regimen.
Male and female rats were treated orally with 10 mg isolated AA/kg per day for 5 days/week, or with approximately 0.15 mg AA/ kg per day 5 days/week contained in the herbal powder together with the other components prescribed in the slimming pills for 3 months.
The animals were killed respectively 3 and 11 months later.
At sacrifice, animals in both groups had developed the expected tumours but not fibrosis of the renal interstitium.
Whether the fibrotic response observed in man is due to species and/or strain related differences in the response to AA or to other factors, remains to be determined.
Interestingly, despite the addition of fenfluramine and diethylpropion, two drugs incriminated in the development of valvular heart disease, no cardiac abnormalities were observed.
Cosyns JP, Jadoul M, Squifflet JP, Wese FX, Van Ypersele De Strihou C. Urothelial lesions in Chinese-herb nephropathy [see comments].
Am J Kidney Dis 1999;33(6):1011-7.
Rapidly progressive renal fibrosis after a slimming regimen including Chinese herbs containing aristolochic acid (AA) has been identified as Chinese-herb nephropathy (CHN).
We reported urothelial atypia in three patients with CHN, with the subsequent development in one patient of overt transitional cell carcinoma (TCC).
Therefore, it was decided to remove the native kidneys, as well as the ureters, in all patients with CHN.
Nineteen kidneys and ureters removed during and/or after renal transplantation from 10 patients were studied to assess critically urothelial lesions and to characterize the cellular expression of p53, a tumor-suppressor gene overexpressed in several types of malignancies.
Multifocal high-grade flat TCC in situ (carcinoma in situ; CiS) was observed, mainly in the upper urinary tract, in four patients, a prevalence of 40%.
In one of those patients, a superficially invasive flat TCC of the right upper ureter, as well as two additional foci of noninvasive papillary TCC, were found in the right pelvis and left lower ureter, respectively.
This patient also presented recurrent noninvasive papillary TCC of the bladder.
Furthermore, in all cases, multifocal, overall moderate atypia was found in the medullary collecting ducts, pelvis, and ureter.
All CiS and papillary TCC, as well as urothelial atypia, overexpressed p53.
These results show that the intake of Chinese herbs containing AA has a dramatic carcinogenic effect.
Carcinogenesis is associated with the overexpression of p53, which suggests a role for a p53 gene mutation.
The relationship of this mutation with the reported presence of AA DNA adducts in the kidney remains to be explored.
Crone CC, Wise TN. Survey of alternative medicine use among organ transplant patients.
J Transpl Coord 1997;7(3):123-30.
Herbal medicine and health food supplements have become increasingly popular.
However, many of these pharmacologically active compounds remain poorly understood.
Patients with chronic and life-threatening conditions often use alternative therapies while receiving conventional medical care, and his population is at increased risk for complications and adverse drug interactions due to poor health and complex drug regimens.
Patients awaiting or who had received solid organ transplants were surveyed about their use of herbal medicines and health food supplements.
Twenty percent of respondents acknowledged experience with these products, which they used to prolong the function of a failing organ or to obtain relief from fatigue and insomnia.
Transplant staff often were unaware of their patients' use of these treatments, despite patients' claims to the contrary.
The potential for unexpected drug interactions, toxicity, and other adverse reactions resulting from the use of herbal medicines or supplements must be recognized and identified by transplant teams.
Cutler SJ, Cutler HG. Natural central nervous system agents.
US Pharm 1997 Nov;22:87-8, 90, 93-4.
De Boer D, Egberts T, Maes RA. Para-methylthioamphetamine, a new amphetamine designer drug of abuse.
Pharm World Sci 1999;21(1):47-8.
A case study is described of a patient who was intoxicated after the intake of so-called herbal stimulants.
A visit to a physician after the intoxication prompted to this investigation and the case was examined for its direct cause.
An interview with the patient revealed that the source of the herbal stimulants was a so-called 'S-5 tablet'.
Information provided on the packings of the tablet only indicated the presence of natural alkaloids and vitamins.
Toxicological analysis however proved that the 'S-5 tablet' contained para-methylthioamphetamine (MTA), mainly.
MTA is a relative unknown amphetamine designer drug, which has only been studied as a model compound in some structure-activity relationship studies.
The fact that MTA appeared in tablets was therefore completely unexpected.
Not only the potential abuse of this new amphetamine designer drug is a serious matter of concern, but also the misleading information provided with the tablet.
De Broe ME.
On a nephrotoxic and carcinogenic slimming regimen [editorial; comment].
Am J Kidney Dis 1999;33(6):1171-3.
De Broe ME, et al .
Clinical nephrotoxins: renal injury from drugs and chemicals.
Dordrecht(Netherlands), Norwell(MA): Kluwer Academic Publishers; 1998.
481 P. BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM BOOK ANIMAL HUMAN ANIMAL MODEL NEPHROTOXICITY ENVIRONMENTAL TOXINS TOXIN PHARMACEUTICAL AGENTS XENOBIOTICS RENAL DYSFUNCTION RENAL INJURY KIDNEY ANTI-INFECTIOUS AGENTS ANALGESICS IMMUNOSUPPRESSIVE DRUGS HERBAL REMEDIES ADVERSE RENAL EFFECTS URINARY SYSTEM CELL CULTURE MODEL TOXICOLOGY UROLOGIC DISEASE EXCRETORY SYSTEM.
De Soriano G, Chase D. Safety of herbal remedies [letter].
J R Soc Med 1998;91(10):561.
Deng JF, Lin TJ, Kao WF, Chen SS.
The difficulty in handling poisonings associated with Chinese traditional medicine: a poison control center experience for 1991-1993.
Vet Hum Toxicol 1997;39(2):106-14.
The purpose of this prospective case series was to outline the characteristics of Chinese traditional medicine poisonings and develop essential information for poison prevention and management.
All phone inquiries made to the Poison Center related to Chinese traditional medicines from January 1, 1991 to December 31, 1993 were included.
Standardized questionnaires were used to capture relevant information.
Among the 318 phone inquiries about Chinese traditional medicines, 273 cases were classified as poisonings; and 22 mortalities occurred (6.9%).
All of the poisonings occurred because of suicide attempts, accidents, or erroneous or improper use or processing.
In our study, 47% of the potential toxic effects of Chinese traditional medicines were either unknown or could not be found in the literature.
There existed undefinable uncertainty in attributing the clinical effects to the exposures to Chinese traditional medicines.
We recommend that the strategy in handling Chinese traditional medicine poisonings to decrease mortality should be comprised of confirmation of the generic name of the substances and the specific part of the plant used, awareness of improper processing methods, maintenance of records on a broad review of systems and laboratory data, identification of active principles and potential interactions among the individual active agents; verification of histopathologic effects of the toxins; development of information on toxicodynamics and toxicokinetics; intensive supportive care for poisoned patients, and investigation of potential antidotes.
There are several regulatory options available to health authorities to control the unrestricted use of these potentially toxic medicines and to help safeguard the public.
Dewitt MS, Swain R, Gibson LB Jr.
The dangers of jimson weed and its abuse by teenagers in the Kanawha Valley of West Virginia.
W V Med J 1997;93(4):182-5.
Jimson weed (Datura stramonium, a member of the Belladonna alkyloid family) is a plant growing naturally in West Virginia and has been used as a home remedy since colonial times.
Due to its easy availability and strong anticholinergic properties, teens are using Jimson weed as a drug.
Plant parts can be brewed as a tea or chewed, and seed pods, commonly known as "pods" or "thorn apples," can be eaten.
Side effects from ingesting jimson weed include tachycardia, dry mouth, dilated pupils, blurred vision, ballucinations, confusion, combative behavior, and difficulty urinating.
Severe toxicity has been associated with coma and seizures, although death is rare.
Treatment consists of activated charcoal and gastric lavage.
Esmolol or other beta-blocker may be indicated to reduce severe sinus tachycardia.
Seizures, severe hypertension, severe hallucinations, and life-threatening arrhythmias are indicators for the use of the anticholinesterase inhibitor, Physostigmine.
This article reviews the cases of nine teenagers who were treated in hospitals in the Kanawha Valley after ingesting jimson weed.
We hope this article will help alert primary care physicians about the abuse of jimson weed and inform health officials about the need to educate teens about the dangers of this plant.
Dipaola RS, Zhang H, Lambert GH, Meeker R, Licitra E, Rafi MM, Zhu BT, Spaulding H, Goodin S, Toledano MB, et al.
Clinical and biologic activity of an estrogenic herbal combination (PC-SPES) in prostate cancer [see comments].
N Engl J Med 1998;339(12):785-91.
BACKGROUND: Herbal mixtures are popular alternatives to demonstrated therapies.
PC-SPES, a commercially available combination of eight herbs, is used as a nonestrogenic treatment for cancer of the prostate.
Since other herbal medicines have estrogenic effects in vitro, we tested the estrogenic activity of PC-SPES in yeast and mice and in men with prostate cancer.
METHODS: We measured the estrogenic activity of PC-SPES with transcriptional-activation assays in yeast and a biologic assay in mice.
We assessed the clinical activity of PC-SPES in eight patients with hormone-sensitive prostate cancer by measuring serum prostate-specific antigen and testosterone concentrations during and after treatment.
RESULTS: In complementary yeast assays, a 1:200 dilution of an ethanol extract of PC-SPES had estrogenic activity similar to that of 1 nM estradiol, and in ovariectomized CD-1 mice, the herbal mixture increased uterine weights substantially.
In six of six men with prostate cancer, PC-SPES decreased serum testosterone concentrations (P
All eight patients had breast tenderness and loss of libido, and one had venous thrombosis.
High-performance liquid chromatography, gas chromatography, and mass spectrometry showed that PC-SPES contains estrogenic organic compounds that are distinct from diethylstilbestrol, estrone, and estradiol.
CONCLUSIONS: PC-SPES has potent estrogenic activity.
The use of this unregulated mixture of herbs may confound the results of standard or experimental therapies and may produce clinically significant adverse effects.
Drew AK, Myers SP.
Safety issues in herbal medicine: implications for the health professions [see comments].
Med J Aust 1997;166(10):538-41.
The use of herbal medicines in Australia is widespread.
A number of factors make assessment of adverse effects associated with these products more complex than for pharmaceuticals.
Problems have resulted from contamination with heavy metals and adulteration with prescription drugs in overseas herbal products.
A classification is proposed for adverse effects associated with herbal medicines, and medical practitioners are encouraged to include use of these preparations in a patient's drug history and in reports of suspected adverse drug reactions.
It may be necessary to develop a separate database to promote adverse drug reaction reporting for herbal medicine and the wider field of complementary and alternative medicine.
Emmanuel NP, Jones C, Lydiard RB. Use of herbal products and symptoms of bipolar disorder [letter].
Am J Psychiatry 1998;155(11):1627.
Ernst E. Harmless herbs? A review of the recent literature.
Am J Med 1998;104(2):170-8.
Herbal medicines have become a popular form of therapy.
They are often perceived as being natural and therefore harmless.
This article reviews the recent literature on the adverse effects of herbal remedies.
Examples of allergic reactions, toxic reactions, adverse effects related to an herb's desired pharmacological actions, possible mutagenic effects, drug interactions, drug contamination, and mistaken plant identities are provided.
Because of underreporting, our present knowledge may well be just the "tip of the iceberg."
Little is known about the relative safety of herbal remedies compared to synthetic drug treatments, although for some herbal remedies, the risks may be less than for conventional drugs.
Ernst E, Rand JI, Barnes J, Stevinson C. Adverse effects profile of the herbal antidepressant St. John's wort (Hypericum perforatum L.).
Eur J Clin Pharmacol 1998;54(8):589-94.
This paper provides a systematic review of adverse drug reactions (ADRs) associated with the use of extracts of the herb St. John's wort (Hypericum perfbratum L.) for the treatment of mild to moderate depression.
METHODS: Searches of four computerized literature databases were performed for records of (ADRs).
Manufacturers of hypericum products, the international drug monitoring centre of the World Health Organization (WHO) and the national drug safety monitoring bodies of Germany and the United Kingdom were also contacted for information.
RESULTS: Information on (ADRs) originates from case reports, clinical trials, post-marketing surveillance and drug monitoring studies.
Collectively, the data suggest that hypericum is well tolerated, with an incidence of adverse reactions similar to that of placebo.
The most common adverse effects are gastrointestinal symptoms, dizziness/confusion and tiredness/sedation.
A potential serious adverse effect is photosensitivity, but this appears to occur extremely rarely.
CONCLUSIONS: Hypericum has an encouraging safety profile.
However, as most of the current data originate from short-term investigations, more long-term studies are desirable.
Farrell GC. Drug-induced hepatic injury.
J Gastroenterol Hepatol 1997;12(9-10):242-50.
Drugs and other chemical toxins account for less than 5% of cases of jaundice or acute hepatitis and fewer cases of chronic liver disease, but they are an important cause of more severe types of hepatic injury.
Drug reactions produce an array of hepatic lesions that mimic all known hepatobiliary diseases; this poses a diagnostic challenge for physicians and pathologists.
Diagnosis of drug-induced hepatic injury is circumstantial, with positive rechallenge being the only factor that unequivocally implicates a particular agent.
Nonetheless, other aspects of the temporal relationship between drug ingestion and adverse reaction, exclusion of other diseases, the presence of extrahepatic features of drug hypersensitivity and some findings on liver biopsy can lend support to the diagnosis.
Some of these issues will be explored in this review by considering contemporary paradigms of drug-induced hepatic injury.
Factors that predispose to dose-dependent hepatic injury will be considered in relation to acetaminophen, an example of acute hepatotoxicity, and methotrexate, an agent that can produce hepatic fibrosis.
Flucloxacillin will be discussed as an example of drug-induced cholestatic hepatitis often associated with prolonged cholestasis and the vanishing bile duct syndrome.
Minocycline and diclofenac will be mentioned as two drugs for which drug hepatitis is an exceedingly rare complication.
Finally, the evidence that Chinese herbal medicines can be hepatotoxic will be reviewed.
Fau D, Lekehal M, Farrell G, Moreau A, Moulis C, Feldmann G, Haouzi D, Pessayre D. Diterpenoids from germander, an herbal medicine, induce apoptosis in isolated rat hepatocytes [see comments].
Gastroenterology 1997;113(4):1334-46.
BACKGROUND 
Its toxicity was shown to be caused by diterpenoids and their cytochrome P4503A-mediated metabolic activation into electrophilic metabolites that deplete cellular thiols.
The aim of the present study was to determine the mechanisms of cell death.
METHODS: Isolated rat hepatocytes were incubated for 2 hours with germander diterpenoids (100 micrograms/mL).
RESULTS: Diterpenoids decreased cell glutathione, increased cytosolic [Ca2+], activated Ca(2+)-dependent tissue transglutaminase forming a cross-linked protein scaffold, and caused internucleosomal DNA fragmentation and the ultrastructural features of apoptosis.
Cell death was prevented by decreasing metabolic activation (with troleandomycin), preventing depletion of glutathione (with cystine), blocking activation of Ca(2+)-modulated enzymes (with calmidazolium), or inhibiting internucleosomal DNA fragmentation (with aurintricarboxylic acid).
Apoptosis was increased and diterpenoids caused overexpression of p53 and interleukin 1 beta-converting enzyme in rats treated with dexamethasone (cytochrome P4503A inducer).
Apoptosis was also increased by a diet deficient in sulfur amino acids.
CONCLUSIONS: The germander furano diterpenoids cause apoptosis within 2 hours in isolated rat hepatocytes.
Electrophilic metabolites may stimulate apoptosis by decreasing thiols, increasing [Ca2+], and activating Ca(2+)-dependent transglutaminase and endonucleases.
Ferguson JE, Chalmers RJ, Rowlands DJ. Reversible dilated cardiomyopathy following treatment of atopic eczema with Chinese herbal medicine.
Br J Dermatol 1997;136(4):592-3.
Chinese herbal medicines are increasingly being used as an alternative treatment for chronic skin disease.
Most patients and many doctors remain insufficiently aware of their potential toxicity.
We report a patient with eczema who developed a severe cardiomyopathy following a 2-week course of Chinese herbal medicine.
The connection between the two conditions was not made until 2 weeks after presentation when the patient was specifically asked if she had ingested any unusual substances.
The belief that herbs, as natural products available without prescription, are harmless, is commonplace and patients may not consider them worthy of mention during a standard medical history.
Fernandez L, Duque S, Sanchez I, Quinones D, Rodriguez F, Garcia-Abujeta JL. Allergic contact dermatitis from rosemary (Rosmarinus officinalis L.).
Contact Dermatitis 1997;37(5):248-9.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM CASE STUDY NOTE ROSMARINUS-OFFICINALIS HUMAN PLANT MALE HUMAN MIDDLE AGE DERMATOLOGY HEALTH PHARMACOGNOSY ROSEMARY LEAF PLASTER ANTIINFLAMMATORY HERBAL REMEDY ALLERGIC CONTACT DERMATITIS ALLERGY INTEGUMENTARY SYSTEM DISEASE IMMUNE SYSTEM DISEASE.
Figueiredo MR, Kaplan MA. Pyrrolizidine alkaloids: a word of caution.
Cienc Cultur 1997;49(5-6):331-8.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Most plants bearing pyrrolizidine alkaloids (PAs) are toxic to men and animals.
These natural products are recognized to be hepatotoxic, pneumotoxic, carcinogenic and mutagenic.
Thus, the presence of toxic pyrrolizidine alkaloids in certain medicinal plants entails a serious health risk.
Moreover, people are exposed to undetermined toxicity hazards of pyrrolizidine alkaloid-containing plants due to the consumption of milk and meat from chronically PA-poisoned animals and honey from wild bees.
Symphytum officinale (comfrey) has been used freely as tea, topical cream, salad and beverage.
This is a clear and actual example of how lack of knowledge about chemistry and toxicology of a plant made easy its spreading in the consumer society as beneficial and safe.
Fox C. Technically speaking.
Cosmet Toiletries 1998 Sep;113:29-32.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of current discoveries related to cosmetic products is presented, including a discussion of the role of essential fatty acids in maintaining skin function, herbal irritations related to creams prescribed by Chinese herbalists, the incidence of lanolin allergies among high-risk populations, moisturizers, silicone elastomers, and conditioners for hair care, and new emulsions and antiperspirant products.
Frasca T, Brett AS, Yoo SD. Mandrake toxicity.
A case of mistaken identity.
Arch Intern Med 1997;157(17):2007-9.
A 31-year-old man ingested an unknown amount of mandrake plant purchased at a local health food store and came to the emergency department with severe nausea and vomiting.
He was hospitalized overnight but recovered uneventfully without obvious adverse systemic effects.
This plant was almost certainly Podophyllum peltatum based on chromatographic identification of podophyllotoxin in a sample.
However, the patient had mistakenly believed he was taking the anticholinergic and hallucinatory plant Mandragora officinarum, which is also known as mandrake.
Other users of herbal substances and authors of the medical literature have also confused these 2 versions of mandrake.
Given the growing popularity of alternative therapies, physicians should understand the distinction between these substances and should be aware of the medical effects of other commonly used herbal remedies.
Friede M, Hasenfuss I, Wustenberg P. [Traffic- and work-safety under the effect of St. Johns Wort].
Fortschr Med 1998;116(34):44-5.
(Ger)
Friese J, Gleitz J, Gutser UT, Heubach JF, Matthiesen T, Wilffert B, Selve N. Aconitum sp. alkaloids: the modulation of voltage-dependent Na+ channels, toxicity and antinociceptive properties.
Eur J Pharmacol 1997;337(2-3):165-74.
Alkaloids from Aconitum sp., used as analgesics in traditional Chinese medicine, were investigated to elucidate their antinociceptive and toxic properties considering: (1) binding to Na+ channel epitope site 2, (2) alterations in synaptosomal Na+ and Ca2+ concentration ([Na+]i, [Ca2+]
The study revealed a high affinity group (Ki 1 microM) and a low affinity group (Ki 10 microM) of alkaloids binding to site 2.
The compounds of the high affinity group induce an increase in synaptosomal [Na+]i and [Ca2+]
These results suggest that the alkaloids can be grouped in Na+ channel activating and blocking compounds, but none of the alkaloids seem to be suitable as analgesics because of the low LD50/ED50 values.
Garcia-Bravo B, Bernal AP, Garcia-Hernandez MJ, Camacho F. Occupational contact dermatitis from anethole in food handlers.Contact Dermatitis 1997;37(1):38.
Two case reports of food handlers developing occupational contact dermatitis from anethole (104461) were presented.
In the first case, a 39 year old woman who cooked Seville cakes had exhibited a hand dermatitis that was resistant to treatment for 20 years.
Upon entering the workplace, the lesions spread up the forearms and rhinitis and blepharitis developed.
Standard series patch tests were conducted.
The patient reacted positively to anise-oil (8007703) and anethole, the main ingredient in anise-oil, at 2 and 4 days.
In the second case, a 38 year old woman who worked in the same cake factory had severe dermatitis on her hands, forearms, scalp, and face.
Upon entering the workplace, rhinitis and blepharitis developed.
Standard series patch tests were performed.
The patient exhibited positive reactions to Kathon-CG (55965849), anise-oil, anethole, and Roman-chamomile at 2 and 4 days.
The authors conclude that these cases may be the first reports of occupational contact dermatitis from anethole in food handlers.
Garges HP, Varia I, Doraiswamy PM.
Cardiac complications and delirium associated with valerian root withdrawal [letter].
JAMA 1998;280(18):1566-7.
Gianni L, Dreitlein WB.
Some popular OTC herbals can interact with anticoagulant therapy.
US Pharm 1998 May 23;23:80, 83-4, 86.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP The interaction of Ginkgo biloba, Tanacetum parthenium (feverfew), Allium sativum (garlic), Zingiber officinale (ginger), and vitamin E with anticoagulant therapy and a resulting increase in the risk of bleeding in some patients are discussed.
Giavina-Bianchi PF Jr, Castro FF, Machado ML, Duarte AJ. Occupational respiratory allergic disease induced by Passiflora alata and Rhamnus purshiana.
Ann Allergy Asthma Immunol 1997;79(5):449-54.
BACKGROUND: There has been an increase in the incidence of occupational asthma along with better understanding of its pathophysiologic mechanisms and etiologic factors.
There are no reports of patients with asthma and rhinitis to Passiflora alata (passion flower) and Rhamnus purshiana (cascara sagrada).
METHODS: We describe two substances of plant origin as causal agents of occupational allergic respiratory diseases in a patient who worked in a pharmacy devoted to the manual preparation of products.
RESULTS: Skin testing and Western blot confirmed the sensitization of the patient to these plant extracts in vivo and in vitro, respectively.
Bronchial challenge confirmed the cause-effect relationship between the allergen exposure and the diseases.
CONCLUSIONS: We conclude that Passiflora and cascara sagrada are two new etiologic agents of IgE-mediated occupational asthma and rhinitis.
The present study also serves to alert physicians to the risks associated with work in pharmacies devoted to manual preparation of plant extracts, emphasizing the importance of the use of protective measures in these environments.
Goday Bujan JJ, Oleaga Morante JM, Yanguas Bayona I, Gonzalez Guemes M, Soloeta Arechavala R. Allergic contact dermatitis from krameria triandra extract.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;38(2):120-1.
Goh CL.
The need for epidemiological studies [editorial; comment].
Am J Contact Dermat 1997;8(3):135-6.
Gordon JB. SSRIs and St.John's Wort: possible toxicity? [letter].
Am Fam Physician 1998;57(5):950,953.
Greenberger P. News from the Society for the Advancement of Women's Health Research.
Herbal medicines: are supplements safe? [news].
J Womens Health 1998;7(9):1077-9.
Gulick RM, Mcauliffe V, Holden-Wiltse J, Crumpacker C, Liebes L, Stein DS, Meehan P, Hussey S, Forcht J, Valentine FT.
Phase I studies of hypericin, the active compound in St. John's Wort, as an antiretroviral agent in HIV-infected adults.
AIDS Clinical Trials Group Protocols 150 and 258.
Ann Intern Med 1999;130(6):510-4.
BACKGROUND: Hypericin, the active compound in St. John's Wort, has antiretroviral activity in vitro.
Many HIV-infected persons use St. John's wort.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the safety and antiretroviral activity of hypericin in HIV-infected patients.
DESIGN: Phase I study.
SETTING: Four clinical research units.
PATIENTS: 30 HIV-infected patients with CD4 counts less than 350 cells/mm3.
INTERVENTION: Intravenous hypericin, 0.25 or 0.5 mg/kg of body weight twice weekly or 0.25 mg/kg three times weekly, or oral hypericin, 0.5 mg/kg daily.
MEASUREMENTS: Safety was assessed at weekly visits.
Antiretroviral activity was assessed by changes in HIV p24 antigen level, HIV titer, HIV RNA copies, and CD4 cell counts.
RESULTS: Of the 30 patients who were enrolled, 16 discontinued treatment early because of toxic effects.
Severe cutaneous phototoxicity was observed in 11 of 23 (48% [95% CI, 27% to 69%]) evaluable patients, and dose escalation could not be completed.
Virologic markers and CD4 cell count did not significantly change.
CONCLUSIONS: Hypericin caused significant phototoxicity and had no antiretroviral activity in the limited number of patients studied.
Gurley BJ, Gardner SF, White LM, Wang PL. Ephedrine pharmacokinetics after the ingestion of nutritional supplements containing Ephedra sinica (ma huang).
Ther Drug Monit 1998;20(4):439-45.
Nutritional supplements containing Ephedra sinica (ma huang), a botanical source of ephedrine alkaloids, have been linked to several episodes of ephedrine toxicity and at least 17 deaths, yet these products remain unregulated.
Ten subjects were enrolled in a randomized, crossover study aimed at characterizing the pharmacokinetics of ephedrine after the ingestion of three commercially available ma huang products compared with a 25-mg ephedrine capsule.
Pharmacokinetic parameters for botanical ephedrine were similar to those for synthetic ephedrine hydrochloride.
Gender-based comparisons of Vss/F and CL/F revealed higher values for women than for men (Vss/F, 3.49 +/- 1.04 vs 2.98 +/- 0.73 l/kg; CL/F, 0.48 +/- 0.11 vs 0.37 +/- 0.11 l/hour x kg).
The current study suggests that the increased incidence of ma huang toxicity does not stem from differences in the absorption of botanical ephedrine compared with synthetic ephedrine; rather, it results from accidental overdose often prompted by exaggerated off-label claims and a belief that "natural" medicinal agents are inherently safe.
Hagemann TM. Gastrointestinal medications and breastfeeding.
J Hum Lact 1998;14(3):259-62.
Medications used to treat gastrointestinal symptoms are increasingly being used as more have been gained nonprescription status.
Most of the gastrointestinal medications, such as laxatives, antacids, and antidiarrheal agents, are used short term.
Women who breastfeed should be aware of the risks of taking any medications, whether prescription or nonprescription.
There is little information describing transfer into breast milk for many of these products.
Cimetidine, atropine, cascara, cisapride, loperamide, magnesium sulfate, and senna are the only products identified by the AAP as compatible with breast feeding.
Metoclopramide is listed by the AAP as a drug whose effect on nursing infants is unknown but may be of potential concern, although studies published to date have not reported any adverse effects.
The safest laxatives and antidiarrheals are those that are not absorbed and should be considered first-line therapy for conditions of constipation or loose stools.
Famotidine and nizatidine are excreted into breast milk to a lesser extent than cimetidine or ranitidine and may be the preferred histamine antagonists.
Despite the limited data on the use of cisapride in nursing women, it is considered safe by the AAP and may be preferred over metoclopramide for first-line prescription treatment of heartburn.
Although most of these agents appear safe in the nursing infant, caretakers should be aware of the potential adverse reactions that may occur in infants whose mothers require these products.
Hamid S, Rojter S, Vierling J. Protracted cholestatic hepatitis after the use of prostata [letter].
Ann Intern Med 1997;127(2):169-70.
Haraguchi M, Calore EE, Dagli ML, Cavaliere MJ, Calore NM, Weg R, Raspantini PC, Gorniak SL.
Muscle atrophy induced in broiler chicks by parts of Senna occidentalis seeds.
Vet Res Commun 1998;22(4):265-71.
Senna occidentalis (formerly Cassia occidentalis) is a common contaminant of agricultural commodities.
It is toxic to cattle and poultry, reportedly being responsible for skeletal myodegeneration in these animals.
All parts of the plant present toxicity, but the seeds are the most toxic.
The toxin(s) responsible for the myodegeneration have not been definitively identified, nor is it known which part of the seeds is most toxic.
Intoxication by this plant leads to weight loss with considerable economic repercussions.
The effects of the whole seed and of parts of S. occidentalis seeds (1% in commercial feed) were compared on the pectoralis major muscle of broiler chicks intoxicated from birth until 22 days of life.
There were severe clinical signals and reduced body weight in birds that received the external tegment of the seed, whereas no adverse effects were observed in birds that received the whole seed or other parts of the seed.
Histological and morphometric studies showed an intense muscle fibre atrophy (both type 1 and type 2 fibres were affected) in the group that received 1% external tegment.
This study may be the first step to identifying the substance(s) involved in this pathological process.
Haraguchi M, Gorniak SL, Calore EE, Cavaliere MJ, Raspantini PC, Calore NM, Dagli ML. Muscle degeneration in chicks caused by Senna occidentalis seeds.
Avian Pathol 1998;27(4):346-51.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
Acute intoxication with Senna occidentalis seeds was studied in chicks.
Seven-day-old chicks were fed ground dried seeds of this plant mixed with regular chicken ration at a concentration of 4% by weight for 15 days.
Feed intake and body weight were markedly affected and a high level of lethality was observed.
Necropsy examination of chicks from the experimental group revealed paleness and atrophy of thoracic muscles.
Degenerative and necrotic fibres were observed in skeletal muscle by histological examination.
Muscle histochemistry showed accumulation of lipids and numerous acid phosphatase-positive muscle fibres.
Electron microscopy revealed atrophic muscle fibres, lipid storage, dilatation of the sarcoplasmic reticulum and abnormal mitochondria.
Hasegawa S, Nakayama K, Iwakiri K, An E, Gomi S, Dan K, Katsumata M, Minami M, Wakabayashi I. Herbal medicine-associated lead intoxication.
Intern Med 1997;36(1):56-8.
A female patient visited our hospital with abdominal pain and anemia.
Examination for a gastrointestinal disease gave no diagnostic information.
Laboratory studies of the parameters of heme biosynthesis revealed an enzymatic inhibition by lead.
The diagnosis of lead poisoning was confirmed by detection of an elevated blood lead level.
Excessive lead ingestion was thought to be caused by herbal medicines and/or by an earthen teapot.
Hata M, Sasaki E, Ota M, Fujimoto K, Yajima J, Shichida T, Honda M. Allergic contact dermatitis from curcumin (turmeric).
Contact Dermatitis 1997;36(2):107-8.
Heki U, Fujimura M, Ogawa H, Matsuda T, Kitagawa M. Pneumonitis caused by saikokeisikankyou-tou, an herbal drug.
Intern Med 1997;36(3):214-7.
A 57-year-old man was admitted to our hospital because of dyspnea and abnormal shadow on chest roentgenogram.
He had received two herbal drugs: Saikokeisikankyou-tou (SKT) for one month and Licium Halimifolium Mil (LHM) for two weeks.
After admission, all medication was stopped and his symptoms were gradually diminished.
Transbronchial lung biopsy specimens showed interstitial pneumonia.
Lymphocyte stimulation test, skin test and challenge test were positive to these herbal drugs.
We diagnosed him as drug-induced pneumonitis.
This is the first report on pneumonitis caused by Saikokeisikankyou-tou diagnosed by lymphocyte stimulation test, skin test and challenge test.
Higenbottam TW.
Bronchiolitis obliterans following the ingestion of an Asian shrub leaf.
Thorax 1997;52(Suppl 3):68-72.
Hilepo JN, Bellucci AG, Mossey RT. Acute renal failure caused by 'cat's claw' herbal remedy in a patient with systemic lupus erythematosus [letter].
Nephron 1997;77(3):361.
Hofman M, Diaz JE, Martella C. Oil of wintergreen overdose [letter].
Ann Emerg Med 1998;31(6):793-4.
Holland EG, Degruy FV. Drug-induced disorders [see comments].
Am Fam Physician 1997;56(7):1781-8, 1791-2.
Recent estimates suggest that each year more than 1 million patients are injured while in the hospital and approximately 180,000 die because of these injuries.
Furthermore, drug-related morbidity and mortality are common and are estimated to cost more than $136 billion a year.
The most common type of drug-induced disorder is dose-dependent and predictable.
Many adverse drug events occur as a result of drug-drug, drug-disease or drug-food interactions and, therefore, are preventable.
Clinicians' awareness of the agents that commonly cause drug-induced disorders and recognition of compromised organ function can significantly decrease the likelihood that an adverse event will occur.
Patient assessment should include a thorough medication history, including an analysis of all prescribed and over-the-counter medications, vitamins, herbs and "health-food" products to identify drug-induced problems and potentially reversible conditions.
An increased awareness among clinicians of drug-induced disorders should maximize their recognition and minimize their incidence.
Hsu HY, Lin CC, Chen JY, Yang JJ, Zhang R. Toxic effects of Erycibe obtusifolia, a Chinese medicinal herb, in mice.
J Ethnopharmacol 1998;62(2):101-5.
Extract of stem of Erycibe obtusifolia (EO) at doses of 10, 20 and 30 mg/kg was experimentally tested through oral and intraperitoneal administration.
Toxic effects of EO were assessed through functional changes of the liver and kidneys.
Mice died immediately following the i.p. injection at the dose of 10 mg/kg.
However, no death occurred after the oral administration at the dose of 10, 20 or 30 mg/kg under close observations for at least 2 weeks.
Changes of several functional parameters in both the liver and kidney appeared simultaneously after the oral administration.
Although the higher dose increased the levels of serum glutamate-oxalate-transaminase (sGOT), serum glutamate-pyruvate-transaminase (sGPT), and blood urea nitrogen (BUN), and decreased the levels of hematocrit at 6 h after the treatment, no distinct dose-dependent relationship existed between the administered doses and the changes in functional parameters observed.
Hullar TE, Sapers BL, Ridker PM, Jenkins RL, Huth TS, Farraye FA. Herbal toxicity and fatal hepatic failure [letter].
Am J Med 1999;106(2):267-8.
Hung OL, Shih RD, Chiang WK, Nelson LS, Hoffman RS, Goldfrank LR. Herbal preparation use among urban emergency department patients.
Acad Emerg Med 1997;4(3):209-13.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the prevalence of herbal preparation use among patients presenting to an urban teaching hospital ED. METHODS: A prospective anonymous survey on herbal preparation use was performed.
Consecutive, acutely ill or injured adult (
The survey also asked for information related to patient age, ethnicity, gender, employment, education, cigarette smoking history, ethanol consumption, use of illicit drugs, chief complaint, and HIV status.
RESULTS: Of 2,473 eligible subjects, 623 (25%) participated.
The overall reported prevalence of herbal preparation use among the participants was 21.7%.
Women were more likely to use herbal preparations than men (28.5% vs 17.2%, p = 0.013).
Prevalence rates in different ethnic populations were: whites, 18.2%; Hispanics, 13.9%; blacks, 26.4%; and Asians, 36.8%.
Asians had a significantly higher use rate than the other ethnic groups (p = 0.039).
Neither HIV positivity, educational level, employment status, nor age was significantly associated with herbal preparation use.
The most commonly reported herbal preparations were goldenseal tea, garlic, and ginger.
Several of the herbal preparations reported as used by patients in this study have been associated with severe systemic toxicity in the medical literature.
CONCLUSION: Although the survey response rate was low, the prevalence of herbal preparation use among acutely ill or injured patients presenting to this urban ED remains significant.
A directed history toward specific herbal preparation use may provide relevant pharmacologic information and uncover cases of herbal-preparation-induced toxicity.
Izzat MB, Yim AP, El-Zufari MH.
A taste of Chinese medicine! Ann Thorac Surg 1998;66(3):941-2.
We report a case of profound anticoagulation caused by interaction between warfarin and danshen, a widely used Chinese herbal medicine, in a patient who had undergone mitral valve replacement.
Patients taking warfarin should be warned not to take this herb.
In addition, physicians should be alert to the possibility of an interaction with herbal medicine when anticoagulation control becomes difficult and no other causes are apparent.
Jappe U, Bonnekoh B, Hausen BM, Gollnick H. Garlic-related dermatoses: case report and review of the literature.
Am J Contact Dermat 1999;10(1):37-9.
BACKGROUND: Garlic is widely appreciated as a spice and as a vegetable as well as an over-the-counter phytotherapeutic.
From a dermato-allergological standpoint, several garlic-related adverse reactions have to be distinguished.
OBJECTIVE: The corresponding literature is reviewed briefly, with regard to our present observation of a cook, who contracted garlic-induced contact dermatitis being analyzed for its complex pathomechanism.
METHODS: The patient showed a positive type-IV patch test reaction for diallyl disulfide, a low molecular weight garlic ingredient; and strong, non-irritant reactions after 20 min and 24 hrs in the scratch chamber test with fresh total garlic.
RESULTS: Thus, in this case of an occupational dermatosis, protein contact dermatitis had to be considered, as well as allergic type-IV contact dermatitis as a co-existing pathomechanism.
CONCLUSIONS: The spectrum of garlic-related adverse reactions comprises irritant contact dermatitis, with the rare variant of zosteriform dermatitis; induction of pemphigus, allergic asthma and rhinitis; contact urticaria; protein contact dermatitis; allergic contact dermatitis, including the hematogenic variant; as well as combinations thereof, as evidenced by our present case observation.
Jappe U, Franke I, Reinhold D, Gollnick HP. Sebotropic drug reaction resulting from kava-kava extract therapy: a new entity? J Am Acad Dermatol 1998;38(1):104-6.
Jensen-Jarolim E, Leitner A, Hirschwehr R, Kraft D, Wuthrich B, Scheiner O, Graf J, Ebner C. Characterization of allergens in Apiaceae spices: anise, fennel, coriander and cumin.
Clin Exp Allergy 1997;27(11):1299-306.
BACKGROUND: Symptoms elicited by IgE-mediated food allergy range from mild local to severe systemic reactions.
Allergens in spices are particularly dangerous due to their hidden presence in many dishes.
OBJECTIVES AND METHODS: According to clinical observations, mugwort and birch pollen allergy, and hypersensitivity to spices are frequently associated, but the crossreacting compounds were not defined so far.
We tested sera of 15 patients who experienced adverse reactions to spiced food and characterized their IgE-binding patterns on anise, fennel, coriander and cumin extracts through immunoblot and inhibition experiments.
RESULTS: The use of anti-Bet v 1 (MoAb) and anti-profilin (rabbit) antibodies revealed the presence of crossreacting allergens in the tested spice extracts.
Inhibition experiments showed that IgE-binding to allergens in Apiaceae spices could be blocked by preincubation of sera with rBet v 1 or rBet v 2 (birch profilin).
Moreover, we detected crossreacting allergenic molecules in the molecular weight range of 60 kDa. IgE-binding to spice allergens occurred only with sera of 10/15 (66%) patients with allergy to pollen (birch, mugwort) and/or celeriac.
In five out of 15 (33%) patients with a history of adverse reaction to spices, but without pollen and celeriac allergy, no IgE-binding to any spice protein could be demonstrated.
It is possible that these clinical reactions could be elicited by other types of hypersensitivity (Type II, III, IV), however, as spices contain highly reactive substances, the symptoms may most likely be classified as food-intolerant.
CONCLUSIONS: Bet v 1- and profilin-related allergens may, besides higher molecular weight allergenic molecules, be responsible for Type I allergy to anise, fennel, coriander or cumin, members of the Apiaceae.
Jensen-Jarolim E, Reider N, Fritsch R, Breiteneder H. Fatal outcome of anaphylaxis to camomile-containing enema during labor: a case study.
J Allergy Clin Immunol 1998;102(6 Pt 1):1041-2.
Jones TK, Lawson BM. Profound neonatal congestive heart failure caused by maternal consumption of blue cohosh herbal medication.
J Pediatr 1998;132(3 Pt 1):550-2.
A newborn infant whose mother ingested an herbal medication, blue cohosh, to promote uterine contractions presented with acute myocardial infarction associated with profound congestive heart failure and shock.
The infant remained critically ill for several weeks, although he eventually recovered.
Other causes of myocardial infarction were carefully excluded.
Blue cohosh, Caulophyllum thalictroides, contains vasoactive glycosides and an alkaloid known to produce toxic effects on the myocardium of laboratory animals.
We believe this represents the first described case of deleterious human fetal effects from maternal consumption of blue cohosh.
Joo JS, Ehrenpreis ED, Gonzalez L, Kaye M, Breno S, Wexner SD, Zaitman D, Secrest K. Alterations in colonic anatomy induced by chronic stimulant laxatives: the cathartic colon revisited.
J Clin Gastroenterol 1998;26(4):283-6.
Cathartic colon is a historic term for the anatomic alteration of the colon secondary to chronic stimulant laxative use.
Because some have questioned whether this is a real entity, we investigated changes occurring on barium enema in patients ingesting stimulant laxatives.
Our study consisted of two parts.
In part 1, a retrospective review of consecutive barium enemas performed on two groups of patients with chronic constipation (group 1, stimulant laxative use [n=29]; group 2, no stimulant laxative use [n=26]
A data sheet containing classic descriptions of cathartic colon was completed for each study.
Chronic stimulant laxative use was defined as stimulant laxative ingestion more than three times per week for 1 year or longer.
To confirm the findings of the retrospective study, 18 consecutive patients who were chronic stimulant laxative users underwent barium enema examination, and data sheets for cathartic colon were completed by another radiologist (part 2).
Colonic redundancy (group 1, 34.5%; group 2, 19.2%) and dilatation (group 1, 44.8%; group 2, 23.1%) were frequent radiographic findings in both patient groups and were not significantly different in the two groups.
Loss of haustral folds, however, was a common finding in group 1 (27.6%) but was not seen in group 2 (p 
Loss of haustral markings occurred in 15 (40.5%) of the total stimulant laxative users in the two parts of the study and was seen in the left colon of 6 (40%) patients, in the right colon of 2 (13.3%) patients, in the transverse colon of 5 (33.3%) patients, and in the entire colon of 2 (13.3%) patients.
Loss of haustra was seen in patients chronically ingesting bisacodyl, phenolpthalein, senna, and casanthranol.
We conclude that long-term stimulant laxative use results in anatomic changes in the colon characterized by loss of haustral folds, a finding that suggests neuronal injury or damage to colonic longitudinal musculature caused by these agents.
Joselice e Silva M, Alves AJ, Do Nascimento SC. Synthesis and cytotoxic activity of N-substituted thiosemicarbazones of 3-(3,4-methylenedioxy)phenylpropanal.
Farmaco 1998;53(3):241-3.
Five new N-substituted thiosemicarbazones of 3-(3,4-methylenedioxy)phenylpropanal were synthesized.
Safrole, a natural product obtained from sassafras oil (Ocotea pretiosa), was oxidized to alcohol using BH3-THF and H2O2, followed by oxidation to aldehyde using pyridinium dichromate (PDC) and condensation with five N-substituted derivatives of thiosemicarbazide.
Tests were performed to evaluate the cytotoxic activity with continuous chain KB cells (epidermoide carcinoma of the floor of the mouth).
Compounds 5 and 6 showed IC50 values of 1.5 and 4.6 micrograms/ml, respectively.
Kamiyama T, Nouchi T, Kojima S, Murata N, Ikeda T, Sato C. Autoimmune hepatitis triggered by administration of an herbal medicine.
Am J Gastroenterol 1997;92(4):703-4.
Although herbal medicines are believed to be safe with few side effects, there are several reports on drug-induced liver injury caused by them.
However, there are no reports of autoimmune hepatitis triggered by herbal medicines.
We report here the case of a patient with autoimmune hepatitis that became clinically apparent after administration of Dai-saiko-to (Da-Chai-Hu-Tang), an herbal medicine that is used as a standard medicine in Japan.
Kaplowitz N. Hepatotoxicity of herbal remedies: insights into the intricacies of plant-animal warfare and cell death [editorial; comment].
Gastroenterology 1997;113(4):1408-12.
Kobayashi F, Nakamura H, Numata M, Wasada M, Shiraishi K, Itakura M, Matsuzaki S.
[A case of drug-induced liver injury caused by Saiko-Keishi-Kankyoto with thrombocytopenia].
Nippon Shokakibyo Gakkai Zasshi 1997;94(10):681-6.
(Jpn)
Koh D, Lee BL, Ong HY, Ong CN. Colophony in topical traditional Chinese medicaments.
Contact Dermatitis 1997;37(5):243.
Larrey D. Hepatotoxicity of herbal remedies.
J Hepatol 1997;26(Suppl 1):47-51.
Lee CT, Wu MS, Lu K, Hsu KT. Renal tubular acidosis, hypokalemic paralysis, rhabdomyolysis, and acute renal failure--a rare presentation of Chinese herbal nephropathy.
Ren Fail 1999;21(2):227-30.
We encountered a 66-year-old Chinese man presented with hypokalemic paralysis, rhabdomyolysis and acute renal failure after administration of mixed Chinese herbs.
Proximal renal tubular acidosis and selective glucosuria were the main tubular dysfunctions.
The renal failure recovered smoothly and rapidly after resuscitation and the tubular function abnormalities regained spontaneously after medicine withdrawal.
It should be recognized that renal tubular acidosis with hypokalemic paralysis, rhabdomyolysis and subsequent acute renal failure may develop after taking Chinese mixed herbal medicine.
Leow YH. Contact dermatitis due to topical traditional Chinese medication.
Clin Dermatol 1997;15(4):601-5.
Lerner JH. Herbal therapy: there are risks.
RN 1997;60(8):53-4.
Levi M, Guchelaar HJ, Woerdenbag HJ, Zhu YP. Acute hepatitis in a patient using a Chinese herbal tea--a case report.
Pharm World Sci 1998;20(1):43-4.
A case is presented of reversible acute hepatitis in a patient using a Chinese herbal tea.
Upon identification of the tea mixture Aristolochia species, including A. debilis, which contains the highly toxic aristolochic acid, could be identified.
We conclude that the acute hepatitis as described in this patient is most likely to be caused by (one of) the active ingredients of the Chinese herbal tea.
Furthermore, this case illustrates that so-called natural products can cause unexpected severe adverse reactions.
Liao YL, Chiang YC, Tsai TF, Lee RF, Chan YC, Hsiao CH.
Contact leukomelanosis induced by the leaves of Piper betle L. (Piperaceae): a clinical and histopathologic survey.
J Am Acad Dermatol 1999;40(4):583-9.
BACKGROUND: In April 1997, an unusual pigmentary disorder was noticed by dermatologists in Taiwan.
All patients had a history of using facial dressings with steamed leaves of Piper betle L. (Piperaceae).
OBJECTIVE: Our purpose was to clarify the evolution and the origin of this unique leukomelanosis.
METHODS: Fifteen patients with an unusual pigmentary disorder, who visited our clinic in September and October 1997, were asked to complete a questionnaire designed to elicit the history related to the disorder.
Eight of these 15 patients underwent skin biopsies: 6 on the mottled hyperpigmented area (group A) and 2 on the hypopigmented area (group B).
All 8 specimens were prepared with hematoxylin-eosin, Masson-Fontana, and S-100 stains.
RESULTS: The results of the questionnaire revealed that these patients had all experienced a temporary erythematous reaction in the first few days of the use of the facial dressing, and 9 of them also complained of an accompanying stinging sensation.
A bleaching effect became noticeable approximately 1 week to 1 month later.
Eight patients reported that the hyperpigmentation and confetti-like hypopigmentation occurred after overexposure to the sun.
In both groups, histopathologic examination revealed some melanophages in the dermis.
Masson-Fontana staining of specimens from group A showed local interspersed depigmentation and hyperpigmentation in the basal epidermis and pigmentary incontinence in the dermis.
This picture was different from the homogeneous depigmentation within basal epidermis in specimens from group B.
In both groups, S-100 staining was negative for melanocytes in the depigmented area.
CONCLUSION: The clinical course and histopathologic findings suggest that the evolution of this pigmentary disorder can be divided into 3 stages.
The first stage is the immediate bleaching stage, when an irritant reaction is usually conspicuous.
The second stage consists of prominent hyperpigmentation visible both grossly and microscopically.
The final stage is characterized by confetti-like depigmentation.
It may be induced by chemicals in the betel leaves such as phenol, catechol, and benzene derivatives, perhaps through inhibition of melanin synthesis or melanocytotoxicity.
Liaudet L, Buclin T, Jaccard C, Eckert P. Severe ergotism associated with interaction between ritonavir and ergotamine.
Br Med J 1999 Mar 20;318:771.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP Severe ergotism attributed to an interaction of 600 mg of ritonavir every 12 h for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection and 0.3 mg ergotamine tartrate twice daily, taken as a combination product with 0.2 mg of belladonna extract and 20 mg of phenobarbital for gastric discomfort, is reported in a 28-yr-old female patient; the patient was also receiving 20 mg/day of fluoxetine for depression.
On admission, treatment with intravenous sodium nitroprusside, heparin, and morphine was started.
Peridural anesthesia was needed for intractable pain.
After 3 days she developed cyanosis and edema in both legs.
Intravenous nifedipine, iloprost, and nitrates were also given, but she developed bilateral gangrene of the toes, necessitating transmetatarsal amputation 5 wk later.
A proposed mechanism for this interaction, and the possible role of fluoxetine in this severe reaction, are also discussed.
Lichtensteiger CA, Johnston NA, Beasley VR. Rhamnus cathartica (buckthorn) hepatocellular toxicity in mice.
Toxicol Pathol 1997;25(5):449-52.
The toxicity of the plant Rhamnus cathartica was assessed in mice after the plant was identified as a potential cause of an idiopathic neurologic disease in horses.
Another member of the Rhamnaceae family, Karwinskia humboldtiana, is neurotoxic to mammals and birds and can induce hepatic degeneration and necrosis.
To investigate the toxicity of R. cathartica, a 34-day feeding trial in mice was conducted using a complete rodent diet with 0, 5, or 25% added R. cathartica.
No clinical signs or gross lesions were seen, and all major tissues were histologically normal except the liver.
The livers of mice fed R. cathartica had marked hepatocellular swelling.
Results from periodic acid-Schiff reaction staining and from electron microscopy confirmed that the swelling was due to deposits of monoparticulate glycogen (beta particles) in the cytoplasm.
Glycogen deposition is an uncommon toxic change in cells.
Apparently, compound(s) in R. cathartica directly or indirectly interfered with glycogen metabolism (either glycogenesis or glycogenolysis).
Mechanistic and chronicity studies with R. cathartica are needed to investigate the pathophysiology of the glycogen disturbance and to determine if hepatic injury progresses and if other organs will be injured.
Lopez-Rubio A, Rodriguez J, Crespo JF, Vives R, Daroca P, Reano M. Occupational asthma caused by exposure to asparagus: detection of allergens by immunoblotting.
Allergy 1998;53(12):1216-20.
BACKGROUND: Vegetables of the Liliaceae family, such as garlic or onion, have been reported to cause occupational asthma.
However, there are few data on adverse reactions to asparagus.
We evaluated the role of asparagus as a cause of asthma in a patient with respiratory symptoms occurring at work (horticulture) and studied relevant allergens.
METHODS: A 28-year-old man complained of rhinoconjunctivitis and asthma when harvesting asparagus at work.
Eating cooked asparagus did not provoke symptoms.
A positive skin test reaction was observed with raw asparagus, Alternaria alternata, and grass-pollen extracts.
The methacholine test demonstrated mild bronchial hyperresponsiveness.
The patient had an immediate asthmatic response after challenge with raw asparagus extract.
Bronchial provocation tests with boiled asparagus, A. alternata, and control extracts were negative.
Two unexposed subjects with seasonal allergic asthma did not react to the raw asparagus extract.
RESULTS: The double-blind, placebo-controlled food challenge with raw asparagus was negative.
Serum asparagus-specific IgE was 13.9 kU(A)/l.
By SDS-PAGE immunoblot, at least six IgE-binding components, ranging from 22 to 73 kDa, were detected only in raw asparagus.
CONCLUSIONS: We report a case of occupational asthma caused by asparagus inhalation, confirmed by specific bronchoprovocation.
Immunoblot analysis showed that asparagus allergens are very labile and quite sensitive to heat denaturation.
Luty S, Latuszynska J, Halliop J, Tochman A, Obuchowska D, Przylepa E, Korczak E. Toxicity of dermally applied alpha-cypermethrin in rats.
Ann Agric Environ Med 1998;5(2):109-16.
The aim of the study was to assess the immunotoxic effect of dermally applied alpha-cypermethrin in rats based on phagocytic and bactericidal activity of neutrophils of peripheral blood, and the general toxic effect based on histological and ultrastructural examination of internal organs.
The preparation was dermally applied in doses of 50 mg/kg and 250 mg/kg.
It was administered to the tail skin of female Wistar rats, 4 hours daily for 28 days.
After the experiment, the animals were anaesthetized and heart blood was taken in order to evaluate the activity of granulocyte system.
The following organs were taken for histological examinations: brain, lung, heart, liver, spleen, kidneys, thymus and lymphatic nodes.
Lung, liver, kidney and heart were used for ultrastructural studies.
The results of the study showed that bactericidal and phagocytic activity of neutrophils was stimulated after administration of 50 mg/kg alpha-cypermethrin.
Dermal application of the preparation resulted in slight histological changes in liver, kidney, lung and brain.
Pathological changes in heart were observed only on the level of ultrastructure.
Mack RB. "Boldly they rode ... into the mouth of hell".
Pennyroyal oil toxicity.
N C Med J 1997;58(6):456-7.
Malak J. Chinese herb nephropathy is not a (dex)fenfluramine nephropathy but a serotonin nephropathy [letter; comment].
J Altern Complement Med 1998;4(2):131-2.
Manteiga R, Park DL, Ali SS.
Risks associated with consumption of herbal teas.
Rev Environ Contam Toxicol 1997;150:1-30.
Plants have been used for medicinal purposes for centuries.
Health-oriented individuals are turning to herbal teas as alternatives to caffeinated beverages such as coffee, tea, and cocoa and for low-caloric supplements.
The popularity of herbal tea consumption has increased significantly during the past two decades in the U.S. Hundreds of different teas made up of varied mixtures of roots, leaves, seeds, barks, or other parts of shrubs, vines, or trees are sold in health food stores.
Although chemists have been characterizing toxic plant constituents for over 100 years, toxicological studies of herbal teas have been limited and, therefore, the safety of many of these products is unknown.
Plants synthesize secondary metabolites that are not essential in the production of energy and whose role may be in the defense mechanisms as plant toxins to their interactions with other plants, herbivores, and parasites.
Pyrrolizidine alkaloids (PAs) were among the first naturally occurring carcinogens identified in plant products, and their presence in herbal teas is a matter of public health significance.
Some herbal tea mixtures and single-ingredient herbal teas have been analyzed for toxic/mutagenic potential by bioassay and chromatographic techniques.
Numerous human and animal intoxications have been associated with naturally occurring components, including pyrrolizidine alkaloids, tannins, and safrole.
Thus, the prevention of human exposure to carcinogens or mutagens present in herbal tea mixture extracts is crucial.
Preparation of infusion drinks prepared from plants appears to concentrate biologically active compounds and is a major source of PA poisoning.
The quantity and consumption over a long period of time is of major concern.
It is recommended that widespread consumption of herbal infusions should be minimized until data on the levels and varieties of carcinogens, mutagens, and toxicants are made available.
Martin CM.
It's only natural: herbal remedies claim their niche.
Consult Pharm 1997 Jun;12:631-6.
IPA COPYRIGHT: ASHP An overview of herbal medicines is presented, including research, regulatory issues, and possible benefits and adverse events associated with the use of these popular remedies.
Lists of herbs to avoid and resources for natural medicines are presented.
Many of the popular herbs on the market that are considered common home remedies are discussed.
Herbal dangers with Ginkgo biloba and ginseng are specifically addressed.
Matsuda R, Takahashi D, Chiba E, Kawana I, Tomiyama M, Ebira H, Ikegami T, Kitamura H, Ishii M. [A case of drug induced hepatitis and interstitial pneumonia caused by a herbal drug, Dai-saiko-to].
Nippon Shokakibyo Gakkai Zasshi 1997;94(11):787-91.
(Jpn)
Matsushima T. [Drug-induced pneumonitis and related diseases].
Nippon Naika Gakkai Zasshi 1997;86(3):457-62.
(Jpn)
Mccain WC, Lee R, Johnson MS, Whaley JE, Ferguson JW, Beall P, Leach G. Acute oral toxicity study of pyridostigmine bromide, permethrin, and DEET in the laboratory rat.
J Toxicol Environ Health 1997;50(2):113-24.
This study investigated the lethal interaction of pyridostigmine bromide (PB), permethrin, and DEET when given to adult male rats by gavage and was separated into two phases.
Phase I determined the acute oral lethal dose-response relationship of each compound with the vehicle, propylene glycol.
Phase II was divided into two portions: a dose-response study using probit units obtained from phase I [lethal dose (LD) 16, 30, 50, 70, and 84], and an interaction study that contained low levels (calculated LD16, additive LD32) of the two compounds while the concentration of the third compound was varied.
Rats were fasted overnight, dosed, and observed for 14 d.
A significant increase in lethality occurred when PB, permethrin, and DEET were given concurrently when compared to expected additive values.
Furthermore, solutions containing PB and permethrin or PB and DEET also caused a significant increase in lethality when compared to expected additive values.
This information suggests that lethality in this study was more than an additive effect.
McGovern TW, Barkley TM. Botanical briefs: leafy spurge--Euphorbia esula l.
Cutis 1998;62(5):221-2.
McGovern TW, Barkley TM. Botanical briefs: Peruvian lily--Alstroemeria (L.) spp. Cutis 1999;63(3):137-8.
McGovern TW, Barkley TM. Botanical briefs: stinging nettle-Urtical dioica L. Cutis 1998;62(2):63-4.
McGovern TW, Barkley TM. Botanical dermatology.
Int J Dermatol 1998;37(5):321-34.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM LITERATURE REVIEW HUMAN BOTANICAL DERMATOLOGY DERMATOLOGY CONTACT URTICARIA DERMATITIS PHYTOPHOTODERMATITIS ALLERGIC CONTACT DERMATITIS OCCUPATIONAL PLANT DERMATOSIS INTEGUMENTARY SYSTEM DISEASE IMMUNE SYSTEM DISEASE.
McIntyre M. Chinese herbs: risk, side effects, and poisoning: the case for objective reporting and analysis reveals serious misrepresentation [comment] [see comments]
J Altern Complement Med 1998;4(1):15-6.
Mennecier D, Saloum T, Dourthe PM, Bronstein JA, Thiolet C, Farret O. [Acute hepatitis after phytotherapy (letter)].
Presse Med 1999;28(18):966.
(Fre)
Miller CA.
How safe are herbs? Geriatr Nurs 1998;19(3):163-4.
Miller LG. Herbal medicinals: selected clinical considerations focusing on known or potential drug-herb interactions.
Arch Intern Med 1998;158(20):2200-11.
Herbal medicinals are being used by an increasing number of patients who typically do not advise their clinicians of concomitant use.
Known or potential drug-herb interactions exist and should be screened for.
If used beyond 8 weeks, Echinacea could cause hepatotoxicity and therefore should not be used with other known hepatoxic drugs, such as anabolic steroids, amiodarone, methotrexate, and ketoconazole.
However, Echinacea lacks the 1,2 saturated necrine ring associated with hepatoxicity of pyrrolizidine alkaloids.
Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs may negate the usefulness of feverfew in the treatment of migraine headaches.
Feverfew, garlic, Ginkgo, ginger, and ginseng may alter bleeding time and should not be used concomitantly with warfarin sodium.
Additionally, ginseng may cause headache, tremulousness, and manic episodes in patients treated with phenelzine sulfate.
Ginseng should also not be used with estrogens or corticosteroids because of possible additive effects.
Since the mechanism of action of St John wort is uncertain, concomitant use with monoamine oxidase inhibitors and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors is ill advised.
Valerian should not be used concomitantly with barbiturates because excessive sedation may occur.
Kyushin, licorice, plantain, uzara root, hawthorn, and ginseng may interfere with either digoxin pharmacodynamically or with digoxin monitoring.
Evening primrose oil and borage should not be used with anticonvulsants because they may lower the seizure threshold.
Shankapulshpi, an Ayurvedic preparation, may decrease phenytoin levels as well as diminish drug efficacy.
Kava when used with alprazolam has resulted in coma.
Immunostimulants (eg, Echinacea and zinc) should not be given with immunosuppressants (eg, corticosteroids and cyclosporine).
Tannic acids present in some herbs (eg, St John wort and saw palmetto) may inhibit the absorption of iron.
Kelp as a source of iodine may interfere with thyroid replacement therapies.
Licorice can offset the pharmacological effect of spironolactone.
Numerous herbs (eg, karela and ginseng) may affect blood glucose levels and should not be used in patients with diabetes mellitus.
Mochitomi Y, Inoue A, Kawabata H, Ishida S, Kanzaki T. Stevens-Johnson syndrome caused by a health drink (Eberu) containing ophiopogonis tuber.
J Dermatol 1998;25(10):662-5.
Stevens-Johnson syndrome is considered to be a severe type of erythema exsudativum multiforme.
It is characterized by erythema with bullous and eroded lesions of skin and mucous membranes.
We report a case of Steven-Johnson syndrome following consumption of a health drink containing ophiopogonis tuber.
A 66-year-old female took an O.T.C. health drink for fever.
The next morning, she noted erythema and swelling of her face, neck, and chest.
She started to develop bullous and eroded lesions on the skin of her entire body and the mucous membranes of her oral cavity, conjunctiva, and cornea, and she became feverish.
She had high degrees of corneal erosion and liver dysfunction.
Skin biopsy showed diffuse necrosis of the epidermis.
After admission to the hospital, steroid pulse therapy (1000 mg/day of methylprednisolone sodium succinate) was continued for 5 days.
The health drink induced a positive drug lymphocyte stimulation test (DLST) and patch test.
A challenge test was done with a one hundredth dose, and it was positive.
We did patch tests with all components of the drink and found that Mai-Meu-Dong-Tang (ophiopogonis) alone was positive at 72 hours.
There is no previous report of Stevens-Johnson syndrome caused by a health drink or Mai-Meu-Dong-Tang.
Even though it is a health drink, we should be aware of the possibility of a severe reaction.
Moore DA, Moore NL.
Paediatric enema syndrome in a rural African setting.
Ann Trop Paediatr 1998;18(2):139-44.
We have observed a distinct clinical syndrome amongst acutely unwell children frequently associated with the administration of a traditional medicine enema.
We describe the clinicopathological features of this 'enema syndrome' based on retrospective case note review of 50 consecutive admissions to a South African rural district hospital.
Admission was frequently prompted by sudden, marked clinical deterioration following enema administration (68% seen within 24 h).
Respiratory distress with tachypnoea, abdominal distension, hypotonia and loss of consciousness occurred frequently.
In-hospital mortality was 28% and was higher in those receiving herbal (43%) rather than chemical (21%) enemas.
Hyperkalaemia, leucocytosis (
Diagnosis of an underlying illness was established in 78%.
Whilst the majority of enemas are given without incident, children struggling with an underlying illness may be unable to tolerate rectally administered traditional medicines.
Toxic chemical substances in frequent use may increase complication rates.
Moss TM. Herbal medicine in the emergency department: a primer for toxicities and treatment.
J Emerg Nurs 1998;24(6):509-13.
Herbal therapies are very safe, and side effects are uncommon.
Side effects requiring ED treatment are rare and would most likely involve an allergic reaction or toxic effect from improper administration of the herb.
However, a working knowledge of possible side effects of herbal therapies can be helpful in those rare instances.
Simple treatment options with herbal teas are also suggested as an adjunct to medical therapies in certain instances.
Mukhopadhyay MJ, Saha A, Dutta A, De B, Mukherjee A. Genotoxicity of sennosides on the bone marrow cells of mice.
Food Chem Toxicol 1998;36(11):937-40.
Preparations of a number of plants which contain hydroxyanthraquinones as active constituents are used worldwide for their laxative effect.
Anthraquinone glycosides of Cassia angustifolia and C. fistula were investigated for their ability to induce a clastogenic effect on the bone marrow cells of Swiss albino mice.
The endpoints screened were chromosomal aberrations and frequency of aberrant cells.
Oral exposure to doses of these anthraquinones and their equivalent amount in leaf and pod extracts did not induce significant numbers of chromosomal aberrations or aberrant cells.
The results indicate that anthraquinone sennoside B and rhein are weakly genotoxic.
Mullins ME, Horowitz BZ.
The case of the salad shooters: intravenous injection of wild lettuce extract.
Vet Hum Toxicol 1998;40(5):290-1.
Three young adult drug users obtained wild lettuce and valerian root, prepared a crude aqueous extract of the wild lettuce, and injected the extract i.v.
One also injected an alcohol extract of the valerian root.
All 3 rapidly became ill with fevers, chills, abdominal pain, flank and back pain, neck stiffness, headache, leucocytosis and mild liver function abnormalities, but recovered over the next 3 d. Various literature and internet sources claim that wild lettuce has opiate properties not demonstrated in this case.
Mullins RJ. Echinacea-associated anaphylaxis.
Med J Aust 1998;168(4):170-1.
A woman with atopy experienced anaphylaxis after taking, among other dietary supplements, a commercial extract of echinacea.
Hypersensitivity was confirmed by skinprick and RAST testing.
Regular ingestion of echinacea by up to 5% of surveyed patients with atopy, combined with detection of echinacea-binding IgE in atopic subjects (19% by skin testing; 20% with moderate to strong reactivity by RAST testing), raises the possibility of severe allergic reactions, even with first-time use, due to cross-reactivity with other structurally similar allergens.
Patients with atopy should be cautioned about the risk of developing life-threatening reactions to complementary medicines, including echinacea.
Murphy JM. Preoperative considerations with herbal medicines.
AORN J 1999;69(1):173-5, 177-8, 180-3.
More patients are using herbal remedies.
Even though herbs are natural products, they often act like medications and may interact with or potentiate other medications.
During a preoperative evaluation, nurses should ask patients about their use of herbal remedies.
Certain herbs are dangerous and should never be taken, and others must be avoided before elective surgery.
Today's perioperative health care professionals must become familiar with basic information about herbs to carry out thorough assessments.
At times, caregivers may need to educate and counsel consumers about benefits and harmful aspects of herbal preparations.
Musk SR, Clapham P, Johnson IT. Cytotoxicity and genotoxicity of diallyl sulfide and diallyl disulfide towards Chinese hamster ovary cells.
Food Chem Toxicol 1997;35(3-4):379-85.
Two compounds found in garlic, diallyl sulfide (DAS) and diallyl disulfide (DDS), were tested for cytotoxic and genotoxic effects in a Chinese hamster ovary cell line.
DDS was found to be more cytotoxic than DAS (showing a Dq of 1.6 micrograms/ml and a D0 of 0.6 microgram/ml as opposed to values of 295 and 90 micrograms/ml, respectively).
Both compounds were found to induce both chromosome aberrations and sister chromatid exchanges (SCEs) with DDS again being more active on a weight-for-weight basis, exhibiting activity at concentrations below 10 micrograms/ml compared with the levels of 300 micrograms/ml and above required for DAS to show any effect.
The addition of rat liver S-9 activation fraction to the assays modified the effects of the two compounds in a non-consistent manner.
It reduced the induction of SCEs by both compounds, enhanced the generation of aberrations by DDS (but not by DAS) and radically altered the parameters of both survival curves, reducing the Dq values almost to zero but increasing the D0 values.
Myers JH, Moro-Sutherland D, Shook JE. Anticholinergic poisoning in colicky infants treated with hyoscyamine sulfate.
Am J Emerg Med 1997;15(5):532-5.
Hyoscyamine, one of the principal alkaloid components of belladonna, is a potent anticholinergic agent.
Because of its anticholinergic properties, hyoscyamine sulfate drops are often prescribed for the treatment of colic in infants.
Anticholinergic poisoning in infants is rare.
However, five cases are reported of infants with anticholinergic toxicity following the administration of hyoscyamine drops for the treatment of colic.
Common presenting symptoms included irritability, tachycardia, and erythematous flushed skin.
These cases emphasize the need for a heightened awareness by emergency physicians and pediatricians of possible anticholinergic toxicity caused by the use of hyoscyamine for infant colic.
Myers SP, Wohlmuth H. Echinacea-associated anaphylaxis [letter].
Med J Aust 1998;168(11):583-4.
Nakai T, Kioka K, Sano K, Aoki T, Moriyoshi Y, Kurai O, Nebiki H, Okawa K, Oka H, Harihara S, et al.
[A case of drug-induced liver injury by Chinese digestive medicine].
Nippon Shokakibyo Gakkai Zasshi 1998;95(12):1374-7.
(Jpn)
Navarro JF, Macia ML, Garcia Perez J.
[The false illusion of medicinal herbs (letter; comment) (see comments)].
Med Clin (Barc) 1997;109(4):159.
(Spa)
Nguyen B, Weytjens K, Cloutier Y, Ghezzo H, Malo JL. Determinants of the bronchial response to high molecular weight occupational agents in a dry aerosol form.
Eur Respir J 1998;12(4):885-8.
In occupational challenge tests with isocyanate vapours, bronchial responsiveness is determined by the total dose rather than the concentration or duration of exposure.
Whether the same applies for high molecular weight (HMW) agents in powder form is unknown.
The aim of this study was to determine whether the total dose of HMW agents in powder form is responsible for the immediate reaction documented in specific challenge tests.
Included in the study were nine subjects (seven males and two females) with a diagnosis of occupational asthma proved by specific challenge tests carried out on a preliminary visit.
Two challenge tests (using a closed-circuit exposure chamber) were performed at an interval of 2 weeks; the concentrations administered in a random order on these two visits were half and double the one that had caused a 20% fall in forced expiratory volume in one second (FEV1) on a preliminary visit.
The duration of exposure was adjusted until a significant fall in FEV1 (target of 20%) occurred.
The two concentrations obtained were significantly different, by 2.07+/-0.36-fold (SD).
The observed durations of exposure leading to a 20% fall in FEV1 on the two visits also differed significantly by 0.46+/-0.32-fold.
Consequently, the cumulative efficient doses were not significantly different between the two visits: 12+/-5.4 and 9+/-5 mg x mL(-1) x min(-1), respectively.
The corresponding cumulative dose ratio was 0.96+/-0.61.
The expected duration of exposure (10.8+/-24 min) was not significantly different from the observed duration (5.4+/-9 min).
The mean and 95% confidence interval for the difference in concentration between the two visits was 1.83-fold (1.48-2.21).
In conclusion, the total dose rather than the concentration or duration of exposure per se determines bronchial responsiveness to high molecular weight agents in powder form.
Nicolie B, Drouet M, Sabbah A. [Chronic rhinitis, or the consequences of gluttony].
Allerg Immunol (Paris) 1997;29(1):22-3.
(Fre)
Ning-Sheng L. Renal involvement in Chinese patients with rheumatoid arthritis [letter].
Ann Rheum Dis 1998;57(9):571.
Nortier JL, Deschodt-Lanckman MM, Simon S, Thielemans NO, De Prez EG, Depierreux MF, Tielemans CL, Richard C, Lauwerys RR, Bernard AM, et al.
Proximal tubular injury in Chinese herbs nephropathy: monitoring by neutral endopeptidase enzymuria.
Kidney Int 1997;51(1):288-93.
Neutral endopeptidase (NEP) is a 94 kDa ectoenzyme of the proximal tubule brush border, physiologically released into the urine with apical membrane fragments.
As proximal tubular atrophy was a histological hallmark of Chinese herbs nephropathy (CHN), this study firstly determined renal excretion of NEP in healthy control subjects (N = 31), in patients with CHN (N = 26) and in women having consumed Chinese herbs and whose renal function was normal but running the risk of developing CHN (N = 27).
Another patient group consisted of female patients with glomerular diseases (N = 12).
At the same time, measurements of urinary microproteins (Clara cell protein, retinol binding protein, beta 2-microglobulin and alpha 1-microglobulin) were performed, as indicators of tubular dysfunction.
Cell damage was estimated by the excretion of N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase (NAG).
In the control group, the physiological NEP enzymuria was 43.1 micrograms/24 hr (geometric mean).
In CHN patients, levels of urinary NEP were significantly decreased in those with moderate renal failure (26.7 micrograms/24 hr; N = 21; P 
In patients at risk as well as in patients with glomerular diseases, urinary NEP levels were not statistically different from those observed in control subjects (40.68 micrograms/24 hr and 48.5 micrograms/24 hr, respectively).
Several degrees of tubular dysfunction and injury were noted in patients groups, as attested by increased urinary microproteins and NAG excretions.
Considering the data from control and CHN patients, NEP enzymuria positively correlated with individual creatinine clearance values (r = 0.76; P = 0.0001) and negatively correlated with urinary microproteins levels (r = -0.55; P = 0.00001).
Finally, NEP was regularly quantitated in the urine of 6 CHN patients for a period ranging from six months to two years and in 19 patients at risk during two years, respectively.
In the first group, renal function progressively deteriorated in 3 patients, leading them to renal replacement therapy after 38 to 115 weeks.
Stable parameters were observed in the remaining 3 patients.
A direct correlation between creatinine clearance and NEP excretion was found longitudinally in each case.
In the second group, no significant change of urinary NEP levels was observed (45.9 micrograms/24 hr), in parallel with stable renal function.
Taken together, these results indicate that, in CHN patients, NEP enzymuria provides a rapid and noninvasive determination of the degree of structural impairment affecting the proximal tubular population and further reflecting the severity of the renal disease.
The interest of this urinary marker in monitoring the progression of other tubulointerstitial diseases remains to be assessed.
O'Breasail AM, Argouarch S. Hypomania and St John's wort [letter].
Can J Psychiatry 1998;43(7):746-7.
Oda H, Ono M, Ohashi H. [Probable case of Chinese herbs nephropathy].
Nippon Naika Gakkai Zasshi 1998;87(11):2309-10.
(Jpn)
Oertmann C, Bergmann KC.
[The increase of pollen-associated oral allergy syndrome: The marker of a change in pollen allergy].
Allergologie 1997;20(12):611-9.
(Ger) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
The histories of pollen-associated food intolerance were obtained from questionnaires of patients with pollinosis at a hospital for allergies and diseases of the airways.
The comparisons were made between 300 consecutive individual cases examined between 1979-1983 and again 300 cases between 1995-1996.
The prevalence of oral allergy syndrome (OAS), particularly that produced by apples, nuts, stone and kernel fruits was 17.3% 15 years ago as opposed to 58.3% for todays figures.
Almost no difference was to be observed in non-pollen-associated food intolerances.
The pollen skin test showed the same frequency of tree pollen sensitization in both groups (267:264).
Whilst particularly trivalent sensitizations to trees, herbs and grasses were found (238) 15 years ago, this was evident in only 133 cases for 1995-1996.
However, the monovalent sensitization to trees alone increased from 2 to 55 (0,6% to 18,5%) and bivalent sensitization to trees and grasses showed an increase from 5,7% to 22.1%.
Additionally, a high percentage of those patients with mono and bivalent sensitizations to trees also suffered from OAS, caused by the high identity of Bet v1 and the major allergens in apples and nuts.
Thus the observed increase of OAS conforms with a higher potency of tree pollen allergy manifesting itself in mono and bivalent form - even in patients less disposed to allergies.
This assumption is backed by the fact that a higher percentage of older patients had monovalent pollen allergy, grown "forced" over years whereas the younger patients of extreme allergic disposition more frequently showed a trivalent sensitization.
In 1995-1996 the PRIST value was determined in 167 patients with pollinosis.
This demonstrates that the level of total IgE is not significant for OAS.
A heightened exposure to sensitizing tree pollen is probably of more significance today.
Thus OAS is a marker syndrome indicating a change in pollinosis today more often due to tree pollen allergy whereas sensitization to grassesand herbs almost remained the same within the time period of comparison.
Oka K, Saito F, Yasuhara T, Sugimoto A.
The allergens of Dendropanax trifidus Makino and Fatsia japonica Decne. et Planch. and evaluation of cross-reactions with other plants of the Araliaceae family.
Contact Dermatitis 1999;40(4):209-13.
cis-9,17-Octadecadiene-12,14-diyne-1,16-diol (I), an analog of falcarinol has been identified in our previous report as an active component of Dendropanax trifidus and a strong sensitizer.
In this report, 16-hydroxy-cis-9,17-octadecadiene-12,14-diynoic acid (II) and cis-9,trans-16-octadecadiene-12,14-diynoic acid (III) were elucidated as 2 other active components of the plant.
Compound I, however, presented with the highest concentration and showed a stronger reaction on patch testing.
The leaves of Fatsia japonica Decne. et Planch. were also found to contain compound I, but the amount was found to be 7x more in Dendropanax trifidus than in Fatsia japonica.
5 subjects with hypersensitivity to Dendropanax trifidus and compound I showed positive reactions when patch tested with the leaves of Hedera helix L. and Schefflera arboricola.
1 of these also showed a positive reaction to the extract of Panax ginseng root powder diluted 1% in ethanol.
There was cross-reaction among these plants, which all belong to the Araliaceae family.
Ondrizek RR, Chan PJ, Patton WC, King A.
An alternative medicine study of herbal effects on the penetration of zona-free hamster oocytes and the integrity of sperm deoxyribonucleic acid.
Fertil Steril 1999;71(3):517-22.
OBJECTIVE: To analyze the effects of certain herbs on sperm DNA and on the fertilization process.
DESIGN: Prospective comparative study.
SETTING: Clinical and academic research environment.
PATIENT(S): Donor sperm specimens.
INTERVENTION(S): Zona-free hamster oocytes were incubated for 1 hour in saw palmetto (Serenoa repens), echinacea purpura, ginkgo biloba, St. John's wort (Hypericum perforatum), or control medium before sperm-oocyte interaction.
The DNA of herb-treated sperm was analyzed with denaturing gradient gel electrophoresis.
MAIN OUTCOME MEASURE(S): Oocyte penetration and integrity of the sperm BRCAI exon 11 gene.
RESULT(S): Pretreatment of oocytes with 0.6 mg/mL of St. John's wort resulted in zero penetration.
A lower concentration (0.06 mg/mL) had no effect.
High concentrations of echinacea and ginkgo also resulted in reduced oocyte penetration.
Exposure of sperm to echinacea purpura and St. John's wort resulted in DNA denaturation.
In contrast, saw palmetto and ginkgo had no effect.
Sperm exposed to 0.6 mg/mL of St. John's wort showed mutation of the BRCA1 exon 11 gene.
CONCLUSION(S): High concentrations of St. John's wort, echinacea, and ginkgo had adverse effects on oocytes.
Saw palmetto had no effect.
The data suggested that St. John's wort, ginkgo, and echinacea at high concentrations damage reproductive cells.
St. John's wort was mutagenic to sperm cells.
Ono T, Eri M, Honda G, Kuwahara T. Valvular heart disease and Chinese-herb nephropathy [letter; comment].
Lancet 1998;351(9107):991-2.
Paulsen E. Occupational dermatitis in Danish gardeners and greenhouse workers (II).
Etiological factors.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;38(1):14-9.
The aim of the study was to assess the distribution of different types of occupational eczema among employees in floristry and detect the allergens most commonly involved.
Based on a postal questionnaire, 253 gardeners and greenhouse workers with occupational skin symptoms and 52 randomly-selected without symptoms were examined and patch tested.
Routine tests comprised the standard series, the Compositae mix, feverfew and 3 fungicides, with additional testing based on case records.
184 persons from the symptom group and 1 from the random group had occupational eczema.
Irritant occupational contact eczema was suspected in 150 persons (59%).
Nevertheless, 48% of the 250 persons patch tested had at least 1 positive reaction, most frequently to nickel, followed by Compositae which were positive in 25 cases (10%), of whom 24 were possibly occupationally sensitized.
13 persons from symptom group had positive reactions to fungicides.
Occupational allergic eczema was suspected in 43 persons (17%), most often caused by plants belonging to the Compositae, Geraniaceae and Liliaceae families.
New plant sensitizers were Exacum affine and Begonia lorraine.
Exposure to specific plant species seemed to be the most important eliciting factors in both allergic and irritant occupational dermatitis in floristry, and preventive measures should include reduction of contact with plants.
Paulsen E, Sogaard J, Andersen KE. Occupational dermatitis in Danish gardeners and greenhouse workers (III).
Compositae-related symptoms.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;38(3):140-6.
The clinical part of the study aimed at describing epidemiological and diagnostic aspects of occupational Compositae dermatitis.
Patch testing with the sesquiterpene lactone (SL) and Compositae mixes, feverfew extract and supplementary allergens in 250 selected gardeners showed Compositae allergy in 25, 17 females and 8 males.
24 were possibly occupationally sensitized.
The mean age was lower and the preponderance of women higher compared to classical Compositae dermatitis, and the distribution and course of the dermatitis most often did not differ from other occupational plant dermatoses.
The Compositae mix detected 2x as many as the SL mix, and the overall detection rate with both was 76%, making aimed patch testing necessary.
Chrysanthemum (Dendranthema), marguerite daisy (Argyranthemum frutescens) and lettuce (Lactuca sativa) were frequent sensitizers.
Occupational type I allergy to Compositae comprised sensitization to Gerbera, chrysanthemum, lettuce, Senecio cruentus and Aster.
Among 1657 respondents in the questionnaire part of the study, 824 had worked with Compositae, and 160 (19%) reported occupational Compositae-related symptoms of skin and mucous membranes.
Possible risk factors for the development of these were assessed in a stepwise logistic regression model and a history of childhood eczema, hay fever and duration of exposure were significantly associated with Compositae-related irritant and allergic symptoms in both sexes.
Pfutzner W, Thomas P, Rueff F, Przybilla B. Anaphylactic reaction elicited by condurango bark in a patient allergic to natural rubber latex.
J Allergol Clin Immunol 1887;101(2 Pt 1):281-2.
BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS. RRM CASE STUDY MARSDENIA-CONDURANGO HUMAN ADULT MALE NURSE PATIENT NATURAL RUBBER LATEX NATURAL RUBBER LATEX ALLERGY CUNDURANGO BARK ANAPHYLACTIC REACTION HERBAL TEA ALLERGY ALLERGEN IMMUNE SYSTEM DISEASE TEA.
Phan TG, Estell J, Duggin G, Beer I, Smith D, Ferson MJ. Lead poisoning from drinking Kombucha tea brewed in a ceramic pot.
Med J Aust 1998;169(11-12):644-6.
Kombucha tea is an alternative therapy that is gaining popularity as a remedy for a diverse range of ailments.
We report two cases of symptomatic lead poisoning requiring chelation therapy in a married couple who had been drinking Kombucha tea for six months, brewing the tea in a ceramic pot.
We postulate that acids in the tea eluted lead from the glaze pigment used in the ceramic pot, in a manner analogous to elution of lead from crystal decanters by wine and spirits.
Picciotto A, Campo N, Brizzolara R, Giusto R, Guido G, Sinelli N, Lapertosa G, Celle G. Chronic hepatitis induced by Jin Bu Huan.
J Hepatol 1998;28(1):165-7.
BACKGROUND/AIMS: Jin Bu Huan and other Chinese herbal products are widely taken remedies.
They have been developed as a natural alternative to traditional drugs in the treatment of various ailments.
Their ability to induce several side effects such as acute hepatitis has already been described.
We report a case of chronic hepatic damage following administration of Jin Bu Huan Anodyne tablets.
METHODS: The patient, a 49-year-old man, developed biochemical signs of liver damage 2 months after beginning Jin Bu Huan intake (3 tablets/daily) including biopsy-proven chronic hepatitis with moderate fibrosis.
Virological, autoimmune, metabolic or other hepatotoxic causes were excluded.
Liver function impairment was resolved by discontinuing Jin Bu Huan intake.
CONCLUSIONS: This case reinforces the already known hepatotoxicity of this product and should make us think more about the uncontrolled use of alternative products.
Powell T, Hsu FF, Turk J, Hruska K. Ma-huang strikes again: ephedrine nephrolithiasis.
Am J Kidney Dis 1998;32(1):153-9.
Ephedrine and its metabolites are naturally occurring alkaloids that can be derived from evergreens worldwide and have been used as medicinals for hundreds of years.
Because they have "real" pharmacological alpha and beta catecholamine effects and are "natural" products, the alternative medicine industry has popularized them for multiple uses, including asthma, weight loss, energy and sexual enhancement, and euphoria.
Several recent reviews have documented the dangerous nature of using these "drugs" unsupervised, including multiple deaths, and the FDA is currently reviewing ephedrine's use in the alternative medicine industry.
We report a new toxicity, ephedrine nephrolithiasis, in a patient using an energy supplement, Ma-Huang extract, which contains ephedrine.
Although previously not reported, the Louis C. Herring and Company kidney stone database show that this is an endemic complication of ephedrine with hundreds of previous episodes.
Using gas chromatography (GC) mass spectrometry, we were able to positively identify the chemical structure of our patient's stone, as well as other similar stones from Louis Herring, as containing ephedrine, norephedrine, and pseudoephedrine.
Reginster F, Jadoul M, Van Ypersele De Strihou C. Chinese herbs nephropathy presentation, natural history and fate after transplantation.
Nephrol Dial Transplant 1997;12(1):81-6.
BACKGROUND: Chinese herbs nephropathy is a new type of subacute interstitial nephropathy reported in women who had followed a slimming regimen including Chinese herbs.
METHODS: We report the clinical presentation and follow-up of 15 cases and compare them with a control group of 15 women with interstitial nephropathies of other origins, matched for age, sex, and initial serum creatinine (mean 3 mg/dl).
RESULTS: At presentation the Chinese herbs nephropathy group differed from the control group by a lower proteinuria (P = 0.009), a more severe anaemia (P = 0.002), and a higher prevalence of aortic insufficiency (42% vs 0%, P 
It was further characterized by mild hypertension in 80%, glycosuria and leukocyturia in 40% and asymmetric kidneys in 54% of the cases.
During follow-up, deterioration of renal function was faster in the Chinese herbs nephropathy than in the control group (P 
It was influenced by the duration of Chinese herbs treatment (P = 0.037) and the delay between the end of Chinese herbs ingestion and diagnosis of the disease (P = 0.013).
In three cases, renal failure developed 3 years after Chinese herbs ingestion.
Complications included severe aortic regurgitation requiring surgery (n = 1), urothelial carcinoma (n = 2), bilateral ureterohydronephrosis due to periureteral fibrosis (n = 1).
Five patients with Chinese herbs nephropathy were successfully transplanted, without evidence of recurrence of the disease.
CONCLUSIONS: Chinese herbs nephropathy is characterized by a lower proteinuria, more severe anaemia, and a faster progression to renal failure than other interstitial nephropathies.
The duration of Chinese herbs treatment and interval between withdrawal of Chinese herbs and diagnosis are correlated with the rate of progression.
Severe, unusual extrarenal complications may affect Chinese herbs nephropathy patients.
Rodriguez-Serna M, Sanchez-Motilla JM, Ramon R, Aliaga A. Allergic and systemic contact dermatitis from Matricaria chamomilla tea.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;39(4):192-3.
Rudzki E, Rebandel P. Positive patch test with Kamillosan in a patient with hypersensitivity to camomile.
Contact Dermatitis 1998;38(3):164.
Ryu JC, Kim KR, Kim HJ, Youn JY, Myung SW, Kim GH, Lee MJ, Chang IM. Genotoxicity study of bojungchisup-tang, an oriental herbal decoction-in vitro chromosome aberration assay in Chinese hamster lung cells and in vivo supravital-staining micronucleus assay with mouse peripheral reticulocytes.
Arch Pharm Res 1998;21(4):391-7.
The toxicity evaluation of oriental herbal drugs is of great concern at present.
Bojungchisuptang (BCST, in Korean), a decocted medicine of oriental herbal mixture, is now well used in clinic at oriental hospitals for the treatment of edema of several diseases in practice.
However, the toxicity of the oriental herbal decocted medicines such as genetic toxicity is not well defined until now.
In this respect, to clarify the genetic toxicity of BCST, in vitro chromosome aberration assay with Chinese hamster lung (CHL) fibroblasts and in vivo supravital micronucleus assay with mouse peripheral reticulocytes were performed in this study.
In the chromosome aberration assay, we used 5,000 micrograms/ml BCST as maximum concentration because no remarkable cytotoxicity in CHL cells was observed both in the presence and absence of S-9 metabolic activation system.
No statistical significant differences of chromosome aberrations were observed in CHL cells treated with 5,000, 2,500 and 1,250 micrograms/ml BCST for 6 hour both in the presence and absence of S-9 metabolic activation.
However, very weak positive result (6.5-8.0% aberration) of BCST was obtained in the absence of S-9 metabolic activation system at 5,000 micrograms/ml BCST when treated for 24 hour, i.e. 1.5 normal cell cycle time.
And also, in vivo clastogenicity of BCST was studied by acridine orange-supravital staining micronucleus assay using mouse peripheral reticulocytes.
We used 2,000 mg/kg as the highest oral dose in this micronucleus assay because no acute oral toxicity of BCST was observed in mice.
The optimum induction time of micronucleated reticulocytes (MNRETs) was determined as 36 hours after oral administration of 2,000 mg/kg BCST.
No significant differences of MNRETs between control and BCST treatment groups were observed in vivo micronucleus assay.
From these results, BCST revealed very weak positive result in chromosome aberration assay in vitro with CHL cells and no clastogenicity in micronucleus assay in vivo.
Sadjadi J. Cutaneous anthrax associated with the Kombucha "mushroom" in Iran [letter].
JAMA 1998;280(18):1567-8.
Santa Maria A, Lopez A, Diaz MM, Munoz-Mingarro D, Pozuelo JM. Evaluation of the toxicity of guarana with in vitro bioassays.
Ecotoxicol Environ Saf 1998;39(3):164-7.
A natural stimulant, Paullinia cupana, commonly called guarana, was tested for its ability to induce in vitro toxicity in Chinese hamster ovary (CHO) cells and bacterial cells (Photobacterium phosphoreum).
The cytotoxic effects of aqueous guarana extracts were evaluated by three endpoint systems: neutral red (NR) uptake assay, total protein content [kenacid blue (KB)] assay, and tetrazolium (MTT) assay.
The Microtox test was also used.
Results indicated that the lowest concentration of guarana tested was not toxic and that the IC50 values calculated with the NR, KB, and MTT assays were lower than the highest concentration tested (40 mg/ml).
There was no significant difference in cytotoxicity between the three test systems.
The EC50 values obtained with the Microtox assay were consistent with these data.
The present in vitro analysis suggests that the concentration of guarana is of critical importance in its cytotoxic activity and high doses could be harmful to human health.
Schilcher H, Leuschner F. [Studies of potential nephrotoxic effects of essential juniper oil].
Arzneimittelforschung 1997;47(7):855-8.
(Ger) BIOSIS COPYRIGHT: BIOL ABS.
The nephrotoxicity of juniper oil (CAS 73049-62-4), a phytomedicine with diuretic resp. aquaretic activity, was evaluated in male Sprague-Dawley rats after oral administration.
Two chemically slightly different oil batches were tested for 28 days with 100, 333 or 1000 mg (series 1, batch 1) resp. 100, 300 or 900 mg (series 2, batch 2) juniper oil/kg.
Additionally terpinene-4-ol, a compound with postulated aquaretic activity, which can be found in essential juniper oil up to an amount of 10 mg% was tested in a dosage of 400 mg/kg.
Neither of the tested substances induced changes in function or morphology of the kidneys at the tested doses, and they were revealed to be nontoxic.
Schwartz HJ, Jones RT, Rojas AR, Squillace DL, Yunginger JW. Occupational allergic rhinoconjunctivitis and asthma due to fennel seed.
Ann Allergy Asthma Immunol 1997;78(1):37-40.
BACKGROUND: A patient with complaints of rhinitis and asthma occurring at work presented for consultation.
OBJECTIVES: To evaluate the role of the foods and spices with which he worked, in the causation of his complaints, and to evaluate his immune reactivity to these materials.
METHODS: Allergy skin testing and in vitro RAST assays were carried out.
After demonstrating specific reactivity to fennel, SDS-PAGE electrophoreses was carried out.
RESULTS: Positive skin tests to grass, ragweed, and freshly prepared fennel seed were found.
Serum IgE antibodies to fennel were qui
